Hawaii, session 2026, GM1277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the
Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2026.
SECTION 2. This Act amends Act 250, Session Laws of Hawaii
2025, and other appropriations and authorizations effective
during fiscal biennium 2025-2027.
SECTION 3. Part I of Act 250, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025,
is amended by amending section 2 to read as follows:
"SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS. Unless otherwise clear from the
context, as used in this Act:
"Capital project number" means the official number of the
capital project, as assigned by the responsible organization.
"Expending agency" means the executive department,
independent commission, bureau, office, board, or other
establishment of the state government (other than the
legislature. Office of Hawaiian Affairs, and judiciary), the
political subdivisions of the State, or any quasi-public
institution supported in whole or in part by state funds, which
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 1

Page 2 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
is authorized to expend specified appropriations made by this
Act.
Abbreviations where used to denote the expending agency
shall mean the following:
AGR Department of Agriculture and Biosecurity
AGS Department of Accounting and General Services
ATG Department of the Attorney General
BED Department of Business, Economic Development and
Tourism.
BUF Department of Budget and Finance
CCA Department of Commerce and Consumer Affairs
DEF Department of Defense
EDN Department of Education
GOV Office of the Governor
HHL Department of Hawaiian Home Lands
HMS Department of Human Services
HRD Department of Human Resources Development
HTH Department of Health
LAW Department of Law Enforcement
LBR Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
LNR Department of Land and Natural Resources
HB1800 CDl FIN-2
■■iiiHiiiiiiiini

Page 3 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
LTG Office of the Lieutenant Governor
PSD Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation
SUB Subsidies
TAX Department of Taxation
TRN Department of Transportation
UOH University of Hawaii
CCH City and County of Honolulu
COH County of Hawaii
COK County of Kauai
COM County of Maui
"Means of financing" or "MOF" means the source from which
funds are appropriated or authorized to be expended for the
programs and projects specified in this Act. All appropriations
are followed by letter symbols. Such letter symbols, where
used, shall have the following meanings:
A general funds
B special funds
C general obligation bond fund
D general obligation bond fund with debt service cost to
be paid from special funds
E revenue bond funds
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 3
iniiiiiiioiiiini

Page 4 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
J federal aid interstate funds
K federal aid primary funds
L federal aid secondary funds
M federal aid urban funds
N federal funds
P other federal funds
R private contributions
S county funds
T trust funds
U interdepartmental transfers
V American Rescue Plan funds
W revolving funds
X other funds
"Position ceiling" means the maximum number of permanent
and temporary full-time equivalent positions that an expending
agency is authorized for a particular program during a specified
period or periods, as denoted by a single asterisk for permanent
full-time equivalent positions and a pound sign for temporary
full-time equivalent positions.
"Program ID" means the unique identifier for the specific
program and consists of the abbreviation for the organization
HB1800 CDl FIN-2
iiiiiHiiiiiiMin

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
responsible for carrying out the program, followed by the
organization number for the program."
SECTION 4. Part II of Act 250, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2025, is amended by amending section 3 to read as
follows:
"SECTION 3. APPROPRIATIONS. The following sums, or so
much thereof as may be sufficient to accomplish the purposes and
programs designated herein, are hereby appropriated or
authorized, as the case may be, from the means of financing
specified to the expending agencies designated for the fiscal
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The
total expenditures and the number of positions in each fiscal
year of the biennium shall not exceed the sums and the position
ceiling indicated for each fiscal year, except as provided
elsewhere in this Act, or as provided by general law.

HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 6 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
A. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
1. BEDIOO - STRATEGIC MARKETING AND SUPPORT
10.00* [--------10.00*]
11.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING BED 3,893,040A [-—3,893,04QA]
4,524,758A
BED B 1,823,499B
BED 1,823,499W [-—L7-&-23H09W]
OW
BED 700,000P 700,OOOP

2. BEDIOI - OFFICE OF INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS
OPERATING BED 400,000A A
BED B 1,300,OOOB
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED 5,000,000C C

3. BED105 - CREATIVE INDUSTRIES DIVISION
15.00* [--------1-5-.00*]
14.00*
1.00# 1.00#
RFD 1 RRn f
1,850,478A
BED l,080,000B 1,080,OOOB

4. BED107 - FOREIGN TRADE ZONE
16.00* 16.00*
OPERATING BED 2,796,043B 2,796,0438
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED B 250,0008
BM C 1,000,OOOC

5. BED142 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
26.00* [--------26.00*1
38.00*
[--------4^-W-] [■------- 4-^W^]
1.00# 6.00#
nPPRATTWr? Rm r o qno ma _ i r.—3/ 802> 952A]
3,442,604A 4,268,829a

6. BED113 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - ADMINISTRATION AND GOVERNANCE
14.00* 14.00*
OPERATING BED 3,696,660A [-—3> 696/660A]
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 7 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
3,604,244A
BED 26,977,020B 14,000,OOOB
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED B 21,000,OOOB
BED 36,400,OOOC C

7. BED114 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - BRANDING AND MARKETING
5.00* 5.00*
OPERATING BED 39,249,201A [—39,249,201A]
39,399,201A

8. BED115 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - SPORTS AND SIGNATURE EVENTS
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING BED 7,318,075A 7,318,075A
BED B 350,OOOB

9. BED116 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - DESTINATION STEWARDSHIP AND
COMMUNITY
7.00* 7.00*
OPERATING opn 7 Q97 r_____*7 Q 9 Q Q Q O 1
7,623,883A

10 BED117 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - REGENERATIVE TOURISM DEVELOPMENT
3.00* 3.00*
OPERATING BED 3,762,181A 3,762,181A

11 BEDI18 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
OPERATING BED l,050,000A l,050,000A

12 AGRIOI - FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR AGRICULTURE
9.00* 9.00*
OPERATING AGR 874,338A [----- 874,338A]
856,963A
AGR 5,500,000W 5,500,000W

13 AGR122 - PLANT PEST AND DISEASE CONTROL
143.00* [------ 143.00^]
153.00*
OPERATING AGR 21,335, 989A [—
23,064,930A
AGR 4, 130,800B [--- 4/ 130, 800B]
13,130,800B
AGR 512,962T 512,962T
HB1800 CDl FIN-2
■■innMHiiii

Page 8 H.B. NO.
T’
h
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
AGR 212,095U [ —
OU
AGR 50,360W [—-----50/36QW]
OW
AGR 365,946P [—---
465,946P

14. AGR131 - RABIES QUARANTINE
32.32* 32.32*
OPERATING AGR 4,781,110B r L /I -701 1 1 n Di
6, 031, HOB

15. AGR132 - ANIMAL DISEASE CONTROL
25.68* 25.68*
OPERATING AGR 3,421,755A t—
3,305,795A
AGR 47,802B 47,802B
1.00# 1.00#
AGR 306,941P 306,941P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 7,000,000C C

16. LNR172 - FORESTRY - RESOURCE MANAGEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT
34.00* 34.00*
OPERATING LNR 8,808,994A r o ono oft/iAi
I
8,716,006A
LNR 2,455,475B [— 2/455,475B]
7,940,4758
1.00* 1.00*
LNR 7,100,000P r IO. i
L
10,730,OOOP

17. AGR151 - QUALITY AND PRICE ASSURANCE
23.50* 23.50*
OPERATING AGR 1,826,443A r 1 /I /I Q7V1
L
1,789,561A
AGR 109,046B 109,046B
AGR 100,000N 100,000N
AGR 300,000T 300,OOOT
AGR 186,848W 127,848W
AGR 138,624P 138,624P

18. AGR171 - AGRICULTURAL DEVELOPMENT AND MARKETING
HB1800 GDI FIN-2
■iiiiniiiBiiHi

Page 9 H.B. NO.
T,
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
*->4b^(U-At\C^-000\0^
>4biU.ki4l7(^04-000s'O-H^NJU^^4^/t^0U-e00>'OA-►>K^>(k^4^Z^^04-•e00\O*-^ab
—
11.00* 11.00*
OPERATING AGR l, 109, 694A [■---1,067,694A]
1,046,403A
AGR 15,OOOB 15,OOOB
0.75* 0.75*
AGR 2,051,568N 2,051,568N
1.25* 1.25*
AGR 5,289,219P 5,289,219P
19. AGRI 41 - AGRICULTURAL RESOURCE MANAGEMENT
26.50* 19.00*
OPERATING AGR 4,221,136A [•---1,7 98,532A]
1,762,478A
13.50* 13.50*
AGR 2,851,320B [■---2,851,3206]
5,351,320B
★ 7.50*
AGR 2,747,123W 1,375,787W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGR 5, 000,000C [-------------&€]
75,950,000C
AGR 1,OOON N
AGRI 92 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FOR AGRICULTURE
33.00* [--------
33.00*
OPERATING AGR 5, 580, 886A [----5,556 t 126A]
5,576,965A
AGR B 4,676,140B
AGR P [■----- 164,450P]
OP
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 1,900,000C 2,200,OOOC
BED170 - AGRIBUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AND RESEARCH
13.50* [■-------
0.00*
OPERATING BED 4,825, 616A [----47-&^3T4r&6A]
13,985,791A
BED B 20,159,311B
0.50* 0.50*
BED 82,126U 82,126U
2.00* [■________ 9 Dfl* 1
15.50*
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 9
l■llllll■ill■l

Page 10 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
6.00# 6.00#
BED 16,259,661W [-—4/ 048/ 264W]
19,618,875W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED lll,201,000C r L ——xJ f Z Lz L/ w L,* J1
11,150,OOOC

22. AGR153 - AQUACULTURE DEVELOPMENT
7.00* 7.00*
OPERATING AGR 978,519A [-----
958,873A
AGR 125,000B 125,OOOB

23. BED120 - HAWAII STATE ENERGY OFFICE
1.00* 1.00*
25.00# [------- 2-5.00#]
28.00#
OPERATING BED 2,571,816A [-—2-,-571,816A]
2,767,634A
BED 795,000B [-----7 95,OOOB]
6,795,OOOB
BED 7,146,250T 7,146,250T

24. BEDI43 - HAWAII TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
8.00* [--------------------R^rO^]
0.00*
4.00# [---------4-.OO#]
0.00#
OPERATING BED 4,701,795A [- 2/701,7Q5A]
OA
BED l,604,258B 1,604,258B
★ 8.00*
# 3.00#
BED 2,017,203W r L —X-1
5,250,277W
10.00# 10.00#
BED 994,214P 994,214P

25. BEDI46 - NATURAL ENERGY LABORATORY OF HAWAII AUTHORITY
17.00# 17.00#
OPERATING BED 7,929,310B -7 non on no i
8,055,558B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL_________________ BED__________________ C 2,000,OOOC
HB1800 GDI FIN-2

iiHmiiniHiini

Page 11 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

25A. AGS820 - HAWAII BROADBAND AND DIGITAL EQUITY OFFICE
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING AGS 360,OOOA 360,OOOA

26. BEDI38 - HAWAII GREEN INFRASTRUCTURE AUTHORITY
OPERATING BED A 10,000,OOOA
7.25# [---------
7.00#
Rpn ftftp r o c ro Q c c OQ1
98,618,403B
1.75# [--------- 1.75tf]
1.00#
BED 444,261P [------444,261P]
380,511P

27. LNR141 - WATER AND LAND DEVELOPMENT
24.00* 24.00*
OPERATTNC; T MR ft dDft ftfi2A F —ft—1
3,320,249A
4.00* 4.00*
LNR 907,330B 907,330B
LNR 199,479T 199,479T
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 2,000,000C [------------©ej
2,000,000C

28. BED150 - HAWAII COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
13.00* [--------13.00*]
0.00*
1.00# [---------
0.00#
OPERATING BED l,526,750A [--- 1,526- 750A]
OA
11.00* [--------11.00*1
18.00*
1.00# 1.00#
BED 2,554,972B [--- 2,554> 972B]
4,253,115B
TMVESTMFMT CAPTTAT. RED ftft nOO HOnr F A kJ LJ kJ L/ k«z J
f
31,450,OOOC

29. BED160 - HAWAII HOUSING FINANCE AND DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
HB1800 GDI FIN-2
■■llllllllil

Page 12 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING BED 3,100,000N 3,100,000N
23.00* [-------23.00-*]
21.00*
48.00# [-------48.00#]
47.00#
BED 16, 060, 058W [—4r5/ 889, 058W]
15,641,486W
BED 3,000,000P 3,000,000P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED 100,000,0000 [ 140,000,0000]
195,000,0000


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 12

Page 13 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
‘—
lJb>UUi
m\0^e00>'
O
‘ ->0l
W.»Jl7t\
O4~'00©\©i_|Jb
Wk*
mhif^'00^
O‘
—
l4b^(.i4Al\OJ~'0Q0\O‘
-H^k
B. EMPLOYMENT
1. LBRlll - WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
13.10* 13.10*
OPERATING LBR 6, 822,007A [----6,822,0Q7A]
6,541,969A
LBR 5,364,646B 5,364,646B
57.20* 57.20*
34.00# 34.00#
LBR 6,550,000N 6,550,OOON
LBR 2,891,173U 2,891,173U
0.70* 0.70*
LBR 300,OOOP 300,OOOP
2. LBR135 - WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL
OPERATING LBR 455,026A [------455/026A]
445,355A
7.00* 7.00*
LBR 10,700,OOON 10,700,OOON
3. LBR171 - UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM
10.00* 10.00*
OPERATING LBR l, 098,246A [----l,098,246A]
1,074,905A
LBR 2,173,756B 2,173,756B
187.50* 187.50*
LBR 18,000,OOON 18,000,OOON
LBR 341,400,OOOT 341,400,OOOT
4. LBR903 - OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
13.00* 13.00*
5.00# 5.00#
OPERATING LBR 4,971,563A [----4/ 97-l-,-563A]
5,794,445A
LBR 5,000B 5,000B
4.00# 4.00#
LBR 6,517,OOON 6,517,OOON
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LBR 20,000,000C [------------ ©€J
20,000,000c
5. HMS802 - VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION
38.73* 38.73*
2.00# 2.00#
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 13
■lllilllllllill

Page 14 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING HMS 5,056,561A [——6,138/ 995A]
6,017,798A
73.27* 73.27*
HMS 19,176,876N 19,176,876N
HMS 2,000,000W 2,000,OOOW

6. LBR143 - HAWAII OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH PROGRAM
17.30* 17.30*
0.50# 0.50#
OPERATING LBR l,393,204A [— 17-3 931-204 A]
1,363,595A
19.00* 19.00*
LBR 2,746,105W 2,746,105W
19.70* 19.70*
LBR 2,400,000P 2,400,OOOP

7. LBR152 - WAGE STANDARDS PROGRAM
20.00* 20.00*
OPERATING TLj RU Rfx 1
f
O
f
O i L r —4—4-441—Q-54-2V1
1,414,981A
LBR 500,000B 500,000B

8. LBR153 - HAWAII CIVIL RIGHTS COMMISSION
22.50* 22.50*
OPERATING LBR 1,843,633A [——i7-&4^7-&^5A]
1,804,451A
0.50* 0.50*
5.00# 5.00#
LBR 350,000P 350,OOOP

9. LBR183 - DISABILITY COMPENSATION PROGRAM
77.00* 77.00*
OPERATING T RR ft r Q n'jo 1 OTTvi
8,790,137A
11.00* 11.00*
5.00# 5.00#
LBR 24,157,551T 24,157,551T

10. LBR161 - HAWAII LABOR RELATIONS BOARD
3.00* 3.00*
7.00# 7.00#
OPERATING LBR l,138,087A [-
HB1800 GDI FIN-2

Page 15 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO, ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
1,115,919A

11. LBR812 - LABOR AND INDUSTRIAL RELATIONS APPEALS BOARD
12.00* 12.00*
OPERATING LBR l,209,410A [----1,309/ 410A]
1,183,707A

12. LBR901 - RESEARCH AND STATISTICS
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING LBR 178,081A [------178/ 081A]
174,297A
4.00* 4.00*
1.00# 1.00#
LBR 440,322N 440,322N

13. LBR902 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
18.83* 18.83*
3.46# 3.46#
OPERATING LBR 3, 937,790A [--- 2/-»4.2, 790A]
2,748,713A
LBR 200,000B [------
OB
32.17* 32.17*
1.54# 1.54#
LBR 6,000,OOOP 6,000,OOOP

HB1800 CDl FIN-2
lUiiHimiiii

Page 16 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
C. TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES
1 . TRN102 - DANIEL K. INOUYE INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT
661.00* t------- 661.00*]
657.00*
15.00# 15.00#
OPERATING TRN 283,790,642B [- 285,933,581B]
285,576,231B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 17,061,OOOE [-—2^7^76^7^006]
215,375,OOOE
TRN 1,OOON 1,OOON

2. TRN104 •- GENERAL AVIATION
31.00* [--------31.00*]
30.00*
OPERATING TRN 19,811,421B [- 17,928,307B]
17,840,333B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN E 7,001,OOOE
T^ 1,OOON

3. TRNlll -- HILO INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT
85.00* (--------2^^^]
86.00*
2.00# 2.00#
OPERATING TRN 26,440,201B [- 28->-974,929B]
29,035,524B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 26,000,OOOE [------------ OB]
7,030,OOOE
TRN 1,OOON [------------ OB]
1,OOON

4. TRN114 - ELLISON ONIZUKA KONA INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT AT KEAHOLE
110.00* [------ 1-lQ.OO*]
109.00*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING TRN 34,282,904B [- 34,549,166B]
34,488,571B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 137,045,OOOE [------------OB]
82,830,OOOE
TRN 10,000,OOON [------------OB]
1,POON

5. TRN116 - WAIMEA-KOHALA AIRPORT
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 16

Page 17 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
4.00* 4.00*
OPERATING TRN 1,338,0588 1,339,1218

6. TRN118 - UPOLU AIRPORT
OPERATING TRN 51,1008 51,1008

7. TRN131 - KAHULUI AIRPORT
183.00* rI X w • Lz J
184.00*
4.00# 4.00#
OPERATING TRN 52,283,1118 r L RO /iin o/ioni
52,500,7718
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 52,250,OOOE rL CO U cn W n / V nn V n V i D z J i
f
67,000,OOOE
TRN 5,000,OOON r I ___________QM 1
1,OOON

8. TRN133 - HANA AIRPORT
3.00* 3.00*
OPERATING TRN 762,1088 762,5258
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN E 11,386,OOOE
T^ N 1,OOON

9. TRN135 - KAPALUA AIRPORT
12.00* [--------12.00*]
11.00*
OPERATING TRN 3,133,1898 [-—3/13-57-7 7 08]
3,054,7468

10. TRN141 - MOLOKAI AIRPORT
14.00* 14.00*
OPERATING TRN 3,993,2738 3,998,5868
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 6,230,OOOE E
TRN 2,000,OOON N

11. TRN143 - KALAUPAPA AIRPORT
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING TRN 520,9298 520,9298

12. TRN151 - LANAI AIRPORT
14.00* 14.00*
OPERATING TRN 4,575,6228 4,584,7328
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 17

Page 18 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

13. TRN161 - LIHUE AIRPORT
115.00* 115.00*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING TRN 32,974,694B 33,055,875B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 9,225, 000E [- s. 1 f) ■ nnnFi
8,096,POPE
TRN 1,OOON 4,6PP,PPPN

14. TRN163 - PORT ALLEN AIRPORT
OPERATING TRN 1,841B 1,841B

15. TRN195 - AIRPORTS ADMINISTRATION
135.00* [-------
137.PP*
OPERATING TRN / U / z. O / J/ O Li /I an 119
494,281,225B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 7,500,0008 7,500,0008
TRN 0 Q /I *5 Q 1 A A ATT T 1c1 aca AAAv 1
777,166,PPPE
TRN 1,802,OOON 60,PP2,PPPN
TRN 301,200,000X [------2PP,0PPX]
31,2PP,PPPX

16. TRN301 - HONOLULU HARBOR
104.00* 1P4.PP*
OPERATING TRN 33,294,730B 33,212,670B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 24,992,OOOB 39,992,PPPB
TRN 4,OOON 4,PPPN
TRN 4,OOOR 4,PPOR

17. TRN303 - KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR
6.00* 6.PP*
OPERATING TRN 9 9RR AAQR f.— 4 2 m — , □ 4m - S W X 4 i m — f 4m L> J1
2,327,332B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,OOOB 34,992,0PPB
TRN 4,OOON 4,PPPN
TRN 4,OOOR 4,PPPR

18. TRN311 - HILO HARBOR
15.00* 15.PP*
OPERATING TRN 4,733,388B 4,728,916B
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 18

Page 19 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D, 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
^-i>
K»*<^trt\
O
Meo
O'o*-i»
K
w.>!jtfti
O
Meoo\o-kJb
w^
At»o^eo^0k_i>
K
W^i
U\oi<coo\
©k-hJb
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,OOOB 44,992,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR
19. TRN313 - KAWAIHAE HARBOR
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING TRN 2,585,678B 2,585,027B
20. TRN331 - KAHULUI HARBOR
19.00* 19.00*
OPERATING TRN 6,732,925B 6,725,038B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,OOOB 9,992,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR
21. TRN341 - KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING TRN 834,558B 834,216B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,OOOB 4,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR
22. TRN361 - NAWILIWILI HARBOR
15.00* 15.00*
OPERATING TRN 4,579,638B 4,570,717B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 9,992,OOOB 4,992,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR
23. TRN363 - PORT ALLEN HARBOR
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING TRN 255,870B 255,379B
24. TRN351 - KAUMALAPAU HARBOR
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING TRN 514,295B 511,891B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,OOOB 1,992,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR
25. TRN395 - HARBORS ADMINISTRATION
72.00* 72.00*
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 19
l■l■lll■i■

Page 20 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING TRN 122,924,4408 [ l-O-3/ 372> 3718]
108,072,3718
TRN 25,000,OOON 25,000,OOON
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 17,492,0008 17,492,0008
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR

26. TRN333 - HANA HARBOR
OPERATING TRN 13,5198 13,5198

27. TRN501 - OAHU HIGHWAYS
184.00* 184.00*
OPERATING TRN 97,979,0398 98,253,7328
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 5,445,OOOC r____________ozzi
2,500,OOOC
TRN 14,898,OOOE f o n n n n n T?. 1
10,800,OOOE
TRN 22,134,OOON [--- 3,200,OOON]
41,600,OOON

28. TRN5II - HAWAII HIGHWAYS
117.50* 117.50*
OPERATING TRN 25,508,5708 [—25,-sag, 3858]
25,827,3858
r 4 o nn nnnir i
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,500,OOOE
13,330,OOOE
TRN N r IO onn nnn-Mi
20,721,OOON
TRN l,000,000S S

29. TRN531 - MAUI HIGHWAYS
90.00* 90.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING TRN 28,978,0938 r 79.041.
30,077,3668
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 1,000,0008 8
TRN 5,000,OOOE r 1X n\J n nnvj nvji Ia—1 iJ
77,200,OOOE
TRN 4,001,OOON [------400,OOON]
308,800,OOON

30. TRN561 - KAUAI HIGHWAYS
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 20
iiiiiNniiiiiiu

Page 21 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D, 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
60.00* 60.00*
OPERATING TRN 15,191,7018 14,943,8998
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN l,000,000E [:--- 5,200,000E]
8,400,OOOE
TRN 4,000,000N [:—20,800,000N]
21,600,OOON
TRN S 3,000,OOPS

31. TRN595 - HIGHWAYS ADMINISTRATION
OPERATING TRN 20,000,OOOA A
520.50* [:-------520.50*]
521.50*
:---------
3.00# 1
2.00#
TRN 229,186,6378 [: 207,904,2088]
211,720,2878
TRN 15,763,634N ['—16,213,634N]
18,338,788N
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 22,721,0008 [
20,041,0008
TRN 1,000,OOOC C
TRN 156,684,000E [: 111,324,0008]
164,949,OOOE
TRN 614,705,000N ['-45-€7-97^7-&O«N]
563,864,OOON
TRN 700,0005 S

32. TRN597 - HIGHWAYS SAFETY
32.20* ['------- 32.20*]
36.20*
OPERATING TRN 12,319,2968 [:—12,319,2968]
14,151,3838
6.00* 6.00*
TRN 6,495,670N 6,495,670N
0.80* 0.80*
TRN 1,214,379P 1,214,379P

33. TRN995 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
OPERATING TRN 350,OOOA A
110.00* [:-------110.00*]
109.00*
2.00# 2.00#
HB1800 GDI FIN-2
iiniiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 22 H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN 33,851,5773 [—34,069/ 484B]
37,082,644B
1.00* 1.00*
TRN 12,784,696N 12,784,696N
TRN 743,067R 743,067R

34. TRN695 - ALOHA TOWER DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
1.00* [-------- L^oo*:
0.00*
# 1.00#
OPERATING TRN 1,842,5803 1,842,5803


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 22

Page 23 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
D. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
1. HTH840 - ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT
90.00* 90.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING HTH 7,063,978A 7,379,458A
59.00* 59.00*
4.00# [---------4.00#]
5.00#
HTH 80, 891,943b [—94^]
86,147,179B
33.50* 33.50*
1.00# 1.00#
HTH 4,064,084N 4,064,084N
2.00* 2.00*
HTH 3,013,024U 3,013,024U
43.00* 43.00*
HTH 260,514,599W [ 260,514,599W]
370,514,599W
7.25* 7.25*
4.00# [---------4-^^^]
3.00#
HTH 8,889, 111P [--- 7, 998,178P]
7,942,942P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HTH 10, 995, 000C [--10, 9957-OQQC]
12,610,OOOC
HTH 54,964,000N ■54,964,000N

2. AGR846 - PESTICIDES
37.00* 37.00*
2.00# 2.00#
OPERATING AGR 2, 729,255A [---2,729,255A]
2,669,929A
AGR 2,598,038W [---2,364,038W]
2,714,038W
2.00* 2.00*
1.00# 1.00#
AGR 464,629P 464,629P

3. LNR401 - ECOSYSTEM PROTECTION AND RESTORATION
64.00* 64.00*
0.50# 0.50#
OPERATING LNR 5, 526, 913A [---5,52-6, 913A]
HB1800 GDI FIN-2
iniiiiniiiiuiinii

Page 24 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
•
5,392,157A
3.00* [--------
4.00*
0.25# 0.25#
LNR 4,239,054B [-—4-,-2-3»7O54B]
10,740,143B
1.00* 1.00*
1.75# 1.75#
LNR 4,864,SOON [-—4/ 889,SOON]
4,750,000N
2.00* 2.00*
6.50# 6.50#
LNR 12,537,534P [-----283,534P]
400,OOOP
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 1,150,OOOC [----------- ©e]
- 6,000,OOOC

4. LNR402 - NATIVE RESOURCES AND FIRE PROTECTION PROGRAM
73.50* [------- 73.50*]
74.00*
OPERATING LNR 26,434,031A [ — 23, 539, 031A]
23,108,424A
LNR B 7,667,758B
18.50* 18.50*
1.00# [-------- P-.-00#]
4.00#
LNR 3,679,077N [-—3^7-©7^&VW]
4,665,749N
LNR 106,475T 106,475T
7.00# 7.00#
LNR 1,686,056U 1,686,056U
2.50* [---------2.50*]
2.00*
LNR 4,571,982P [-—2,883,534P]
8,374,232P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 10,500,OOOC [----------- ©€]
10,100,OOOC

5. LNR404 - WATER RESOURCES
28.00* 28.00*
OPERATING LNR 4,584,758A [-—4,484,758A]
4,396,269A
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 24
nniimiMHii

Page 25 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
5.00* 5.00*
LNR 1,283,1236 r 1 ooQ
3,283,1236
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 6,000,000C C

6. LNR405 - CONSERVATION AND RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT
199.25* [-------199.25*]
200.25*
OPERATING LNR 20,509,745A r —64-4A1
17,397,636A
LNR 2,021,4476 r_____ Q9T /I >1 7Pl
3,582,9246
3.75* 3.75*
LNR 958,875N 958,875N
LNR 32,671W 32,671W
LNR 100,000P 100,OOOP
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 4,450,000C [------------©G]
1,000,oooc

7. LNR407 - NATURAL AREA RESERVES AND WATERSHED MANAGEMENT
69.50* 69.50*
4.00# 4.00#
OPERATING LNR ll,709,704A f 1 1 .7n^Al
11,047,132A
LNR 180,0006 r.. T on nnnp i
8,366,4646
LNR 440,000N 440,OOON
0.50* 0.50*
# 15.00#
LNR 3,000,000P r.. o nnn nnnm
4,947,510P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 7,200,000C rL ____________________nriiJ
5,000,oooc

8. LNR906 - LNR - NATURAL AND PHYSICAL ENVIRONMENT
55.00* 55.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING LNR 7,011,321A r *7 nci oonTLi
6,993,140A
20.00* 20.00*
1.00# 1.00#
LNR 3,475,8276 [--- 3z 475/827B]
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 25
■IlililllUIIIII

Page 26 H.B. NO.
1. . 'I g
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
19,028,0776
# 0.50#
LNR N 58,233N
1.00# [-------- 3-^e*]
3.50#
T MR 1 1 4 fiP f ____11 g . 4 1
376,588P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR C 26,000,OOOC

9. HTH849 - ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION
29.50* 29.50*
1.25# 1.25#
OPERATING HTH 3,878,888A 3,878,888A
2.15* 2.15*
0.60# 0.60#
HTH 189,937N 189,937N
11.00* 11.00*
O □oor.il
11X11
4,326,328W
11.95* 11.95*
2.15# 2.15#
HTH 2,330,057P 5,751,220P

10. LNR907 - AHA MOKU ADVISORY COMMITTEE
1.00* 1.00*
LJ X XjI wx X X lx Lj XjIi 1\ o o c o nn M
279,298A

11. LNR908 - KAHOOLAWE ISLAND RESERVE COMMISSION
2.00* 2.00*
14.00# 14.00#
OPERATING LNR l,845,510A [-—1/ 845/ 510A]
1,800,493A

12. LNR909 - MAUNA KEA STEWARDSHIP & OVERSIGHT AUTHORITY
13.00# 13.00#
OPERATING LNR 14,000,800A [—14/000,800A]
13,805,142A


HB1800 GDI FIN-2
MIHIIIIinillHII

Page 27 H.B. NO.
"“i
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
E. HEALTH
1. HTHIOO - COMMUNICABLE DISEASE AND PUBLIC HEALTH NURSING
236.87* 236.87*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING HTH 33, 001,090A [—33/067,876A]
32,650,018A
22.00# 22.00#
HTH 8,827,137N 8,827,137N
3.00* 3.00*
HTH 637,849U 637,849U
11.00* 11.00*
23.50# 23.50#
HTH 5,311,894P 5,311,894P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 8,000,000C [—----------&€]
2,525,000C

2 . HTH131 - DISEASE OUTBREAK CONTROL
26.60* 26.60*
OPERATING HTH 2,333,942A 2,604,086A
B 30,000,OOOB
20.40* 20.40*
9.00# 9.00#
HTH 20,255,445N 3,705,177N
1.00* 1.00*
21.50# 21.50#
HTH 9,378,970P 9,378,970P

3. HTH730 - EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES AND INJURY PREVENTION SYSTEM
10.00* 10.00*
2.20# 2.20#
OPERATING HTH 59,091,232A [—
63,821,974A
6.00# 6.00#
HTH 22,323,419B 22,323,419B
3.00# 3.00#
HTH 420,000P 420,000P

4 . HTH560 - FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES
114.00* 114.00*
0.50# 0.50#
OPERATING HTH 45,499, 911A [—45 / 5-6-6, 966A]
45,051,849A
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 27

Page 28 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
11.40* [■--------11.40*]
14.50*
2.00# 2.00#
HTH 17,965, 804B [-—17,965/ 804B]
18,187,516B
99.80* [■--------99.80*]
97.70*
8.50# 8.50#
HTH 38,121,215N [■—38,121,215N]
38,045,551N
1.00# 1.00#
HTH 101,558U 101,558U
15.30* [■------- 3^.30*]
15.80*
14.00# 14.00#
HTH 12,523,019P [■—12,523,019P]
12,589,907P

HTH590 - CHRONIC DISEASE PREVENTION AND HEALTH PROMOTION
46.50* 46.50*
2.00# [■-------- 2-rW#]
10.00#
OPERATING HTH 7,041,748A [■---7,041,-748A]
7,868,246A
HTH 48,706,3568 48,706,356B
1.00* 1.00*
HTH l,192,408U 1,192,408U
9.50* 9.50*
17.50# 17.50#
HTH 6,740,166P 6,740,166P

HTH595 - HEALTH RESOURCES ADMINISTRATION
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING HTH 244,093A 244,093A

HTH596 - OFFICE OF MEDICAL CANNABIS CONTROL & REGULATION
21.00* 21.00*
5.00# 5.00#
OPERATING HTH 3,109,260A [ 3/109,260A]
2,959,877A
7.00* 7.00*
HTH 2,578,518B [---2/ 425/ 368B]
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 28

Page 29 H.B. NO.
H^i
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
i-l>stU^I/
M9^000VOk>>i4b
M^I/(\9J-'OOesO^-l^t
MC^JlU\9U'OO^O^h>K>>(.U.I/(\9J'OO^O^h^b
2,925,368B
8. HTH210 - HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION - CORPORATE OFFICE
54.50* 54.50*
OPERATING HTH 17,509,2808 17,509,2808
9. HTH211 - KAHUKU HOSPITAL
OPERATING HTH 2,157,500A [--- 2,032,500A]
3,448,750A
TMVTTJQTMPMT CaPTTaT. HTH R ftHD Hnnc f R Ann Annr'i
5,612,OOOC
10. HTH212 - HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION - REGIONS
OPERATING HTH 216,537,303A 199,816,303A
2,337.85* 2,337.85*
HTH 582,286,1858 [-
584,786,1858
TM\7T? C^TMPMT CfiPTTaT HTH A9Q nDDr F --CO 7AQ nnnri
131,809,OOOC
HTH R 25,000,OOOR
11. HTH213 - ALII COMMUNITY CARE
OPERATING HTH 3,500,0008 3,500,0008
12. HTH214 - MAUI HEALTH SYSTEM, A KFH LLC
OPERATING HTH 12,000,000A 6,000,OOOA
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HTH 6,000,000C 6,000,OOOC
13. HTH215 - HHSC - OAHU REGION
OPERATING HTH 8,000,000A 14,000,OOOA
439.00* 439.00*
HTH 48,500,0008 48,400,0008
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HTH 5,600,000C 5,110,OOOC
14. HTH420 - ADULT MENTAL HEALTH - OUTPATIENT
*^4nn* r
335.00*
49.50# [--------4-9.-5^]
42.50#
OPERATING HTH 89,622,044A [-—9-^, fr&-7,271A]
92,622,381A
HTH 11,610,0008 11,610,0008
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 29
liiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiii

Page 30 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL 1VI FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR <D YEAR 0
NO, ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 1= 2026-2027 F
1.00# 1.00#
HTH 2,333,370N 2,333,370N
1.00# 1.00#
HTH 137,363P 137,363P

15. HTH430 - ADULT MENTAL HEALTH - INPATIENT
853.00* 853.00*
20.00# 20.00#
OPERATING HTH 147,045,865A r. T O A CHQ C C /) 7L1
148,718,154A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 23,650,000C 16,750,OOOC

16. HTH440 - ALCOHOL AND DRUG ABUSE DIVISION
29.00* 29.00*
# 2.00#
OPERATING HTH 20,395,713A r aXU—3-0-5.,-3-4-^A. 1
20,473,713A
HTH 750,000B 750,OOOB
1.00* 1.00*
HTH 9,038,656N 9,038,656N
5.00# 5.00#
HTH 6,654,376P 6,722,746P

17. HTH460 - CHILD AND ADOLESCENT MENTAL HEALTH
159.50* 1[-----------
162.50*
8.00# 1i---------8.00#]
7.00#
OPERATING HTH 63,631,355A |[—
62,835,963A
29.00* 29.00*
# 2.00#
HTH 15,375,579B 15,375,5798
5.00# 5.00#
HTH 2,339,630N 2,339,630N
2.00# 1:---------2nr&0+]
0.00#
HTH 2,281,992U 2,281,992U

18. HTH501 - DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
211.00* 211.00*
1.00# 1.00#
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 30

Page 31 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING HTH 121,506, 572A [- 131,398,I20A]
130,385,583A
5.00* 5.00*
HTH 7,747,7388 7,747,7388
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS C 1,000,OOOC

19. HTH495 - 8EHAVI0RAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION
2.00* [---------
10.00*
# 5.00#
OPERATING HTH 210,907A [----- 24r&T-9^VA]
1, 178,427A

20. HTH610 - ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
127.00* 127.00*
OPERATING HTH 9,207,720A r ——1
9,267,693A
34.00* 34.00*
HTH 4,487,4898 4,936,1158
2.00* 2.00*
HTH 158,000N 158,000N
3.00* 3.00*
HTH 271,269U 271,269U
2.00* 2.00*
HTH 396,994P 396,994P

21. HTH710 - STATE LABORATORY SERVICES
69.00* 69.00*
OPERATING HTH 9,189,196A r ft OCft TftCAl
8,854,372A
0.75* 0.75*
2.00# 2.00#
HTH 272,9018 272,9018
9.00# 9.00#
HTH l,029,222N 1,029,222N
0.25* 0.25*
HTH 23,967W 23,967W
2.00# 2.00#
HTH 429,999P 429,999P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HTH C 3,760,OOOC

22. HTH720 - HEALTH CARE ASSURANCE
HB1800 GDI FIN-2
■■■■■Hill

Page 32 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
‘
‘
>-Hat^(XJ)U\0Q-00^O^h>>t
M^JnC\9^-000<'O
-l>st>»CU-nLs94'00O^O
-l>NMCU-)U\9^-000VO>-l>K
22.55* 22.55*
2.00# 2.00#
OPERATING HTH 4,030,204A 4,030,204A
2.85* 2.85*
nXM {, o 1 HR nnniii
2,226,OOOB
21.60* 21.60*
HTH 4,841,562P 4,841,562P
23. HTH906 - STATE HEALTH PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT AGENCY
7.00* 7.00*'
OPERATING HTH 941,225A 726,733A
HTH 340,000B 114,OOOB
24. HTH760 - HEALTH STATUS MONITORING
38.50* 38.50*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING O zO. Cu Oo JO Oo O0/A1TJ
2,172,027A
2.00# 2.00#
nxn R Q n 0 3 OQ1
1,000,OOOB
5.00* 5.00*
HTH 627,294P 627,294P
25. HTH905 - DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL
2.50* 2.50*
OPERATING HTH 262,940A 262,940A
5.00* 5.00*
HTH 527,570N 527,570N
26. HTH907 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
180.00* 180.00*
11.00# [--------
3.00#
OPERATING XHT TX Hn rL oo noQ oncAi
30,499,285A
HTH B 2,000,OOOB
8.00* 8.00*
20.00# 20.00#
HTH 5,275,000N 5,275,000N
4.00# 4.00#
HB1800 GDI FIN-2
■ffllBlllllllil

Page 33 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HTH 684,932P 684,932P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS C I,000,OOOC
C 4,100,OOOC
27. HTH908 - OFFICE OF LANGUAGE ACCESS
6.00* 6.00*
OPERATING HTH 714,494A [—--- 714,494A]
655,563A
HB1800 GDI FIN-2
iiiniiMiniiiiii

Page 34 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
F. SOCIAL SERVICES
1. HMS301 - CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES
303.75* 303.75*
OPERATING HMS 50,570,717A [--50,570/717A]
58,070,717A
1.00* 1.00*
HMS 6,124,053B 6,124,053B
84.75* 84.75*
HMS 49,452,950N 49,452,950N
HMS 400,000P 400,OOOP

2. HMS302 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR CHILD CARE
38.92* 38.92*
OPERATING HMS 2,840,528A [ o o /I n ROOTvi
2,686,547A
38.08* 38.08*
HMS 14,137,770N [ T /I T *5-7 -T-ZnMl
16,300,OOON

3. HMS303 - CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES PAYMENTS
OPERATING HMS 48,265,586A 48,265,586A
HMS 31,542,000N 31,542,OOON

4. HMS305 - CASH SUPPORT FOR CHILD CARE
OPERATING HMS 57,811,811A 57,811,811A
HMS 69,565,754N 69,565,754N

5. HMS501 - IN-COMMUNITY YOUTH PROGRAMS
18.50* [--------18.50*]
19.50*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING HMS 10,764,943A [—lQ/800, 451A]
10,565,122A
0.50* 0.50*
0.50# 0.50#
HMS 2,050,000N [ 1_L K '.J3 41 1 *5 RM1'l J
f
2,100,OOON

6. HMS503 - HAWAII YOUTH CORRECTIONAL FACILITY (HYCF)
90.00* [________on on * 1
89.00*
OPERATING HMS 9,992,933A ['--- 9/ 993/ 933A]
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 34

Page 35 H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
9,934,637A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 3,720,000C C
C 3,500,OOOC

7. DEF112 - SERVICES TO VETERANS
28.00* 28.00*
OPERATING DEF 2,066,978A 2,066,978A
raPTTai nrr non nnnr r __________ U o J
2,220,OOOC
DEF 58,000,000P [—---------- W?]
8,580,POOP

8. HMS601 - ADULT PROTECTIVE AND COMMUNITY SERVICES
69.48* 69.48*
LJ L Lj IVti XXL* u I iL Io f a t f r v / O O - ^ ? * R ^7 J V/X J
6,703,114A
7.02* 7.02*
3.00# 3.00#
HMS 838,010N 838,OlON
HMS 10,000R 10,OOOR
HMS 387,560U 387,560U
HMS I,321,390P 1,321,390P

9. HMS202 - AGED, BLIND AND DISABLED PAYMENTS
OPERATING HMS 4,029,480A 4,029,480A

10. HMS204 - GENERAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS
OPERATING HMS 23,889,056A 23,889,056A
HMS 3,000,000B 3,000,OOOB

11. HMS206 - FEDERAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS
OPERATING HMS 8,345,024N 8,345,024N

12. HMS211 - CASH SUPPORT FOR FAMILIES - SELF-SUFFICIENCY
OPERATING HMS 26,715,965A 26,715,965A
HMS 44,000,000N 44,000,000N

13. HMS220 - RENTAL HOUSING SERVICES
5.00* 5.00*
OPERATING HMS 4,694,409A [— 4,694,409A]
4,566,201A
191.00* 191.00*
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 35
liniminiiiiiin

Page 36 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
4.50# 4.50#
onnw r 110 noo onnMi
112,100,OOON
17.00* 17.00*
HMS 5,134,715W 5,187,506W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED 68,000,000c C
C 1,300,OOOC

14 HMS229 - HAWAII PUBLIC HOUSING AUTHORITY ADMINISTRATION
2.00* 2.00*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING HMS 502,838A [----- 502,838A]
497,140A
HMS 27,864,996N [—27,840, 930N]
ON
119.00* 119.00*
47.00# 47.00#
HMS 17,416, 598W [--17,676, 361W]
45,517,291W

15 HMS222 - RENTAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES
1.00* [---------1.00*]
3.00*
OPERATING HMS 1,557,121A [---
3,757,302A
34.00* 34.00*
1.00# 1.00#
HMS 73, 368,975N (—
79,297,211N

16 HMS224 - HOMELESS SERVICES
11.00* 11.00*
OPERATING HMS 27,931,773A 27,931,773A
HMS 814,OOON 814,OOON

17 HMS605 - COMMUNITY-BASED RESIDENTIAL & MEDICAID FACILITY SUPPORT
OPERATING HMS 17,810,955A 17,810,955A

18 HMS401 - HEALTH CARE PAYMENTS
OPERATING HMS 1,031,4 66, 906A [1,031,466, 906A1
1,076,466,906A
HMS 230,000,000B 230,000,000B
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 36

Page 37 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HMS 2, 291,497,122N
2,367,804,099N
HMS 6,781,921U 6,781,921U
HMS 15,798,564P 15,798,564P

19. HMS236 - CASE MANAGEMENT FOR SELF-SUFFICIENCY
287.43* [______ 4-3-±.l
366.75*
OPERATING HMS 19,875,373A [—19, 673/ 479A]
23,259,280A
226.57* [-------226.57*]
147.25*
HMS 26,545,359N [ o c *5 n Q n c OM1
22,308,092N
HMS 30,237P 30,237P

20. HMS238 - DISABILITY DETERMINATION
50.00* 50.00*
OPERATING HMS 8,859,927N 8,859,927N

21. ATG500 - CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT SERVICES
69.70* 69.70*
0.34# 0.34#
OPERATING ATG 5,448,469A [---
5,308,960A
ATG 2,231,224T 2,231,224T
135.30* 135.30*
0.66# 0.66#
ATG 20,006,088P 20,006,088P

22. HMS237 - EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING
OPERATING HMS 469,505A (------469/ 505A]
456,672A
HMS 2,575,945N 2,575,945N

23. HHL602 - PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT FOR HAWAIIAN HOMESTEADS
OPERATING HHL 10,000,000A 10,000,000A
HHL 101,866, 373b [--------4, 824,709B]
10,824,709B
4.00* 4.00*
8.00# 8.00#
HHL 24,126,731N 24,126,731N
HB1800 GDI FIN-2
iniNgiiiiiiiiiiiHii

Page 38 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HHL 3,740,534T 3,740,534T
HHL 7,000,000W f L —3—CUiXkUXCtGW 1
30,000,OOOW
3.00# 3.00#
HHL 393,600P 442,800P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HHL 20,000,000C [----------- &€]
34,200,000C

24. HHL625 - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATING SUPPORT
200.00* 200.00*
OPERATING HHL 18,032,234A 18,032,234A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HHL C 100,OOOC

25. HTH904 - EXECUTIVE OFFICE ON AGING
17.60* 17.60*
3.35# 3.35#
OPERATING HTH 12,988,560A [- 13,024^068A]
12,641,880A
7.40* 7.40*
1.00# 1.00#
HTH 10,405,377N 10,405,377N
8.00# 8.00#
HTH 1,223,791P 1,223,791P

26. HTH520 - DISABILITY AND COMMUNICATIONS ACCESS BOARD
7.00* 7.00*
OPERATING HTH 724,846A [-----767, 346A]
744,846A
13.00* 13.00*
HTH 2,186,855B 2,186,855B
2.00* 2.00*
HTH 314,641U 314,641U

27. HMS902 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR HEALTH CARE PAYMENTS
137.00* 137.00*
4.50# 4.50#
OPERATING HMS 16,133,771A 16,133,771A]
45,693,548A
0.87* 0.87*
HMS 30,104,367B 30,104,3676
145.63* 145.63*
16.50# 16.50#
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 39 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
^-lJbW^msOMOOOVOk
l>
K
W^
m\04'000'0^-lJb
Wk!4trt\0^-000\
©^-)>>l>
U^i»
U\
OJ~'600'0^^>
—
HMS 96, 345,000N [--96/345/OOON]
154,000,POON
HMS l,200,000P l,200,000P
28. HMS903 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR SELF-SUFFICIENCY SERVICES
51.30* [-------
68.25*
OPERATING HMS 4 8, 609, 196A [- 48, 604/95OA]
56,652,481A
46.70* [--------46.70*]
29.75*
422 DOQN F oc; A10 ICC Ml
86,149,535N
HMS 19,560,000P 19,560,OOOP
29. HMS904 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS
151.59* [-------151.59*]
156.85*
8.00# 5.00#
OPERATING HMS 18,703,261A 14,292,045A
31.41* [------- 34r^44A]
26.15*
6.00# #
HMS 17,288,921N [---4-r^7&«7^A6«W]
4,414,455N
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HMS 10,000,000C C
30. HMS901 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR SOCIAL SERVICES
33.50* 33.50*
OPERATING HMS 4,287,230A [-
3,389,335A
9.50* 9.50*
HMS 3,246,986N 3,246,986N
31. HMS777 - OFFICE ON HOMELESSNESS AND HOUSING SOLUTIONS
8.00* 8.00*
OPERATTNC; HMR 1 OdOA T Cl 1 HA Aa 1
585,892A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HMS 24,400,000C [- 1-3-rW#) , OOOC]
18,000,000c
32. HMS555 - OFFICE OF WELLNESS AND RESILIENCE
HB1800 GDI FIN-2

l■llllllllllllllill

Page 40 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
’-I
r,
m
m
12.00* 12.00*
OPERATING HMS l, 346, 000A [---1,3'16,OOOA]
l,665,580A
HB1800 GDI FIN-2
■nHiiniiiiii

Page 41 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
G. FORMAL EDUCATION
1 . EDNIOO -■ SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING
12, 397.75* [----12,397.75*1
12,399.75*
680.25# 680.25#
OPERATING EDN 1,301,966, 939A
b^22^_982!_06^
EDN 5,251,693B 5,251,693B
EDN 167,203,642N 167,203,642N
EDN 13,390,000T 13,390,000T
EDN 7,495,605U 7,495,605U
9.00* 9.00*
EDN 3,239,686W 3,239,301W
1.00* 1.00*
EDN 21,4.14,657P 21,414,657P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL EDN 323,300,000C [—46>-5&e, OOOC]
490,075,OOOC
EDN X 5,280,000X
EDN P 120,000,000P

2 . EDN150 - SPECIAL EDUCATION AND STUDENT SUPPORT SERVICES
5, 348.50* [■
5,357.50*
1,228.25# 1,228.25#
OPERATING EDN 520,838,678A 525,281,027A
EDN 250,OOOB 250,0008
2.00* 2.00*
33.00# 33.00#
EDN 60,084,267N 61,584,267N
14.00* 14.00*
EDN 11,000,OOOW 11,000,OOOW
EDN 5,950,OOOP 5,950,OOOP

3. EDN200 - INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT
457.00* [■-------457.00*1
460.00*
48.00# 48.00#
OPERATING EDN 92,999, 004A [•—93,374,921A1
87,507,229A
2.00# 2.00#
EDN 500,OOON 500,OOON
1.00# 1.00#
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 41

Page 42 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
EDN 273,794P 273,794P

4. EDN300 - STATE ADMINISTRATION
422.00* 424.00*
7.00# 7.00#
OPERATING EDN /IQ “7 rL A-? n/JOTLi
*"1 u f f 1
46,769,024A
EDN 119 1X /T1 HM rL IIO 1 A Omi
ON
EDN 3,807,440P 3,807,440P

5. EDN400 - SCHOOL SUPPORT
ft d Q A A * r __________Qw AJ Q t; AU * 1J
J •
875.50*
5.00# 5.00#
OPERATING EDN 380,299, 069A [- 378,937,360A]
379,003,OOOA
11.00* 11.00*
EDN A A 9 n A Q9 AT^ F A A 9nn ooniii
49,400,920B
718.50* 718.50*
98.50# 98.50#
EDN 74,600,OOON 74,600,OOON
EDN 150,000R 150,OOOR
4.00* 4.00*
2.00# 2.00#
EDN 11 Q 9 *7 M F- 11 c O'? nooMi
19,097,927W
EDN 1,000,OOOP 1,000,OOOP

6. EDN450 - SCHOOL FACILITIES AUTHORITY
12.00* 12.00*
OPERATING EDN 1,731,283A [----1,-7118-,-97^]
1,728,393A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL EDN 55,000,000C [-------------------------------&€]
20,200,000C

7. EDN500 - SCHOOL COMMUNITY SERVICES
42.00* 42.00*
6.00# 6.00#
OPERATING EDN 9Q^^ 9A1 n r. . 99R - 99SA1
7,000,235A
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 42
iiimiiiiiiiiiiio

Page 43 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027
EDN 1,633,9088 1,633,9088
2.00# 2.00#
EDN 3,266,757N 3,266,757N
EDN 23,224,665W 23,224,665W
EDN 300,000P 300,000P

8. EDN600 - CHARTER SCHOOLS
nPPRATTMfZ PnM 1AQ “7QP f 1^:0 c-? o q-j-zai
168,031,444A
EDN 5,042,000N 5,042,000N

9. EDN612 - CHARTER SCHOOLS COMMISSION AND ADMINISTRATION
81.12* 81.12*
OPERATING EDN 12,554,269A 12,564,269A
6.88* 6.88*
EDN l,800,000N l,800,000N

10. EDN700 - EARLY LEARNING
281.00* [------ 331.00*]
334.00*
OPERATING EDN 21,305,769A 24,749,084A
EDN 3,000,0008 3,000,0008
1.00# 1.00#
EDN 125,628N 125,628N
2.00# 2.00#
EDN 380,000P 380,000P

11. BUF745 - RETIREMENT BENEFITS - DOE
OPERATING BUF 552,407,076A 572,505,610A

12. BUF765 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENTS - DOE
OPERATING BUF 187,755,868A [ 191,510,985A]
188,272,280A

13. BUF725 - DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS - DOE
OPERATING BUF
387,479,829A 454,785,788A

14. AGS807 - SCHOOL R&M, NEIGHBOR ISLAND DISTRICTS
81.00* 81.00*
OPERATING AGS 6, 973, 068A [---
6,641,396A
HB1800 GDI FIN-2

■IIIIMHIlill

Page 44 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
10.00* 10.00*
AGS 2,346,640U 2,346,640U

15. EDN407 - PUBLIC LIBRARIES
566.50* 567.50*
OPERATING EDN 47,850,582A [—
48,087,165A
EDN 4,000,000B 4,000,000B
EDN 2,000,00ON [---2/000,BOON]
1,539,292N
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 27,000, 000C [—25,000/000C]
38,000,OOOC

16. DEF114 - HAWAII NATIONAL GUARD YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY
24.50# [•------- 2-4.50#]
13.50#
OPERATING DEF 3,885, 050A [•---
3,285,050A
73.50# [■--------73.50#]
40.50#
DEF 6, 482,477P [■--- 6/ 482/ 477P]
4,682,477P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL DEF 8,000,OOOC C

17. UOHIOO ■- UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, MANOA
2,969.64* 2,969.64*
42.25# 42.25#
OPERATING UOH 289, 634,091A [• 290,618/531A]
288,627,384A
368.25* 368.25*
2.00# 2.00#
UOH 361,552,962B 361,552,962B
75.06* 75.06*
UOH 6,873,565N 6,873,565N
28.00* 28.00*
UOH 65,569,059W 65,569,059W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH 59,750,OOOC [■—28/500,OOOC]
45,500,OOOC
UOH 30,750,OOOE 28,500,OOOE

18. UOHllO - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, JOHN A. BURNS SCHOOL OF MEDICINE
209.03* 209.03*
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 44

Page 45 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
3.50# 3.50#
OPERATING UOH 27,613, 321A [■ 20L- 7 I f O •OjOA.IX l7iLJ1
27,492,997A
UOH 28,917,688B 28,917,688B
UOH 8,010,453W 8,010,453W

19. UOH210 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, HILO
534.25* 534.25*
7.00# 7.00#
OPERATING UOH 50, 610, 150A [■ • R J n U f 00-7 CCnTLi
50,426,237A
25.00* 25.00*
UOH 44,435,015B 44,435,015B
UOH 443,962N 443,962N
2.00* 2.00*
UOH 7,489,592W 7,489,592W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH 15,000,000C [■____________QCl
9,500,OOOC

20. UOH220 - SMALL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT
11.00# 11.00#
OPERATING UOH 978,941A 978,941A

21. UOH700 ■- UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, WEST OAHU
246• 0 W I
249.50*
1 .50# 1.50#
OPERATING UOH 23,838, RHZlB r .m ^. ?77A1
24,180,144A
UOH 22,028, 269B 22,028,269B
UOH 802, 037N 802,037N
UOH 2,097, 704W 2,097,704W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH 6,500, OOOC [------------©G]
3,000,000C

22. UOH800 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, COMMUNITY COLLEGES
1,825.50* 1,825.50*
46.00# 46.00#
OPERATING UOH 192,200,937A r . 7 no onn oootvi
191,206,383A
r -7 c r c n o
UOH 75,650,296B
79,819,624B
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 45

Page 46 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
0.50* 0.50*
UOH 4,428,296N 4,428,296N
34.00* 34.00*
UOH 31,826,332W 31,826,332W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH B 20,000,OOOB
UOH 45,000,OOOC [- -10, Q&eyOOOC]
35,000,OOOC

23 UOH900 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, SYSTEMWIDE SUPPORT
424.00* 411.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING UOH 65,093,776A [- 65,093,776A]
64,835,384A
14.00* 14.00*
UOH 24,242,602B 24,242,602B
4.00* 4.00*
4.00# 4.00#
UOH l,094,875N 1,094,875N
2.00* 15.00*
UOH 18,501,700W 18,501,700W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH 50,504,000C [-------- 4,OOOC]
65,004,OOOC

24 BUF748 - RETIREMENT BENEFITS - UH
OPERATING BUF 219,919,128A 224,317,511A

25 BUF768 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENTS - UH
OPERATING BUF 68,661,870A [- 70, Q-3-&, 107A]
69,542,355A

26 BUF728 - DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS - UH
OPERATING BUF [165,254,696A -] [3.-93-,-T81,87 6A]
143,405,765A 168,315,610A

27 UOH115 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, CANCER CENTER
37.00* 37.00*
OPERATING UOH 3,797,693A 3,797,693A


HB1800 GDI FIN-2
■iinMiiiiiiin

Page 47 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
H. CULTURE AND RECREATION
1 UOH881 - AQUARIA
9.00* 9.00*
OPERATING UOH 919,917A 919,917A
7.00* 7.00*
UOH 3,517,717B 3,517,717B
UOH 996,530W 996,530W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH l,702,000C [- J
7,000,OOOC

2 . AGS881 - STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS
1.50* 17.75*
OPERATING AGS 10,435,556A t- 14,432,957A]
14,373,679A
AGS 3,335,150B r L Q Q Q R f T X O C w n o 1 J
5,635,150B
* 4.25*
AGS 523,074N 992,771N
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 8,500,OOOC C

3. LNR802 - HISTORIC PRESERVATION
45.00* 45.00*
OPERATING LNR 4,520,402A [-—4/ 530, 402A]
4,300,099A
3.00* 3.00*
LNR 923,397B 923,397B
6.00* 6.00*
LNR 751,525N 751,525N

4 . LNR804 •- FOREST AND OUTDOOR RECREATION
37.50* (--------37.50*]
38.50*
OPERATING LNR 4,812,230A /I OTO OOnA 1
4,844,795A
3.00* 3.00*
LNR 917,145B [- ---- 917/145B]
1,917,145B
19.00* 19.00*
# 3,^00#
LNR 5,396,897N r
L
6,385,749N
3.00* 3.00*
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 48 H.B. NO. ^^2°,
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
LNR 913,329W 913,329W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL C 5,300, OOOC

LNR806 - PARKS ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION
155.00* [■
182.00*
OPERATING LNR 12,886,065A IO OO^:
12,571,775A
LNR 31,094,5368 [■
42,144,5368
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR B l,000,000B
LNR 8,400,OOOC [■
14,650,OOOC
LNR 750,OOON r L ._______ 2.5X1—MAUI
750,OOON
I^ P 1,POOP

LNR801 - OCEAN-BASED RECREATION
7.00* 7.00*
OPERATING LNR 478,396A [•_______ 4 *7 Q O Q g A 1
463,292A
124.00* 124.00*
LNR 42,965,486B [■ /I o n a R /I o
50,265,4868
LNR 1,500,OOON 1,500,OOON
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 28,650,OOOC [■------------©G]
11,600,OOOC

BEDI80 - SPECTATOR EVENTS & SHOWS -ALOHA STADIUM
18.00* [■--------1-8-.00*]
16.00*
1.00# [■____________:i_ nn# 1
0.00#
OPERATING BED 8,772,3568 [•
8,597,132B


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 48

Page 49 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO, ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
I. PUBLIC SAFETY
1. PSD402 - HALAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
410.00* 410.00*
OPERATING PSD 39,211,885A 39,211,885A

2 . PSD403 - KULANI CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
83.00* 83.00*
OPERATING PSD 7,099,249A 7,099,249A

3. PSD404 - WAIAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
112.00* 112.00*
OPERATING PSD 9,032,631A 9,032,631A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS C 4,000,000C

4 . PSD405 - HAWAII COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
193.00* 193.00*
OPERATING PSD 15,855,815A 15,855,815A

5. PSD406 - MAUI COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
205.00* 205.00*
OPERATING PSD 16,652,787A 16,652,787A

6. PSD407 - OAHU COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
500.00* 500.00*
OPERATING PSD 43,886,972A 43,160,178A

7 . PSD408 - KAUAI COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
74.00* 74.00*
OPERATING PSD 6,628,031A 6,628,031A

8. PSD409 - WOMEN'S COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
269.00* 269.00*
OPERATING PSD 20,991,799A 20,991,799A

9. PSD410 - INTAKE SERVICE CENTERS
73.00* 73.00*
OPERATING PSD 5,891,809A 5,891,809A

10 PSD420 - CORRECTIONS PROGRAM SERVICES
185.00* 185.00*
OPERATING PSD 26,143,271A 26,143,271A
PSD l,045,989N l,045,989N
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 49

Page 50 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

11. PSD421 - HEALTH CARE
264.60* [-------264.60*]
299.60*
OPERATING PSD 38,877,361A [-
41,510,714A

12. PSD422 - HAWAII CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
2.00* 2.00*
42.00# 42.00#
OPERATING PSD 10,884,725W 10,884,725W

13. PSD808 - NON-STATE FACILITIES
9.00* 9.00*
OPERATING PSD 42,589,908A [- 42,589,908A]
40,079,966A

14. LAWS02 - NARCOTICS ENFORCEMENT DIVISION
14.00* 14.00*
OPERATING LAW 1,713,945A [-—1,713, 945A]
1,706,445A
8.00* 8.00*
LAW 1,004,853W [-
1,134,333W
LAW 800,OOOP 800,OOOP

15. LAW503 - SHERIFF
318.00* 318.00*
OPERATING LAW 28,441,127A [-
28,578,526A
LAW 600,000N 600,OOON
150.00* 150.00*
LAW 19,616,116U 19,616,116U
LAW 600,OOOP 600,OOOP

16. LAW504 - CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION DIVISION
16.00* 16.00*
6.00# 6.00#
OPERATING LAW 3,613,508A [-—3-r4 62, 585Al
3,452,294A
2.00* 2.00*
5.00# 5.00#
HB1800 GDI FIN-2

Page 51 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
LAW 731,972U 731,972U

17. LAW505 - LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING DIVISION
8.00* 8.00*
Ut 1 J. JuriW [
2,617,007A

18. LAW900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
72.00* [--------
75.00*
LJh'Ej JL IN L3 JjrtVV L 1 fi OR? . 744M
18,381,942A
LAW 5,000,000U 5,000,OOOU
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LAW 3,000,000C [------------9G]
2,000,000C

19. LAW901 - OFFICE OF HOMELAND SECURITY
14.00* 14.00*
8.50# 8.50#
t hl HA i J. Nxj JjAW Z/ODZ/UOXM [
2,351,740A
LAW 3,724,886N 4,551,095N
LAW 9,405,469P 9,550,715P

20. PSD611 - ADULT PAROLE DETERMINATIONS
7.00* 7.00*
OPERATING PSD 569,373A 569,373A

21. PSD612 - ADULT PAROLE SUPERVISION AND COUNSELING
61.00* 61.00*
OPERATING PSD 5,211,808A 5,211,808A

22. PSD613 - CRIME VICTIM COMPENSATION COMMISSION
13.00* 13.00*
UPhjHAi ING PoU J-X-f 0-3Ori L 1 2 . f 2 lO . R •J / QC '.JJ OOTZLl Jl
l,101,770A
PSD l,186,017B 1,186,0178
1.00# 1.00#
PSD 859,315P 859,315P

23. PSD900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
149.00* 149.00*
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 51
■miHMIlM

Page 52 H.B. NO.
T
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING PSD 25,287,667A r oc 00-7
24,625,997A
4.00* 4.00*
PSD 1,331,967B r 1 -3 *51 oct-iQi
1,667,984B
PSD 75,065T 75,065T
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 64,750,000C [--
42,000,OOOC
PSD 10 non ODDc [--- --------oe]
3,000,OOOC

24. ATG231 - STATE CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION AND IDENTIFICATION
23.50* 23.50*
OPERATING ATG 2,614,592A r Q /I m onftTLi
2,447,162A
24.50* 24.50*
ATG 4,370,515W 4,370,515W
ATG l,204,841P r 1 on/i 0/11 m
1,550,POOP

25. LNR810 - PREVENTION OF NATURAL DISASTERS
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING LNR 110,000A r_____ Tin nnoM
107,298A
8.00* 8.00*
LNR 7,660,556B r *7 dzn c c m i
8,057,827B
LNR 10,522,413P 1,160,621P

26. DEFllO - AMELIORATION OF PHYSICAL DISASTERS
100.25* [■-----------------
101.25*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING DEF 10, 455, 364A [■—10/256,912A]
9,889,712A
21.75* [■--------21.75*]
20.75*
1.50# [■-------- 3^r^^]
1.00#
DEF l,430,238P [--- 1, 430/238P]
1,402,992P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL DEF 725,OOOC C
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 52

Page 53 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

27. DEF116 - HAWAII ARMY AND AIR NATIONAL GUARD
19.75* 19.75*
OPERATING DEF 7,081,247A [ 7 DPI 947A1
6,887,051A
99.25* 99.25*
20.00# [-------
24.00#
DEF 40,051,745P [__4-CV—XUQ—
40,548,677P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL DEF l,173,000C [------------6G]
7,400,000C
DEF 3,223,000P [------------
16,600,OOOP

28. DEF118 - HAWAII EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY
26.00* [
30.00*
90.00# 90.00#
OPERATING DEF 14,097,375A [ 1/1 nm O'? c A 1
17,798,837A
DEF 500,000B [_________c. n n. n n n P l
5,618,OOOB
DEF 4,156,958N 4,156,958N
2.00# 2.00#
DEF 500,000W 500,OOOW
25.00# 25.00#
DEF 22,497,034P 22,497,034P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 6,500,000C [ Ann. nnnn
10,400,OOOC
cnn
AGS l,500,000P [ UUUi* J
7,250,OOOP

28A. LAW822 - OFFICE OF THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL
OPERATING LAW A 118,000A
I^ B 718,600B


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 53
■iiHiiiiini

Page 54 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
J. INDIVIDUAL RIGHTS
1. CCA102 - CABLE TELEVISION
6.00* 6.00*
OPERATING CCA 2,511,181B [---2,507,752B]
2,538,917B

2. CCA103 - CONSUMER ADVOCATE FOR COMMUNICATION, UTILITIES, AND
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES
25.00* 25.00*
OPERATING CCA 4,944,320B 4,944,320B

3. CCA104 - FINANCIAL SERVICES REGULATION
43.00* 43.00*
OPERATING CCA 6,417,109B 6,417,109B
CCA 301,OOOT 301,OOOT

4 . CCA105 - PROFESSIONAL AND VOCATIONAL LICENSING
72.00* 72.00*
11.00# 11.00#
OPERATING CCA 9,909,730B 9,909,730B
8.00* 8.00*
4.00# 4.00#
CCA 2,880,256T 2,880,256T

5. CCA106 - INSURANCE REGULATORY SERVICES
95.00* 95.00*
OPERATING CCA 2*^ 7ftdR r on *7OZ1D1
23,162,851B
CCA 201,OOOT 201,OOOT

6. CCA107 - POST-SECONDARY EDUCATION AUTHORIZATION
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING CCA 249,052B 249,052B

7 . CCA901 - PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
69.00* 69.00*
OPERATING CCA 19,725,310B [--4:9, 7-77,291B]
21,523,677B

8. CCAllO - OFFICE OF CONSUMER PROTECTION
20.00* 20.00*
1.00# 1.00#
HB1800 GDI FIN-2

■■iiiiiiiiim

Page 55 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M -FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
—
l4t
W.kJ«UsC^-000'0‘
-l
M
W.»*»U\04-'eOOsO
‘-i>b>Uk*»U>04'e
O
O'0^-tJt
W^tft\04>'000'
Oi-)
M
OPERATING CCA 3,833,679B [--- 3,833,679B]
3,901,029B
CCA 100,681T 100,681T
9. AGR812 - MEASUREMENT STANDARDS
10.00* 10.00*
OPERATING AGR 746,480A [________7 z g >1 Qfl A 1
731,004A
CCAlll - BUSINESS REGISTRATION AND SECURITIES REGULATION
77.00* 77.00*
OPERATING rcA /IRQ QTOn rL___ 1_Q__/IT')__Q n CP i
J. f -X f
10,632,895B
CCA112 - REGULATED INDUSTRIES COMPLAINTS OFFICE
66.00* 66.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING nn A 8,930,940B [ Q o *5 n n 4 no i
9,130,940B
CCA191 - GENERAL SUPPORT
54.00* 54.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING CCA 24,860,659B [■—12,858,290B]
13,288,609B
AGS105 - ENFORCEMENT OF INFORMATION PRACTICES
10.50* 10.50*
OPERATING AGS l, 258,905A [■---1-, -2-58, 905A]
1,227,433A
BUF151 - OFFICE OF THE PUBLIC DEFENDER
133.50* [■ JL O .D • V? J
134.50*
OPERATING BUF 15,137,691A [•—3-5.,-3-X3.,-4-a4_a.'l
15,262,695A
LNRlll - CONVEYANCES AND RECORDINGS
56.00* 56.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING LNR 7,731,946B 7,731,946B
HB1800 CDl FIN-2
ll■ll■■l■N

Page 56 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
—t
»K
W
nt
\O
4-
16. HMS888 - COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF WOMEN
1.00* 1.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING HMS 184,462A [-- ---184-r463A]
179,433A
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 57
H.B. NO. H^j
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
K. GOVERNMENT-WIDE SUPPORT
1. GOVlOO - OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
24 . 00* 24.00*
23 .00# 23.00#
OPERATING GOV 4,551, 872A [— 4,551,872A]
4,932,807A

2. LTGIOO - OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
17 .00* 17.00*
OPERATING LTG 2,251, r Q Q m d: q aj
2,192,535A
LTG 312, OOOB 312,OOOB

3. BED144 - STATEWIDE PLANNING AND COORDINATION
30.00* [------- 30.00*1
31.00*
8.00# [------- ^.-00# 1
8.00#
OPERATING BED 4,580, 161A [--- 4,280, 161A]
4,342,653A
B^ B 3, 150, OOOB
5.00# 5.00#
BED 2,041,871N 2,041,871N
BED 2,000,000W 2,000,000W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED 7,500, 000C [-------------©€]
7,000,OOOC

4 . BED130 - ECONOMIC PLANNING AND RESEARCH
18.46* 18.46*
5.00# 5.00#
OPERATING BED 5,744,533A 5,744,533A
8.04* 8.04*
BED 864,351P 864,351P

5. BUFIOI - DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND BUDGET DIVISION
53 .00* 58.00*
OPERATING BUF 14,051, 217A [--13,504,737A1
13,483,353A
BUF 427,305, OOOB I• 427,305,OOOB]
427,805,OOOB

5A. BUF102 - COLLECTIVE BARGAINING STATEWIDE
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 57

Page 58 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING BUF A 1,820,168A
B’J?' B 320,844B

6. BUF103 - VACATION PAYOUT - STATEWIDE
OPERATING BUF 9,700,OOOA 9,700,OOOA

7. AGS87I - CTU^PAIGN SPENDING COMMISSION
7.00* 7.00*
OPERATING AGS 2,757,314A [---
1,oil,861A
AGS 1,043,732T 1,043,732T

8. AGS879 - OFFICE OF ELECTIONS
16.50* 16.50*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING AGS 6,452,228A [-—2,595,761A]
2,533,992A
0.50* 0.50*
1,00# 1.00#
AGS 99,694N 99,694N

9. TAXI0 0 - COMPLIANCE
149.00* [-------149.00*]
150.00*
OPERATING TAX 10,613,723A [-■ l-O, 668,773A]
10,431,202A

10. TAX103 - TAX COLLECTION SERVICES OFFICE
43.00* 43.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING TAX 3,427,288A [-—3-,-42-7,288A]
3,345,031A

11. TAX105 - TAX SERVICES AND PROCESSING
129.00* [------ 1^-9-rW-*]
128.00*
OPERATING TAX 7,116,185A [-—7,116,185A]
6,857,637A

12. TAX107 - SUPPORTING SERVICES - REVENUE COLLECTION
86.00* [------- 87.00*]
88.00*
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 58

Page 59 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
7.00# 7.00#
OPERATING TAX [ in CQ/ i1 Qcn-IA X Xi J
J. J f J ..y f
18,253,269A 19,515,829A
15.00# 15.00#
TAX 3,629,626B 3,629,626B

13. AGSIOI - ACCOUNTING SYSTEM DEVELOPMENT AND MAINTENANCE
22.00* 22.00*
OPERATING —ft—4-X4—1
8,342,402A

14. AGS102 - EXPENDITURE EXAMINATION
18.00* 18.00*
OPERATING X iLd f •0 LJ X i L
1,588,444A

15. AGS103 - RECORDING AND REPORTING
13.00* 13.00*
OPERATING xxLj>_> X^.3oD^Ox^xi [ 1 -? O - ' J f 1X CG .qD XA X IJ
1,352,603A

16. AGS104 - INTERNAL POST AUDIT
7.00* 7.00*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING AGS l,023,968A [--- 1,025,751A]
1,000,308A

17. BUF115 - FINANCIAL ADMINISTRATION
18.00* 18.00*
OPERATING RTIP 9 r n QC"7 ^:qi A-i
2,828,495A
9.00* 9.00*
BUF 15,957,630T 15,957,630T

18. BUF721 - DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS - STATE
OPERATING ijuL Lwo, J L ^nR.9Q4 4n7A'’
ii.jfUj.-jii
599,970,528A 527,341,242A

19. ATGIOO - LEGAL SERVICES
321.74* [-------321.74*1
324.74*
18.67# 18.67#
HB1800 GDI FIN-2

Page 60 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING ATG 47,212,444A [-
49,178,088A
32.90* [--------3 2-.-9^]
37.50*
1.00# [---------1.00#]
3.00#
ATG 6,484,008B [---
10,189,453B
5.23# 5.23#
ATG 11,641,670N 11,641,670N
1.00* 1.00*
ATG 4,065,177T 4,065,177T
111.60* 111.60*
17.10# 17.10#
ATG 21,765,7190 21,765,7190
5.60* [---------5. AO--]
OGCl
2.00# [---------2-. 00#]
0.00#
ATG 3,539,882W [-—37-5-^^7-8^244]
OW
21 .44* 21,44*
0.50# 0.50#
ATG 4,890,531P 5,005,104P

20. AGS131 - ENTERPRISE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES
138.00* [-------138.00*]
ne^^oo
OPERATING AGS 50,736,206A [- 51,638,803A]
47,278,473A
12.00* [--------12.00*]
13.00*
1.00# [--------1.00#]
0.00#
AGS 2,578,244B 2,578,244B
33.00* 33.00*
AGS 6,315,2950 6,315,2950
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 4,000,OOOC 2,000,OOOC

21. AGSlll - ARCHIVES - RECORDS MANAGEMENT
19.00* [--------19.00*]
20.00*
HB1800 GDI FIN-2


Page 61 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING AGS 4,383,125A r L C /ICQ 1 /I Ga 1
6,740,689A
3.00* 3.00*
AGS 521,304B 521,304B
2.00# 2.00#

22. AGS891 - ENHANCED 911 BOARD
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING AGS 14,035,349B 14,035,349B

23. HRD102 - WORKFORCE ATTRACTION, SELECTION, CLASSIFICATION, AND
EFFECTIVENESS
89.00* 89.00*
OPERATING HRD 28,276,844A [—27,649,620A]
27,399,629A
HRD 700,000B 700,000B
2.00* 2.00*
HRD 5,178,1610 5,178,1610

24. HRD191 - SOPPORTING SERVICES - HOMAN RESOORCES DEVELOPMENT
12.00* 12.00*
OPERATING HRD 2,897,063A 2,750,816A

25. BOF141 - EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM
117.00* [------ 117.00*]
118.00*
OPERATING BOF 30,773,357X [—25,727, 960X]
29,378,766X

26. BOF143 - HAWAII EMPLOYER ONION TROST FOND

64.00*
OPERATING ROE 11 2Q7T r 1
11,476,614T

27. AGS234 - CENTRAL SERVICES - CEMETERY MANAGEMENT OFFICE
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING AGS l,088,500A l,167,000A

28. BOF741 - RETIREMENT BENEFITS - STATE
OPERATING BOF 512,718,644A 522,870,219A
HB1800 GDI FIN-2


Page 62 H.B. NO.
T
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
BUF 4,000,OOOU 4,000,OOOU

29 BUF761 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENTS - STATE
OPERATING BUF 158,214,808A [ 161,379,104A]
]^62^_122i_65^

30 BUF762 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENT FOR ANNUAL REQUIRED CONTRIBUTION
(ARC).
OPERATING BUF 838,506,OOOA 846,891,OOOA

31 LNRIOI - PUBLIC LANDS MANAGEMENT
2.00*
1,00# 1.00#
OPERATING LNR [---- 177,872A-] [---- 177,872A]
42^JJ2_;_872A 87,307,095A
63.00* 63.00*
LNR 24,483,607B [—22, 983,I
3_9^_£82!_6O7B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 3,200,000B B
LNR [—3,355,000C ] [----------- &G]
2,655,OOOC 14,270,OOOC

32 AGS203 - STATE RISK MANAGEMENT AND INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION
OPERATING AGS 26,987,995A 26,987,995A
5.00* 5.00*
AGS 25,701,949W 25,706,793W

33 AGS211 - LAND SURVEY
10.00* 10.00*
OPERATING AGS 913,342A [------9-14,121A]
886,757A
AGS 285,OOOU 285,OOOU

34 AGS223 - OFFICE LEASING
8.00* 8.00*
OPERATING AGS 7,177,674A [--- 7, 178,040A]
■/,CJj^j2y3
AGS 5,500,OOOU 5,500,OOOU

35 LNR102 - LEGACY LAND CONSERVATION PROGRTVM
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING LNR 9,034,784B 9,034,784B
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 62

Page 63 H.B. NO.
T
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

36. AGS221 -• PUBLIC WORKS - PLANNING, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION
91.00* t--------9i-r-Wt]
90.00*
OPERATING AGS 8,105,782A [----8,112,911A]
7,873,332A
AGS 4,000,000W 4,000,000W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 24,004,000C [-------- 4-,-freOC]
20,004,OOOC

37. AGS231 - CENTRAL SERVICES - CUSTODIAL SERVICES
125.00* [------ 126.00*]
127.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING AGS 25,792,541A [ &^--8-4 4,638A]
26,471,842A
AGS l,699,084U l,699,084U

38. AGS232 - CENTRAL SERVICES - GROUNDS MAINTENANCE
32.00* 32.00*
OPERATING AGS 2,669, 822A [--- 2,669, 822A]
2,581,769A

39. AGS233 - CENTRAL SERVICES - BUILDING REPAIRS AND ALTERATIONS
33.00* 33.00*
OPERATING AGS 3, 692,561A [---
3,849,658A

39A. AGS892 - STATE BUILDING CODE COUNCIL
2.00*
OPERATING A^ A 32^^^^

40. AGS240 - STATE PROCUREMENT
25.00* 25.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING AGS 2,203,297A (--- 2,205, 274A]
2,147,437A

41. AGS244 - SURPLUS PROPERTY MANAGEMENT
5.00* 5.00*
OPERATING AGS 2,006,599W 2,006,803W

HB1800 GDI FIN-2


Page 64
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
42. AGS251 - AUTOMOTIVE MANAGEMENT - MOTOR POOL
13.00* 13.00*
OPERATING AGS 3,541,577W [- Q c;-3Q nc;/,rdi
4,839,054W

43. AGS252 - AUTOMOTIVE MANAGEMENT - PARKING CONTROL
27.00* 27.00*
OPERATING AGS 4,563,614W [-—4,561,089W]
5,061,089W

44. AGS901 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
sd no* r ______ c./ on * 1
55.00*
2.00# 2.00#
DkJ PL P1—1 RL KAiiT X TXN rK;J *»kJ kJ c, qnc. Q77A4* rL dc; / Qn/i if
5,753,828A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 35,000,000C C

45. SUB201 - CITY AND COUNTY OF HONOLULU
INVESTMENT CAPITAL CCH 2,000,000C [------------0€]
1,400,OOOC
r K.. c K-. H 11 f ^ t ^ L n /W on K /^ n kJ n aJ c i d f k t J r Ui J
1,400,OOPS

46. SUB301 - COUNTY OF HAWAII
TMxzpftTMrMT CAPTTAT. mH ft ftfin onor f ___________aoi
5,000,OOOC
COH 3,500,000S [------------OS]
5,000,OOOS
COH X 5,000,OOOX

46A. SUB401 - COUNTY OF MAUI
INVESTMENT CAPITAL COM C 10,500,OOOC
COM S 10,500,OOOS

47. SUB501 - COUNTY OF KAUAI
INVESTMENT CAPITAL COK 13,000,000C C
COK 13,000,000S S"




HB1800 GDI FIN-2 64

Page 65 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
SECTION 5. Part III of Act 250, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2025, is amended as follows:
1. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 11.1, Provided that out of the general fund
appropriation for collective bargaining - statewide (BUF102),
the sum of $1,820,168 or so much thereof as may be necessary for
fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for salary adjustments
as recommended by the commission on salaries; provided that the
governor may transfer funds between departments and programs to
implement any salary adjustments as recommended by the
commission on salaries."
2. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 11.2. Provided that out of the special fund
appropriation for collective bargaining - statewide (BUF102),
the sum of $320,844 or so much thereof as may be necessary for
fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for salary adjustments
as recommended by the commission on salaries; provided that the
governor may transfer funds between departments and programs to
implement any salary adjustments as recommended by the
commission on salaries."
3. By adding a new section to read:
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 65
llll■IWIII■llll

Page 66 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
’’SECI2P^L 12:J:P£2Zi^i®^that of the 3eneral^^ur^
appropriation for public lands management (LNRIOI), the sum of
$42^000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
year 2025-2026 and the sum of $87,000,000 or so much thereof as
may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be deposited
into the special land and development fund established under
section 171-19, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to fund green fee
projects; provided that the amounts deposited shall not exceed
the total amount of green fee revenues collected and realized by
the general fund during the fiscal year after making the
distributions prescribed in section 237D-6.5(b), Hawaii Revised
Statutes. The appropriations relating to the deposits into the
special land and development fund under this provision shall not
lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriations
were made. All unexpended and unencumbered balances of the
appropriations made relating to this section as of the close of
business on June 30, 2028, shall lapse to the general fund.
4. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 11.4 Provided that of the general fund
appropriation for Hawaii green infrastructure authority
(BED138), the sum of $10,000,000 or so much thereof as may be
HB1800 CDl FIN-2


Page 67 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be deposited into the
clean energy and efficiency revolving loan fund pursuant to
section 196-65.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes."
5. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 11.5 Provided that of the general fund
appropriation for agribusiness development and research
(BED170), the sum of $10,000,000 or so much thereof as may be
necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be deposited into the
Hawaii agricultural development revolving fund pursuant to
section 163D-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes."
SECTION 6. Part IV of Act 250, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025,
is amended as follows:
1. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 13.1 SUPPLEMENTAL APPROPRIATIONS. The legislature
finds that the grant recipients named in this part have applied
for a grant pursuant to section 42F-102, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, and qualify to receive a grant pursuant to section
42F-103, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the
State of Hawaii the sum of $20,000,000 or so much there-of as
may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to the office of
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 67
IlillHIIIIIIIIIII

Page 68 H.B. NO.
T,
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
community services (LBR903) in the sums indicated for the
purpose of providing grants to the corresponding recipient.
The supplemental appropriations shall be disbursed by a
contract between the office of community services and the grant
recipient pursuant to sections 42F-104, 42F-105/ and 42F-106,
Hawaii Revised Statutes. Further, the legislature finds and
declares that the grants are in the public interest and for the
public health, safety, and general welfare of the State.
1. $200,000.00 808 CLEANUPS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR 808 CLEANUPS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
CONSERVATION AND COMMUNITY SERVICES
WITH HAWAIIAN CULTURAL AND YOUTH
LEARNING COMPONENTS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

2. $300,000.00 ADULT FRIENDS FOR YOUTH
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR ADULT FRIENDS FOR YOUTH, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO F7VMILY STABILITY, COMMUNITY
SAFETY, AND PERSONAL GROWTH FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

3. $100,000.00 AFTER-SCHOOL ALL-STARS HAWAII
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR AFTER-SCHOOL ALL-STARS HAWAII, FOR
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 69 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
COSTS RELATED TO THE EXPANSION OF STEM
PROGR7VMMING FOR JUNIOR HIGH STUDENTS
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

4. $200,000.00 THE ALCOHOLIC REHABILITATION SERVICES
OF HAWAII, INC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE ALCOHOLIC REHABILITATION
SERVICES OF HAWAII, INC, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO INTEGRATING TRAUMA-INFORMED
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AND CARE COORDINATION
SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH COMPLEX
SUBSTANCE USE AND MENTAL HEALTH
CONDITIONS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR9Q3) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

5. $200,000.00 ALII HEALTH CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR ALII HEALTH CENTER, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO REPLACING AGING X-RAY SYSTEM
ANp_ADp_A_M225RN_ZZ£TURE_ARCHiyiNG_Ara
COMMUNICATION SYSTEM FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF^TJNDS2_ATO

6. $100,000.00 ALOHA HARVEST
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR ALOHA HARVEST, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
BRINGING FOOD OPERATIONS TO SCALE FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

7. $250,000.00 ALOHA HOUSE, INC
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 69

Page 70 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR ALOHA HOUSE, INC, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO LONG-TERM MANAGEMENT OF POST DRUG
DETOX COMPLICATIONS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

8. $300,000.00 ALOHACARE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR ALOHACARE, FOR COSTS RELATED TO THE
CONTINUED SUPPORT OF INDIVIDUAL
WELLNESS AND PROMOTION OF QUALITY CARE
IN THE COMMUNITY FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

9. $85,000.00 BEST BUDDIES HAWAII, LLC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR BEST BUDDIES HAWAII, LLC, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO STUDENT OPPORTUNITIES FOR
FRIENDSHIP AND LEADERSHIP DEVELOPMENT
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
arplicai2O1L2I_J22N2Sl_^N2

10. $105,000.00 BIG BROTHERS BIG SISTERS HAWAII, INC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR BIG BROTHERS BIG SISTERS HAWAII,
INC, FOR COSTS RELATED TO MENTORSHIP
FOR CHILDREN WHO FACE ADVERSITY FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR9Q3)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

11. $100,000.00 BOYS & GIRLS CLUB OF HAWAII
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 71 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR BOYS & GIRLS CLUB OF HAWAII, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO THE EXPANSION OF ITS
AFTER-SCHOOL ATHLETICS PROGR7VM FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

12. $150,000.00 BUILDING INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION OF HAWAII
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR BUILDING INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION OF
HAWAII, FOR COSTS RELATED TO THE
CREATION OF A READINESS PROGRAM TO
ASSIST DISADVANTAGED RESIDENTS FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

13. $150,000.00 CATHOLIC CHARITIES HAWAII
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR CATHOLIC CHARITIES HAWAII, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO AN INDEPENDENT PROGRAM
FOR OLDER ADULTS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

14. $95,000.00 CEEDS OF PEACE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR CEEDS OF PEACE, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO STRENGTHENING COORDINATION BETWEEN
EDUCATORS, SERVICE PROVIDERS, AND
COMMUNITY PARTNERS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 72 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
15. $160,000.00 CENTER FOR TOMORROW'S LEADERS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR CENTER FOR TOMORROW'S LEADERS, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING LEADERSHIP
SKILLS TO AT-RISK YOUTHS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
of^j;unds2_a^

16. $105,000.00 COMMON GRACE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR COMMON GRACE, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
PROVIDING SUPPORT FOR AT-RISK YOUTH AND
PROMOTE LONG-TERM RESILIENCE FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
of^j;unds2_^iw

17. $100,000.00 DOMESTIC VIOLENCE ACTION CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR DOMESTIC VIOLENCE ACTION CENTER,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO THE EXPANSION OF
SUPPORT TO DOMESTIC VIOLENCE VICTIMS
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATIOKL_OF_FUN^^

18. $150,000.00 FAMILY ENDEAVORS, INC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR FTkMILY ENDEAVORS, INC, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO THE EXPANSION OF WELLNESS
SERVICES FOR MENTAL HEALTH FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

HB1800 CDl FIN-2 72

Page 73 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
19. $65,000.00 GANDHI INTERNATIONAL INSTITUTE FOR
PEACE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR GANDHI INTERNATIONAL INSTITUTE FOR
PEACE, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EXPANDING
ACCESS TO PEACE EDUCATION FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

20. $50,000.00 GUIDE DOGS OF HAWAII (ADAPTIVE AIDS,
CANINES AND ADVOCACY FOR THE BLIND)
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR GUIDE DOGS OF HAWAII (ADAPTIVE
AIDS, CANINES AND ADVOCACY FOR THE
BLIND), FOR COSTS RELATED TO ASSISTING
BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED SENIORS
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

HB1800 CDl FIN-2 73

Page 74 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
‘
i-
>»s|
W.
k*«/t\
O
^00e\
O
-l
>
K
W.»
S41
U\0
^00«'
O-
hJ
b
W.
k!4trt\0J'e00
V
Oi-))
N
>
U
k*l
U\0J-e00
>'
O
. $200,000.00 HALE MAKUA HEALTH SERVICES
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HALE MAKUA HEALTH SERVICES, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING
COMPREHENSIVE DAYTIME HEALTHCARE AND
SUPPORT FOR KUPUNA FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND
. $350,000.00 HALE MAKUA HEALTH SERVICES
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HALE MAKUA HEALTH SERVICES, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING CARE
COORDINATION AND SOCIAL SUPPORT
SERVICES TO KUPUNA FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND
. $50,000.00 HALEIWA MAIN STREET
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HALEIWA MAIN STREET, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO THE OPERATIONS OF A VISITOR
AND BUSINESS SERVICES CENTER FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND
. $20,000.00 HAMAKUA YOUTH FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAMAKUA YOUTH FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO THE SUPPORT OF
ORGANIZATIONAL INFRASTRUCTURE FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES {LBR903)
HB18OO'CD1 fin-2 74
llll■l■lllllllllllll■l

Page 75 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OE^JTJNDS2 A^
‘
»
K
^t
^
*I
J(\

4-


0\
O
^
>
»s
>
W.i
4l
U\

^
X(
«'
O
-
>
>
KJ
U
U.«
U\04-005
Xs
O
^J
b
W
^4
ht\0
^0
Q
O'
O-
H
25. $300,000.00 HANAI WAIO MILK BANK
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HANAI WAIU MILK BANK, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A LOCAL
HUMAN MILK BANK FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND
26. $70,000.00 HAWAI'I EDUCATION OF THE ARTS HEARTS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAI'I EDUCATION OF THE ARTS
HEARTS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO SUPPORTING
CORE STAFFING TO MAINTAIN ARTS
EDUCATION, CURRICULUM DEVELOPMENT,
PROGRAM COORDINATION, AND PUBLIC
PERFORMANCE PROGRAMS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND
. $300,000.00 HAWAII AG & CULINARY ALLIANCE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII AG & CULINARY ALLIANCE, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO SUPPORTING HAWAII'S
CULINARY WORKFORCE FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND
28. $300,000.00 HAWAII AGRICULTURAL FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII AGRICULTURAL FOUNDATION, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO IMPLEMENTING AN
AGRICULTURE-BASED EDUCATION AND
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 75
lilll■■lllllil■■ll

Page 76 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT PROGRAM FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

29. $58,300.00 HAWAII CATTLEMEN'S COUNCIL
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII CATTLEMEN'S COUNCIL, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO MITIGATING
AGRICULTURAL CRIME FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

30. $125,000.00 HAWAII CONSTRUCTION CAREER DAYS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII CONSTRUCTION CAREER DAYS,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING YOUTHS
WITH EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES AND
CAREER PATHWAYS IN THE CONSTRUCTION
INDUSTRY FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

31. $75,000.00 HAWAII COUNCIL FOR THE HUMANITIES
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII COUNCIL FOR THE HUMANITIES,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO CREATING A HISTORY
AND CIVIC CURRICULUM IN ENGLISH AND
HAWAIIAN LANGUAGES FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

32. $100,000.00 HAWAI'I COUNTY ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY
COUNCIL
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 77 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
FOR HAWAI'I COUNTY ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY
COUNCIL, FOR COSTS RELATED TO THE
PURCHASE OF VEHICLES TO PROVIDE
DEPENDABLE AND QUALITY TRANSPORTATION
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATIObf OF FUNDS; AND

33 . $314,600.00 HAWAII CREATIVE MEDIA FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII CREATIVE MEDIA FOUNDATION,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO THE EXPANSION OF A
MULTI-PHASE EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM AND
CREATION OF A YEAR-ROUND LEARNING
PATHWAY FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

34 . $300,000.00 THE HAWAII FARM BUREAU FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE HAWAII FARM BUREAU FOUNDATION,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO ENHANCING
INFRASTRUCTURE FOR THE HAWAII STATE
FARM FAIR - WHITMORE VILLAGE FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

35. $294,250.00 HAWAII FLORICULTURE AND NURSERY
ASSOCIATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII FLORICULTURE AND NURSERY
ASSOCIATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
SUSTAINING AND EXPANDING THE
FLORICULTURE INDUSTRY FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 77

Page 78 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1

36. $100,000.00 HAWAII HEALTH & HARM REDUCTION CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII HEALTH & HARM REDUCTION
CENTER, FOR COSTS RELATED TO INCREASING
CAPACITY OF ITS STREET MEDICINE PROGRAM
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

37 . $100,000.00 HAWAII INSTITUTE FOR PUBLIC AFFAIRS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII INSTITUTE FOR PUBLIC
AFFAIRS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PRODUCING
AND PRESERVING AN EDUCATIONAL
DOCUMENTARY HIGHLIGHTING HAWAII'S 1978
CONSTITUTIONAL CONVENTION FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

38 . $150,000.00 HAWAII ISLAND ADULT CARE, INC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII ISLAND ADULT CARE, INC, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING AND
ENRICHING DAYTIME SUPPORT FOR SENIORS
AND ADULTS WITH DISABILITIES FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

39. $80,000.00 HAWAII KOREAN-U.S. CITIZEN LEAGUE
ADD FUNDS'AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII KOREAN-U.S. CITIZEN LEAGUE,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROMOTING CIVIC
ENGAGEMENT AND DEMOCRATIC PARTICIPATION
WITHIN HAWAII'S KOREAN-AMERICAN
HB1800 CDl FIN-2


Page 79
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
COMMUNITY_^;OB^_OFFICE_OF_COMMU1HTY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO_JTIEIR_APPLICAI2ON_OF_FTJNDS2_A^

40. $196,000.00 HAWAII PRIMARY CARE ASSOCIATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII PRIMARY CARE ASSOCIATION,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO ESTABLISHING
COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTERS TO SERVE
VULNERABLE POPULATIONS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

41. $198,500.00 HAWAI^I PUBLIC TELEVISION FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAI^I PUBLIC TELEVISION
FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
STABILIZING OPERATIONS FOR CONTINUED
BUSINESS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

42. $250,000.00 HAWAII I SYMPHONY ORCHESTRA
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII SYMPHONY ORCHESTRA, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING ORCHESTRAL
EXPERIENCES TO THE PUBLIC FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR9Q3) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION.
OF FUNDS; AND

43. $85,000.00 HAWAII TAX HELP AND FINANCIAL
EMPOWERMENT SOLUTIONS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII TAX HELP AND FINANCIAL
EMPOWERMENT SOLUTIONS, FOR COSTS
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 79
llllillllliillllH

Page 80 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
RELATED TO EXPANDING FREE TAX SERVICES
TO LOW- TO-MODERATE INCOME HAWAII
RESIDENTS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS/ AND

44. $100,000.00 HAWAII VA FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII VA FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO INCREASING FOOD SECURITY,
FOSTER SUPPORTIVE CONNECTIONS AND SAFE
AGING WITH ISOLATED AND RURAL KUPUNAS
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

45. $200,000.00 HAWAII YOUTH SYMPHONY
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII YOUTH SYMPHONY, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO THE EXPANSION OF MUSIC
EDUCATION AND FREE PUBLIC ARTS SERVICE
TO HAWAII RESIDENTS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

46. $200,000.00 HAWAIIAN HUMANE SOCIETY
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAIIAN HUMANE SOCIETY, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO THE EXPANSION OF THE TNRM
PROGRAM TO STABILIZE OVERPOPULATION OF
STRAY CATS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

47. $30,000.00 HOKULANI CHILDREN'S THEATRE OF MOLOKAI
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 80

Page 81 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
FOR HOKULANI CHILDREN'S THEATRE OF
MOLOKAI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
SUPPORTING ART, FILM, AND CREATIVE
MEDIA EDUCATION FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

48. $250,000.00 HOOPLA NA PUA
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HO'OLA NA PUA, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
STRENGTHENING THE PREVENTION AND
RESPONSE TO CHILD SEXUAL EXPLOITATION
AND TRAFFICKING STATEWIDE FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR9Q3) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF^jFUNDS2_A^

49. $275,000.00 HUI 0 HAU'ULA
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HUI 0 HAU'ULA, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
COMMUNITY TRAINING FOR RESILIENCE,
EMERGENCY PLANNING, AND FOOD SECURITY
IN KO'OLAULOA COMMUNITIES FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

50. $80,000.00 I OLA WAILUANUI, I OLA WAILUANUI
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR I OLA WAILUANUI, I OLA WAILUANUI,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO SUPPORT THE
RESTORATION AND STEWARDSHIP OF
CULTURALLY SIGNIFICANT SITES ACROSS
KAUA'I FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR9Q3) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

HB1800 CDl FIN-2 81
■■■■■in

Page 82
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1

51. $125,000.00 IMABRIGHTKID FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR IMABRIGHTKID FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO CONTINUING SUPPORT TO PLAN
AND DELIVER THEATRE-BASED PERFORMING
ARTS EDUCATION PROGRAM TO HAWAII KEIKI
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
ARPLIOAT20N_OF_JTJNDS2^^

52. $150,000.00 IMPACT CHANGE HAWAII
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR IMPACT CHANGE HAWAII, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO SUPPORTING AN EARLY LITERACY
INTERVENTION FOR UNDERSERVED FTkMILIES
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

53. $150,000.00 IMUA ONIPA^A
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR IMUA ONIPA'A, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
SUPPORTING HAWAII RESIDENTS IN SEEKING
STABLE EMPLOYMENT, CAREER TRANSITIONS
AND UPSKILLING OPPORTUNITIES FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
oe^j;unds2_a^

54. $35,000.00 JAPANESE CULTURAL CENTER OF HAWAI'I
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR JAPANESE CULTURAL CENTER OF
HAWAII I, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
SUPPORTING INDIVIDUALS AND FAMILIES IN
RECONNECTING WITH JAPANESE ANCESTRY FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 82

Page 83 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

55. $200,000.00 KALIHI COMMUNITY CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KALIHI COMMUNITY CENTER, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO SUPPORTING LOW-INCOME AND
UNDERSERVED INDIVIDUALS AND FAMILIES
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

56. $205,850.00 KALIHI-PALAMA HEALTH CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KALIHI-PALAMA HEALTH CENTER, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO SUPPORTING THE
DELIVERY PREVENTATIVE HEALTH SERVICES
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

57. $150,000.00 KAUAI PLANNING AND ACTION ALLIANCE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KAUAI PLANNING AND ACTION ALLIANCE,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO HOSTING RESILIENCE
BUILDING EVENTS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

58. $250,000.00 KEALA FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KEALA FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO IMPROVE YOUTH MENTAL AND PHYSICAL
HEALTH FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

HB1800 CDl FIN-2 83
iiiniiiiiHiiiini

Page 84 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
59. $200,000.00 KOKUA KALIHI VALLEY COMPREHENSIVE
FTVMILY SERVICES
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KOKUA KALIHI VALLEY COMPREHENSIVE
FAMILY SERVICES, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
STRENGTHENING COMMUNITY RESILIENCE FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

60. $200,000.00 KUALOA-HEEIA ECUMENICAL YOUTH PROJECT
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KUALOA-HEEIA ECUMENICAL YOUTH
PROJECT, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING
AINA-BASED EDUCATION, CULTURAL
LEARNING, AND OHANA ENGAGEMENT EVENTS
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

61. $200,000.00 KUKULU KUMUHANA 0 ANAHOLA
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KUKULU KUMUHANA 0 ANAHOLA, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO IMPROVING THE MENTAL
HEALTH AND FOOD SECURITY OF ANAHOLA
RESIDENTS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

62. $750,000.00 KULA NO NA PO'E HAWAI'I
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KULA NO NA PO’E HAWAI'I, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO SUPPORTING PROGR7\M DELIVERY,
HOMESTEAD OUTREACH, AND ADVANCING
FAMILY STABILITY FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
HB1800 CDl FIN-2


Page 85 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
‘
‘
*-i»>t>>t^4
A(S
O^o
O
O\0>-iJb
W
X4l
Us
O^
Ooc\o»-i»stJ
O.>*1
U^
M
O
O
O
V
O
-»»sk
W^4»
U\0^-
O
O
OS
O
—I
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
0E^j;UNpS2 A^
. $30,000.00 LANAI ACADEMY OF PERFORMING ARTS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR LANAI ACADEMY OF PERFORMING ARTS,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO SUPPORTING
AFTERSCHOOL CLASSES, THEATRICAL
PRODUCTIONS, CROSS-ISLAND
COLLABORATIONS AND THEATER TRAINING FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND
. $80,000.00 LAUPAHOEHOE COMMUNITY PUBLIC CHARTER
SCHOOL
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR LAPAHOEHOE COMMUNITY PUBLIC CHARTER
SCHOOL, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING
SAFE AND RELIABLE TRANSPORTATION FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND
65. $150,000.00 LEGAL AID SOCIETY OF HAWAI'I
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR LEGAL AID SOCIETY OF HAWAI'I, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO SUPPORTING LOW-INCOME
INDIVIDUALS SEEKING CUSTODY FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND
66. $100,000.00 THE LEGAL CLINIC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE LEGAL CLINIC, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO STRENGTHENING HAWAII'S IMMIGRATION
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 85
■■liRniiiniiiiiiiiii

Page 86 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
LEGAL INFRASTRUCTURE FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

67. $100^000.00 MA KA HANA KA IKE BUILDING PROGRAM
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR MA KA HANA KA IKE BUILDING PROGRAM,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING
WORKFORCE TRAINING IN BUILDING AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

68. $100z000.00 MAKAHANALOA FISHING ASSOCIATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR MAKAHANALOA FISHING ASSOCIATION,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO SUPPORT FOOD
SECURITY FOR LOCAL COMMUNITIES FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

69. $220,000.00 MALAMA 0 PUNA
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR MALTkMA 0 PUNA, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
ADDRESSING CRITICAL CHALLENGES IN FOOD
SECURITY, INVASIVE SPECIES CONTROL, AND
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND PROTECTION FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICAT20IL_0El_FUNDS2_Ara

70. $300,000.00 MAUI ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BOARD, INC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR MAUI ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BOARD,
INC, FOR COSTS RELATED TO SUPPORTING
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 86

Page 87 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
STEM TEACHER PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT
AND STUDENT CAREER FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

71. $200,000.00 MOANALUA GARDENS FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR MOANALUA GARDENS FOUNDATION, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO SUPPORTING STEM
EDUCATION PROGRAM FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

72. $300,000.00 MOILIILI COMMUNITY CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR MOILIILI COMMUNITY CENTER, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO SUSTAINING COMMUNITY
PROGRAMS FOR CHILDREN AND SENIORS FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

73. $300,000.00 MOLOKAI COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR MOLOKAI COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO SUPPORTING PRIMARY
CARE, BEHAVIORAL HEALTH, AND DENTAL
SERVICES FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

74. $100,000.00 MOLOKAI PHYSICAL THERAPY &
REHABILITATION, LLC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR MOLOKAI PHYSICAL THERAPY &
HB1800 CDl FIN-2
IIHIIIIIIIIIIIIII

Page 88 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
REHABILITATION, LLC, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO SUPPORTING PHYSICAL THERAPY,
REHABILITATION, AND CARE COORDINATION
SERVICES FOR UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

75. $400,000.00 NA KAMA KAI
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR NA K7VMA KAI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
THE EXPANSION OF OCEAN SAFETY AND SWIM
EDUCATION PROGRAMS FOR KEIKI IN
UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

76. $175,000.00 NEIGHBORHOOD SECURITY WATCH COUNCIL
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR NEIGHBORHOOD SECURITY WATCH
COUNCIL, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
SUPPORTING NEIGHBORHOOD SECURITY WATCH
AND COMMUNITY POLICING ACTIVITIES IN
RURAL AND UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

77. $195,000.00 NORTH SHORE COMMUNITY LAND TRUST
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR NORTH SHORE COMMUNITY LAND TRUST,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO THE PROTECTION OF
LAND AND PUBLIC BENEFITS THROUGH
CONSERVATION EASEMENTS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 89 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1

78. $200,000.00 NORTH SHORE EVP
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR NORTH SHORE EVP, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO SUSTAINING, EXPANDING, AND
INCREASING RESILIENCE IN HAWAII'S
AGRICULTURE SECTOR FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

79. $250,000.00 NORTH SHORE TRANSPORTATION ALTERNATIVES
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR NORTH SHORE TRANSPORTATION
ALTERNATIVES, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
DESIGNING A COMMUNITY-DRIVEN
ALTERNATIVE TRANSPORTATION PLAN AND
COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT PROCESS FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903} ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

80. $175,000.00 OAHU SOCIETY FOR THE PREVENTION OF
CRUELTY TO ANIMALS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR OAHU SOCIETY FOR THE PREVENTION OF
CRUELTY TO ANIMALS, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO TRANSITIONING TO A FULL PUBLIC-
SERVICE AND DELIVERING MEASURABLE GAINS
IN SPAY/NEUTER CAPACITY, ADOPTIONS, AND
ANIMALS SERVICED FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

81. $160,000.00 OHANA PACIFIC FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 90 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
F0R_0HANA_2ACIF2£^PUNPAI20N^_j:0R_C0STS
RELATED TO SUPPORTING OPERATIONAL COSTS
OF KAUAI ADULT DAY HEALTH SERVICES TO
SERVE KUPUNA AND ADULTS WITH
DISABILITIES AND IMPROVE PROGR7\M
ACCESSIBILITY FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

82. $250,000.00 PA'ANI CHALLENGE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PA'ANI CHALLENGE, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO SUPPORTING FEMALE HIGH SCHOOL
WRESTLERS THROUGH SCHOLARSHIPS,
TRAINING, AND STATEWIDE COMPETITION
OPPORTUNITIES FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

83. $250,000.00 PACIFIC AND ASIAN AFFAIRS COUNCIL
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PACIFIC AND ASIAN AFFAIRS COUNCIL,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO AN IMMERSIVE
INTERNATIONAL STUDY TOUR TO DEVELOP
YOUTH LEADERSHIP AND ADVANCE HAWAII'S
ECONOMIC AND GLOBAL ENGAGEMENT FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

84. $200,000.00 PACIFIC TSUNAMI MUSEUM, INC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PACIFIC TSUNTkMI MUSEUM, INC, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO THE EXPANSION OF
STATEWIDE TSUNAMI EDUCATION FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

iiniiiiiiiiMiiiiH

Page 91 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
‘
‘
‘
4bJ*
C.
U-»J(\0
^-00
^0
i*sl
W
^4
nt\
T
C
^-000'0
>
J
b
W
^l
Z
C\

^-
C

^
O
lJ^^^t■^J(^04~0
Q0■'
O^I
—
—
—
85. $100,000.00 PACIFIC WHALE FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PACIFIC WHALE FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO EXPANDING EQUITABLE ACCESS
TO MARINE SCIENCE EDUCATION AND
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITIES FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
.APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND
86. $300,000.00 PARENTS AND CHILDREN TOGETHER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PARENTS AND CHILDREN TOGETHER, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE INTERVENTION SERVICES FOR
SURVIVORS AND CHILDREN IMPACTED BY
FAMILY VIOLENCE FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND
87. $100,000.00 PEARL HARBOR AVIATION MUSEUM
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PEARL HARBOR AVIATION MUSEUM, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO THE CONTINUATION OF
HIGH SCHOOL AIRFRAME AND POWERPLANT
AVIATION MAINTENANCE TRAINING PROGRAM
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND
88. $150,000.00 PROJECT VISION HAWAII
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PROJECT VISION HAWAII, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO INCREASING ACCESS TO DENTAL
CARE FOR CHILDREN AND ADULTS FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
HB1800 CDl FIN-2


Page 92 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF_JTJNDS2_Ara

89. $170,000.00 PUNA COMMUNITY MEDICAL CENTER
FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PUNA COMMUNITY MEDICAL CENTER
FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
CONSTRUCTION OF A MEDICAL CAMPUS FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICAI20t£_0F^JFUNDS2_^^

90. $350,000.00 THE QUEEN'S CLINICALLY INTEGRATED
PHYSICIAN NETWORK
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE QUEEN'S CLINICALLY INTEGRATED
PHYSICIAN NETWORK, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
THE SUSTAINMENT OF CARE COORDINATION
SERVICES TO SUPPORT PRIMARY CARE
PROVIDERS AND PATIENTS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

91. $200,000.00 READ TO ME INTERNATIONAL FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR READ TO ME INTERNATIONAL
FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
SUPPORTING THE CONTINUATION AND
EXPANSION OF READ ALOUD AND LITERACY
PROGRAMS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

92. $230,500.00 RE-USE HAWAI"!
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 92

Page 93 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
‘
‘
J
b
Jj(.i
4l
U\

4'


0\

-i
J
b
>
U.
k
*l
U\

^-


0'
Oi-i
J
b
>
*
<
k
*i
yts
O
^-


0\

>-l
J
b
W.i

»
U\

4-



>'

-i
FOR RE-USE HAWAI'I, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO THE CONTINUATION OF ENVIRONMENTAL
WORKFORCE TRAINING FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF^TJNDS2 AIW
93. $350^000.00 SEARIDER PRODUCTIONS FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR SEARIDER PRODUCTIONS FOUNDATION,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO STRENGTHENING
STUDENT EMOTIONAL WELL-BEING AND LIFE
SKILLS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND
94. $25,000.00 SOUND OF ALOHA CHORUS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR SOUND OF ALOHA CHORUS, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO PROVIDING UNIQUE
ENTERTAINMENT AND EDUCATIONAL
OPPORTUNITIES FOR HAWAII RESIDENTS FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND
95. $100,000.00 SPECIAL OLYMPICS HAWAII, INC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR SPECIAL OLYMPICS HAWAII, INC, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO THE PROVISION OF
SPORTS TRAINING, COMPETITION, HEALTH
SCREENINGS, LEADERSHIP, AND SCHOOL
PROGRAMS FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH
INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
to j;heir applicatuon oe^j;unds2 ato
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

ll■ln■llllllllll■

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
96. $12,000.00 SURFING THE NATIONS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR SURFING THE NATIONS, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO SUPPORTING PROGRAM
OPERATIONS TO ENSURE ENGAGING OUTREACH
ACTIVITIES FOR YOUTH FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

97. $50,000.00 TRANSFORMING COMMUNITIES WITH ALOHA
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR TRANSFORMING COMMUNITIES WITH
ALOHA, FOR COSTS RELATED TO DELIVERING
TRAUMA-INFORMED EDUCATION, PROMOTING
YOUTH RESILIENCE, AND FOSTERING
COLLABORATION FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

98. $50,000.00 ULU A'E LEARNING CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR ULU A'E LEARNING CENTER, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO PROVIDING ACADEMIC SUPPORT,
MENTORSHIP, CULTURAL ARTS, WORKFORCE
LEARNING, AND LAND STEWARDSHIP
EXPERIENCES FOR YOUTH FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
of^j;unds2_a^

99. $300,000.00 THE UNITED KOREAN ASSOCIATION OF HAWAII
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE UNITED KOREAN ASSOCIATION OF
HAWAII, FOR COSTS RELATED TO THE
CONTINUED SUPPORT AND FACILITATION FOR
ON-SITE DIRECT SERVICES, EVENTS, AND
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 94
■IHIIIIIIIIIIII

Page 95 H.B. NO. H™
C.D. 1
WORKSHOPS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

100. $100,000.00 UNITED SELF HELP
ADD FUNDS AS’ A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR UNITED SELF HELP, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO PROVIDING EMOTIONAL SUPPORT AND
LISTENING SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS
EXPERIENCING MENTAL HEALTH DISTRESS AND
LONELINESS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

101. $135,000.00 VOLCANO ART CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR VOLCANO ART CENTER, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO UPGRADING TECHNOLOGY AND
STAFF TRAINING TO SUPPORT ART
ORGANIZATION OPERATIONS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

102. $400,000.00 THE WAHIAWA CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE WAHIAWA CENTER FOR COMMUNITY
HEALTH, FOR COSTS RELATED TO ADDRESSING
CHILDHOOD OBESITY AND NUTRITION-RELATED
CHRONIC DISEASE RISK FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
of_j;unds2_a^

103. $100,000.00 WAIALUA COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR WAIALUA COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION, FOR
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 95
HIIIIIIIBIIIIIIIIIII

Page 96 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
COSTS RELATED TO ADDRESSING PUBLIC
SAFETY HAZARDS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO_JTHEIR_ARPL2CAI2O^L_2£_ZUN2S2_ANp

104. $300,000.00 WAIANAE DISTRICT COMPREHENSIVE HEALTH
AND HOSPITAL BOARD, INC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR WAIANAE DISTRICT COMPREHENSIVE
HEALTH AND HOSPITAL BOARD, INC, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO MEDICAID ENROLLMENT
AND ELIGIBILITY ASSISTANCE TO SUPPORT
AND MAINTAIN HEALTH COVERAGE FOR LOW-
INCOME PATIENTS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

105. $20,000.00 WAIANAE WAGS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR WAIANAE WAGS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
THE REDUCTION OF PET SURRENDERS AND
ABANDONMENT FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR9Q3) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

106. $400,000.00 WAIKIKI BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT
ASSOCIATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR WAIKIKI BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT
DISTRICT ASSOCIATION, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO THE OPERATION OF THE ALOHA
TUyiBASSAPOR PROGRTUY TO PROVIDE OUTREACH
SERVICES FOR WAIKIKI PUBLIC SPACES AND
VULNERABLE POPULATIONS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

HB1800 CDl FIN-2 96
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiaiiii

Page 97 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
107 . $70,000.00 WAIKIKI COMMUNITY CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR WAIKIKI COMMUNITY CENTER, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO HEALTH, WELLNESS, CASE
MANAGEMENT, FOOD, AND HOUSING SUPPORT
SERVICES FOR SENIORS TO SUPPORT
INDEPENDENT LIVING FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

108 . $300,000.00 WAIMANALO HEALTH CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR WAIMANALO HEALTH CENTER, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO INCREASING ACCESS TO HEALTH
SERVICES FOR HARD-TO-REACH POPULATION
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

109 . $130,000.00 THE WAIPA FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE WAIPA FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO THE EXPANSION OF LOCAL FOOD
PRODUCTION AND DISTRIBUTION FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

110 . $275,000.00 WEED AND SEED HAWAII, INC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR WEED AND SEED HAWAII, INC, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO COMMUNITY SAFETY AND
OUTREACH SERVICES IN HIGH-NEED
COMMUNITIES FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND
HB1800 CDl FIN-2

■■ininiiHiiiiiii

Page 98 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1

111. $65,000.00 YOUNG MEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION OF
KAUAI
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR YOUNG MEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION
OF KAUAI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO THE
UPKEEP AND PRESERVATION OF THE YMCA
CTVMP NAUE HISTORICAL FACILITY FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

112. $250,000.00 YOUNG WOMEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION OF
OAHU (YWCA OAHU)
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR YOUNG WOMEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION
OF OAHU (YWCA OAHU), FOR COSTS RELATED
TO THE EXPANSION OF ECONOMIC
ADVANCEMENT PROGRAMS FOR FEMALES FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS."

SECTION 7. Part V of Act 250, Session Laws .of Hawaii 2025,
is amended by amending section 14 to read as follows:
"SECTION 14. CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS AUTHORIZED. The
sums appropriated or authorized in part II of this Act for
capital improvements shall be expended for the projects listed
below. Accounting of the appropriations by the department of
accounting and general services shall be based on the projects
as the projects are listed in this section. Several related or
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 98
liiiiiiHiiniiiiiiiiiiii

Page 99
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
similar projects may be combined into a single project if the
combination is advantageous or convenient for implementation;
provided that the total cost of the projects thus combined shall
not exceed the total of the sum specified for the projects
separately. The amount after each cost element and the total
funding for each project listed in this part are in thousands of
dollars.


HB1800 CDl FIN-2


Page 100 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
A. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
BEDIOI - OFFICE OF INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS

1. EAST-WEST CENTER, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO RENOVATE, IMPROVE, AND
MODERNIZE EAST-WEST CENTER BUILDINGS.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 5,000C C

BED107 - FOREIGN TRADE ZONE

1■1 PIER 2 FOREIGN TRADE ZONE, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO ADDRESS SAFETY COMPLIANCE
IMPROVEMENTS AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING BED _C 1,000 C

TROPICAL AGRICULTURAL TECH CENTER
WAREHOUSE, HAWAII
DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF THE
TROPICAL AGRICULTURAL TECH CENTER
WAREHOUSE IN HILO, HAWAII.
TOTAL FUNDING BED B 250 B

BEDI 13 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - ADMINISTRATION AND GOVERNANCE

2. HAWAII CONVENTION CENTER
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE HAWAII
CONVENTION CENTER.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 36,400C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 100

Page 101 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
2_l1 HAWAII CONVENTION CENTER
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR LOBBY TRANSOM GLASS ROOFTOP
REPAIRS■
TOTAL FUNDING BED B 21,000 B

AGR132 - ANIMAL DISEASE CONTROL

3 . HALAWA ANIMAL INDUSTRY FACILITY
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE
ANIMAL INDUSTRY FACILITY IN HALAWA.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 7, 000 C C

AGRI41 - AGRICULTURAL RESOURCE MANAGEMENT

4 . STATE IRRIGATION SYSTEM RESERVOIR
SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR THE STATE IRRIGATION
SYSTEM RESERVOIR SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS.
THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING AGR 5, 000 C C
AGR 1 N N


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 101
lOllllllillHIHI

Page 102 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
4 . 1 NONAGRICULTURAL AND AGRICULTURAL PARK
IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO NON-
AGRICULTURAL AND AGRICULTURAL PARKS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGR C 1, 300 C

4.2 ROYAL KUNIA AGRICULTURAL PARK, OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE ROYAL
KUNIA AGRICULTURAL PARK.
TOTAL FUNDING AGR C 15,000 C

4.3 WAHIAWA DAM IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO THE WAHIAWA DAM.
TOTAL FUNDING AGR _C 58,500 C

4.4 WAIMEA IRRIGATION SYSTEM
IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO THE WAIMEA IRRIGATION
SYSTEM.
TOTAL FUNDING AGR C l,150C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 102

Page 103 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
AGR192 - GENEE<AL ADMINISTRATION FOR AGRICULTURE

5. MISCELLANEOUS HEALTH, SAFETY, CODE,
AND OTHER REQUIREMENTS, STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO ADDRESS HEALTH, SAFETY,
CODE, AND OTHER REQUIREMENTS, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING. AGS 1,900 C 2,200 C

BED170 - AGRIBUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AND RESEARCH

6 . ACQUISITION OF AGRICULTURAL LANDS,
KAPAIA, KAUAI

LAND ACQUISITION FROM GROVE FARM ON
KAUAI.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 39,000 C C

7 . ACQUISITION OF AGRICULTURAL LANDS,
WAIMEA, KAUAI

LAND ACQUISITION FOR AGRICULTURAL
LANDS ON KAUAI, TMKS: 1-6-001-045, 1-6-
001-030, AND 1-6-001-028.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 1,300 C C

8 . AGRICULTURAL INFRASTRUCTURE
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO
AGRICULTURAL INFRASTRUCTURE IN WAHIAWA
AND WAIALUA, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 9,200 C C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 103

Page 104 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
9. ANIMAL PROCESSING AND STORAGE
FACILITY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT, AND FURNISHINGS FOR A
DEDICATED SMALL ANIMAL PROCESSING AND
STORAGE FACILITY ON OAHU TO SUPPORT POST­
SLAUGHTER HANDLING. THIS FACILITY WILL
INCLUDE AREAS FOR CARCASS BREAKDOWN, MEAT
CUTTING, PACKAGING, CHILLING, AND COLD
STORAGE TO EXPAND LOCAL CAPACITY FOR
SAFE, HIGH-QUALITY MEAT PROCESSING. THE
PROJECT WILL SERVE SMALL- AND MID-SIZED
PRODUCERS, IMPROVE LOCAL FOOD SYSTEM
INFRASTRUCTURE, AND ENHANCE THE
AVAILABILITY OF HAWAII-GROWN MEAT FOR
CONSUMERS.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 17,000C C

10. COMMERCIAL LAND PURCHASE, OAHU

LAND ACQUISITION OF COMMERCIAL LAND
ON OAHU, TMK 7-1-006-001.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 500C 4,500C

11. CONSTRUCTION FOR A STATE POSTHARVEST
FACILITY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR A POSTHARVEST FACILITY ON
OAHU, TMKS 7-1-002:004 (POR.); 009
(POR.); 023 (POR.).
TOTAL FUNDING BED 22,076 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
104
■iiiniiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 105
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
12. FOOD AND PRODUCT INNOVATION NETWORK
(FPIN), STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT, LAND ACQUISITION, AND
FURNISHINGS FOR A FOOD AND PRODUCT
INNOVATION NETWORK, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 350 C c

13 . FOOD PROCESSING PLANT, OAHU

LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, DESIGN,
EQUIPMENT, AND FURNISHING FOR A FOOD
PROCESSING PLANT, OAHU, TMKS 7-4-005-032
AND 7-4-005-018.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 6,275 C 650 C

14 . IRRIGATION SYSTEM, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, LAND ACQUISITION,
REHABILITATION, AND EXPANSION COSTS FOR
AN AGRICULTURAL IRRIGATION SYSTEM,
WAHIAWA, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 2,000 c c

14 .1 PROCESSING MANUFACTURING FACILITY,
OMU

PLANS, DESIGN, EQUIPMENT,
CONSTRUCTION AND APPURTENANCES FOR
ENTREPRENEUR PROCESSING MANUFACTURING
FACILITY, TMK 7-1-002:009 AND 7-1-002:004
(POR).
TOTAL FUNDING B^ £ 6, 000 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
105
illlilllffllHIlM

Page 106 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
15 . PURCHASE OF LAND LOCKED BETWEEN
STATE-OWNED LAND, OAHU

LAND ACQUISITION FOR AGRICULTURAL
LANDS ON OAHU, TMK 6-5-002-027.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 3,000 C c

16 . SMALL ANIMAL SLAUGHTERHOUSE, OAHU

LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND FURNISHING EQUIPMENT
FOR A SMALL ANIMAL SLAUGHTERHOUSE.
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, EQUIPMENT,
AND APPURTENANCES, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 4, 000 C c

17 . WAIAHOLE WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS,
OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE
WAIAHOLE WATER SYSTEM AND APPURTENANT
WORKS.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 2,500 C c

18 . WASTEWATER RECLAIMED WATER IRRIGATION
SYSTEM, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR A WASTEWATER RECLAIMED
WATER IRRIGATION SYSTEM AND INTAKE PUMP
STATION, WAHIAWA, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 4, 000 C c


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 106
iimiiiniMm

Page 107 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
BEDI46 - NATURAL ENERGY LABORATORY OF HAWAII AUTHORITY

1 8.1 SEAWATER PIPELINE REMOVAL, HAWAII

CONSTRUCTION TO REMOVE DEEP SEAWATER
PIPELINES AT OR OFFSHORE OF HOST PARK,
AND RELATED GROUND WORKS AND
APPURTENANCES■
TOTAL FUNDING BED C 2,000 C

LNR141 - WATER AND LAND DEVELOPMENT

19 . ROCKFALL AND FLOOD MITIGATION,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR ROCKFALL
AND FLOOD MITIGATION AT VARIOUS
LOCATIONS, STATEWIDE. THE LEGISLATURE
FINDS AND DECLARES THAT THE APPROPRIATION
IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST AND FOR THE
PUBLIC’S HEALTH, SAFETY AND GENERAL
WELFARE OF THE STATE.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2,000 C 2,000 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 107

Page 108 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
BED150 - HAWAII COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY

20 . 99-YEAR LEASEHOLD PROGRAM, PHASE 2,
OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR A LEASEHOLD CONDOMINIUM
FACILITY UNDER THE 99-YEAR LEASEHOLD
PROGRAM, LOCATED AT TMKS 2-1-049-080 AND
2-1-049-063.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 15,000 C C

21 . CLIMATE CHANGE IMPACT ASSESSMENT,
OAHU

PLANS TO CONDUCT AN ASSESSMENT AND
RULEMAKING TO CONSIDER THE IMPACTS OF
CLIMATE CHANGE AND SEA LEVEL RISE FOR THE'
DEVELOPMENT IN HCDA'S KAKT^AKO AND
KALAELOA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICTS.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 2,000 C C

21.1 HEEIA MASTER PLAN UPDATE, OAHU

PLANS FOR THE REVISION OF THE HEEIA
MASTER PLAN AND AMENDMENTS TO THE HEEIA
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT RULES.
TOTAL FUNDING BM _C 2,000 C

22 . IWILEI-KAPALAMA COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF
INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS TO SUPPORT
IWILEI-KAPALAMA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 12,000 C C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2
108
IIMIffillNIlilllllllllll

Page 109 1800
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
23 . KAKAAKO MAKAI GEOTECHNICAL
ASSESSMENT, OAHU

RESEARCH PAST STUDIES AND CONDUCT
GEOTECHNICAL SURVEY OF CONTAMINATED MAKAI
LANDS
TOTAL FUNDING BED 1,500 C C

24 . KAKAAKO MAKAI PLANNING, OAHU

PLANS FOR AN INFRASTRUCTURE
ASSESSMENT AND COMMUNITY PLANNING FOR
KAKAAKO MAKAI.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 1,000 c c

25 . KALAELOA INFRASTRUCTURE-EIS DISTRICT
WIDE, KALAELOA, OAHU

PLANS FOR PROGRAMMATIC ENVIRONMENTAL
IMPACT STATEMENT FOR THE KALAELOA
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 1,000 c c

26. KUPUNA SUPPORTIVE HOUSING, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF
KUPUNA SUPPORTIVE HOUSING, LOCATED AT TMK
2-1-030-012,
TOTAL FUNDING BED 5,500 c 29, 450 C

BED160 - HAWAII HOUSING FINANCE AND DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION

27 . CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND, STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION
OF FUNDS TO FINANCE ADDITIONAL AFFORDABLE
RENTAL HOUSING, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 50,000 c [50,OOOC]
100,000 C

HB1800 CDl FIN-2 109

Page 110 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
28 . CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND, TIER II, STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION
OF FUNDS TO FINANCE RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND TIER II AFFORDABLE RENTAL
HOUSING, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 50,000C 50,000C

29 . DWELLING UNIT REVOLVING FUND
INFUSION, STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION
OF FUNDS TO FINANCE ADDITIONAL AFFORDABLE
HOUSING, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING BED C 40,000C

29^ SUPPORTIVE HOUSING, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR PREPLANNING
INCLUDING DUE DILIGENCE FOR SUPPORTIVE
HOUSING LOCATED AT TMK 2-1-009:27.
TOTAL FUNDING B^ C 5, 000 C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2
»■■■■■■■ 110

Page 111 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
B. EMPLOYMENT
LBR903 - OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES

1. 442ND LEGACY CENTER

CONSTRUCTION FOR COMPLETION OF
MUSEUM. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C C

2. ADULT FRIENDS FOR YOUTH

LAND ACQUISITION FOR HIGH-RISK YOUTH
REDIRECTIONAL THERAPY. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C C

3. ALCOHOLIC REHABILITATION SERVICES OF
HAWAII, INC., THE

CONSTRUCTION FOR INSTALLATION OF
SOLAR PANELS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C c

4 . ARC OF HILO, THE

[LAND-ACQUISITION FOR REDIRECTIONAL
THERAPY FOR HIGH-RISK YOUTH.]PLANS,
CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR RENOVATION
OF ADULT DAY HEALTH FACILITY HALLWAYS,
CLASSROOMS, AND MEETING AREAS. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C c

HB1800 CDl FIN-2
111

Page 112 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

5. ARC OF MAUI COUNTY

CONSTRUCTION AND LAND ACQUISITION FOR
SAFE AND ACCESSIBLE ENVIRONMENT FOR
INDIVIDUALS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND
DEVELOPMENT DISABILITIES, AND ELECTRICAL
UPGRADES. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 200 C C

6. BACK TO THE BEGINNING, INC.

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
BUILDING OF RESIDENTIAL FACILITIES. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C C

7 . BLOOD BANK OF HAWAII

EQUIPMENT FOR BLOODMOBILE VEHICLE.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C C

8 . BOYS AND GIRLS CLUB OF HAWAII

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
CLUBHOUSE REPAIRS ON OAHU AND KAUAI. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C C

9. DIGS

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT, AND
LAND ACQUISITION FOR PROCUREMENT AND
CONSTRUCTION OF AN AFFORDABLE CENTER ON
OAHU. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C C

HB1800 GDI FIN-2
112

Page 113 H.B. NO.
1.^. S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

10. ELEPAIO SOCIAL SERVICES

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
DEVELOPMENT OF A COMMUNITY RESILIENCE
FACILITY. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C C

11. EPISCOPAL CHURCH IN HAWAII, THE

CONSTRUCTION FOR CONSTRUCTION OF A
COMMUNITY CENTER IN KAPOLEI. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 480 C C

12 . FILIPINO COMMUNITY CENTER INC., THE

CONSTRUCTION FOR SECURITY, SAFETY,
AND FACILITY INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS,
AND LANDSCAPE REHABILITATION. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 250 C C

13 . FIVE MOUNTAINS HAWAII, INC.

CONSTRUCTION FOR CONSTRUCTION OF A
RURAL HEALTH CLINIC ON HAWAII ISLAND.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 200 C C

14 . FRIENDS OF THE SUNSET MEMORIAL
CEMETERY

CONSTRUCTION FOR MAUSOLEUM
RENOVATION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 150 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
113
IMHIHIIIIIIIIIIIIII

Page 114 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D, 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
15 . GREGORY HOUSE PROGRAMS

PLANS AND CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR AND
IMPROVEMENTS TO A TRANSITIONAL HOUSING
FACILITY ON OAHU. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C C

16 . HABITAT FOR HUMANITY INTERNATIONAL,
INC. (HONOLULU)

CONSTRUCTION FOR A HOME REPAIR
REVOLVING FUND PROGRAM ON OAHU. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 175 C c

17 . HALE OPIO KAUAI, INC.

CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION OF TWO
RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT HOMES IN LAWAI AND
KAPAHI. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 168 C c

18 . HANA HEALTH

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTIONS FOR
CONSTRUCTION OF A SPECIALTY MEDICAL AND
DENTAL FACILITY. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C c


HB1800 GDI FIN-2
114

Page 115 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
19. HAWAII FOODBANK, INC.

[PLANS, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
POR—S^LARr^PANBi-^WSTAirtA'PiON^]
CONSTRUCTION FOR A NEW FACILITY. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 800 C C

20. HAWAII ISLAND VETERANS MEMORIAL

[CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
RENOVATIONS -OF ADULT DAY HEALTH HALLWAYS,
CLASSROOMS, AND MEETING
AREAS'. ] CONSTRUCTION FOR A FIRE HYDRANT
AND WATER SERVICE LINE. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 175 C C

21. HAWAII THEATRE CENTER

[CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
BUILDING RESIDENTIAL
FACILITIES.]CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT
FOR ELECTRICAL UPGRADES. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 150 C C

22. HAWAII UNITED OKINAWA ASSOCIATION

[CONSTRUCTION AND LAND ACQUISITION
FOR THE PURCHASE OF LAND AND -E'LBGT-RICA-L
UPGRADES.]EQUIPMENT FOR RESTROOM
RENOVATIONS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C C

HB1800 CDl FIN-2
115
llln■l■lllllll■l■

Page 116 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

23. HIIPAKA, LLC

CONSTRUCTION FOR A CULTURAL TRAINING
AND EDUCATION CENTER. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C C

24 . HILO BAYFRONT TRAILS, INC.


SAFETY--REPAIRS AND IMPROVEMENTS.] DESIGN
AND EQUIPMENT FOR BICYCLE AND PEDESTRIAN
EDUCATION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 120 C C

25 . HOLUALOA FOUNDATION FOR ARTS &
CULTURE

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR MASTER CAMPUS
PLAN DEVELOPMENT TO RENOVATE AND UPGRADE
EXISTING FACILITIES. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C C

26. HOMESTEAD COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
CORPORATION

DESIGN FOR DEVELOPMENT OF A HAWAIIAN
HOMESTEAD MULTI-PURPOSE CENTER IN SOUTH
HILO. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 350 C C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 116

Page 117 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
27 . HOOULU LAHUI

LAND ACQUISITION FOR ACQUISITION OF A
PROPERTY FOR PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL IN
PUNA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C C

28 . HUI MALAt4A 0 KANEIOLOUMA

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
RESTORATION OF ANCIENT HAWAIIAN VILLAGE
ON KAUAI. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C C

29 . INSPIRATION HAWAII MUSEUM, INC.

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR REPAIR AND RENOVATION OF
RESTROOMS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 311C C

30 . ISLAND OF HAWAII YMCA, THE

DESIGN FOR DESIGN OF NEW COMMUNITY
CENTER PROJECT ON HAWAII ISLAND. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 117

Page 118 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
31 . JAPANESE CULTURAL CENTER OF HAWAII

CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION OF
HISTORICAL HERITAGE EXHIBIT ON OAHU. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C C

32 . KALIHI-PALAMA HEALTH CENTER (HALE
HOOLA HOU)

CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION OF
BATHROOM, NEW ALARM, NEW AIR
CONDITIONING, AND REPLACEMENT OF DENTAL
EQUIPMENT. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 350 C C

33 . KAUAI ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY
INCORPORATED

CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR OF HOMELESS
SHELTER PROPERTIES. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C C

34 . KAUAI FOODBANK, INC., THE

CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR OF WAREHOUSE
IN LIHUE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 116 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 118

Page 119 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
35 . LAI OPUA 2020

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
COMPLETION OF COMMUNITY COMPLEX IN
KEALAKEHE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C C

36 . LANAKILA PACIFIC

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR AIR CONDITIONING
REPLACEMENT. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C C

37 . MAKIKI CHRISTIAN CHURCH

CONSTRUCTION FOR RE-ROOFING OF TOWER
AND SOCIAL HALL. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C C

38 . MALAMA KAUAI [-6A€fti€VLT««At
PARiQ-] (MAKAWELI DITCH)

[DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT

IN EAST KAUM-^]CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIRS
AND MODERNIZATION OF MAKAWELI DITCH.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 350 C C

39. MALAMA NA MAKUA A KEIKI

CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR AND REPLACE
ROOF AND CEILING, RENOVATION OF BATHROOM,
AND OFFICE SPACE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 425 C C

HB1800 CDl FIN-2 119

Page 120 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
40 . MANOA JAPANESE LANGUAGE SCHOOL

CONSTRUCTION FOR BATHROOM RENOVATION.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 130 C c

41 . MAUI ADVANCED MANUFACTURING ALLIANCE
CORP.

CONSTRUCTION FOR DEVELOPMENT OF AN
ADVANCED MANUFACTURING CENTER. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C c

42 . NAMiAHANA EDUCATION FOUNDATION

CONSTRUCTION FOR CONSTRUCTION OF
CLASSROOMS AT NAMAHANA SCHOOL. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C c

43 . OLELO COMMUNITY TELEVISION

DESIGN AND EQUIPMENT FOR SERVER
CAPACITY FOR MEDIA CAPTURE, PROCESSING,
AND ADDITIONAL ARCHIVAL SPACE. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C c

44 . PAPAKOLEA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
CORPORATION

PLANS FOR MASTER PLANNING FOR
EXPANSION OF NATIVE HAWAIIAN EDUCATION
AND CULTURE CENTER IN PUOWAINA. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C c

HB1800 GDI FIN-2
120

Page 121 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

45 . POLYNESIAN VOYAGING SOCIETY

PLANS AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
RENOVATIONS OF A MARINE EDUCATION AND
TRAINING CENTER. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 175 C C

46 . PUNA COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER
FOUNDATION

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A MEDICAL CAMPUS
IN PUNA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C C

47 . REHABILITATION HOSPITAL OF THE
PACIFIC, THE

EQUIPMENT FOR PURCHASE AND
INSTALLATION OF HOSPITAL BEDS. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C C

48 . ST. JAMES EPISCOPAL CHURCH

CONSTRUCTION FOR NEW COMMUNITY CENTER
IN WAIMEA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 200 C C

49 . TRUST FOR PUBLIC LAND, THE

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR AALA PARK
IMPROVEMENTS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 475 C C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2
121

Page 122 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
50 . UNITED STATES VETERANS INITIATIVE

CONSTRUCTION FOR MAINTENANCE AND
IMPROVEMENTS TO EMERGENCY SHELTER IN
WAIANAE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 100 C C

51 . WAHIAWA CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH,
THE

PLANS AND CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION
OF A PEDIATRIC CLINIC. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C C

52 . WAIANAE COMMUNITY RE-DEVELOPMENT
CORPORATION

EQUIPMENT FOR FARM EQUIPMENT FOR
PRODUCTION OF ORGANIC PRODUCE. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 100 C C

53 . WAIMANALO HEALTH CENTER

CONSTRUCTION FOR ENHANCEMENTS TO A
PATIENT-CENTERED HEALTH CARE HOME. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 350 C C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 122
iniiiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 123
H.B. NO. H^i
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
54 . WAIOHULI HAWAIIAN HOMESTEADERS
ASSOCIATION, INC.

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR COMPUTER CENTER
CONSTRUCTION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C C

55 . WEST HAWAII COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER,
INC.

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
CONSTRUCTION OF WORKFORCE HOUSING. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C C

56 . YOUNG WOMEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION
OF OAHU (KOKOKAHI)

CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATIONS TO
JULIETTE M. ATHERTON HALL AND KITCHEN.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C c


57.1 ADULT FRIENDS FOR YOUTH

LAND ACQUISITION AND CONSTRUCTION TO
FUND COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE LAND
ACQUISITION AND OR RENOVATION OF A
PROPERTY THAT WILL BE UTILIZED TO PROVIDE
HIGH RISK YOUTH WITH REDIRECTIONAL
THERAPY SERVICES FOR ADULT FRIENDS FOR
YOUTH. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS■
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C

HB1800 CDl FIN-2 123

Page 124 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
58 ■ 1 AIO FOUNDATION

CONSTRUCTION TO RELOCATE AND
REESTABLISH KNDI'S RADIO TRANSMITTER TO A
RADIO TOWER LOCATED AT KAHAUIKI VILLAGE
FOR AIO FOUNDATION. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING _C 135 C

59.1 ANAINA HOU COMMUNITY PARK

CONSTRUCTION OF A REQUIRED ON-SITE
WATER STORAGE TANK AT ANAINA HOU
COMMUNITY PARK FOR ANAINA HOU COMMUNITY
PARK. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 350 C

60 . 1 ARTS & SCIENCES CENTER

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR AN ASC
OFFICE TRAILER AND REMOVAL OF IRONWOOD
TREES ALONG POST OFFICE ROAD FOR ARTS &
SCIENCES CENTER. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 150 C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 124

Page 125 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

61 . 1 BISHOP MUSEUM

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION FOR A
MULTI-PURPOSE PUBLIC SPACE FOR BISHOP
MUSEUM. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 150 C

62.1 BLOOD BANK OF HAWAII

CONSTRUCTION TO INSTALL COMMERCIAL
GRADE ROOFTOP SOLAR PANELS AT THE KAPOLEI
HEADQUARTERS FOR BLOOD BANK OF HAWAII.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 200 C

63.1 BOYS & GIRLS CLUBS OF MAUI, INC.

CONSTRUCTION FOR A CLUBHOUSE FOR BOYS
& GIRLS CLUBS OF MAUI. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ _C 750 C

6£^ CAMP MOKULEIA

CONSTRUCTION TO RENOVATE THE CABINS,
LODGE, AND DINING HALL FOR CAMP MOKULEIA.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ _C 300 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 125

Page 126 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

65.1 COUNCIL FOR NATIVE HAWAIIAN
ADVANCEMENT

EQUIPMENT FOR THE HAWAIIAN TRADES
ACADEMY TO TRAIN HEAVY EQUIPMENT
OPERATORS ON MAUI FOR COUNCIL FOR NATIVE
HAWAIIAN ADVANCEMENT. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ C 50 C

66.1 DOWNTOWN ART CENTER

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF AN ART
FACILITY IN HONOLULU'S CHINATOWN ARTS
DISTRICT FOR DOWNTOWN ART CENTER. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ C 200 C

67 . 1 FEEDING HAWAII TOGETHER

CONSTRUCTION OF AN EXISTING FOOD
PANTRY FACILITY IN OAHU FOR FEEDING
HAWAII TOGETHER. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ C 170 C

68.1 FILIPINO COMMUNITY CENTER, INC., THE

CONSTRUCTION OF THE COMMUNITY
CENTER IN WAIPAHU, OAHU, TO ADDRESS
ACCUMULATED WEAR AND TEAR FOR THE
FILIPINO COMMUNITY CENTER. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ _C 500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 126

Page 127 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
69.1 FRIENDS OF THE VOLCANO SCHOOL OF ARTS
& SCIENCES

CONSTRUCTION OF CLASSROOMS AND
FACILITIES FOR A PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL
SERVING EAST HAWAII FOR FRIENDS OF THE
VOLCANO SCHOOL OF ARTS & SCIENCES. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 500 C

70.1 GOODWILL INDUSTRIES OF HAWAII, INC.

CONSTRUCTION FOR THE MAPUNAPUNA
WAREHOUSE AND OUTLET FACILITY FOR
GOODWILL INDUSTRIES OF HAWAII. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 500 C

71.1 HALE MAHAOLU
EQUIPMENT FOR KITCHEN AND MEAL
PREPARATION IN PUBLIC
HOUSING FACILITIES IN MAUI COUNTY FOR
HALE MAHAOLU. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ _C 100 C

72.1 HANA HEALTH

CONSTRUCTION OF WORKFORCE HOUSING FOR
MEDICAL, DENTAL, AND BEHAVIORAL
HEALTHCARE SERVICES PROVIDER IN HANA
DISTRICT, MAUI FOR HANA HEALTH. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR _C 500 C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 127

Page 128 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
73.1 HAWAII FOODBANK, INC.

CONSTRUCTION OF A NEW FOODBANK
FACILITY IN WAIPAHU, OAHU FOR THE HAWAII
FOODBANK. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 500 C

74.1 HAWAII KOREAN CULTURAL CENTER, THE

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT TO
RENOVATE AND UPGRADE THE HAWAII KOREAN
CULTURAL CENTER BUILDING FOR THE HAWAII
KOREAN CULTURAL CENTER. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 100 C

75.1 HAWAII MEALS ON WHEELS, INC.

EQUIPMENT FOR PROCUREMENT, AND
DEPLOYMENT OF DELIVERY VEHICLES TO
SUPPORT DAILY MEAL DISTRIBUTION AND
CLIENT SERVICES FOR HAWAII MEALS ON
WHEELS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING _C 130 C

76.1 HAWAII PRIMARY CARE ASSOCIATION

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT FOR
PROJECT DEPLOYMENT OF SOLAR AND STORAGE
MICROGRIDS AT NONPROFIT COMMUNITY HEALTH
CENTERS FOR HAWAII PRIMARY CARE
ASSOCIATION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 128
liillMIIIIIIIIIIIIII

Page 129 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
77 . 1 HAWAII PUBLIC RADIO

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE
REPLACEMENT OF RADIO TRANSMISSION
EQUIPMENT ON TANTALUS FOR HAWAII PUBLIC
RADIO. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 270 C

78.1 HAWAII THEATRE CENTER

DESIGN AND EQUIPMENT FOR
MODERNIZATION, SUSTAINABILITY, AND
RELATED IMPROVEMENTS FOR HAWAII THEATRE
CENTER. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR c 80 C

79.1 HAWAII UNITED OKINAWA ASSOCIATION

CONSTRUCTION FOR THE RENOVATION
PROJECT FOR THE HAWAII OKINAWA CENTER FOR
HAWAII UNITED OKINAWA ASSOCIATION. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR c 500 C

80.1 HAWAIIAN HUMANE SOCIETY

CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATING AND
ENHANCING THE SALLY PORT AREA AT HAWAIIAN
HUMANE SOCIETY'S MOILIILI CAMPUS FOR
HAWAIIAN HUMANE SOCIETY. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR c 250 C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 129
IMIIIilllllllllllllll

Page 130 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
81 -1 HAWAIIAN MISSION CHILDREN'S SOCIETY

EQUIPMENT FOR A PHASED 18-MONTH SITE
RESTORATION PROJECT FOR THE HAWAIIAN
MISSION CHILDREN'S SOCIETY. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 150 C

82.1 HOMESTEAD COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
CORPORATION

EQUIPMENT FOR THE PURCHASE AND
INSTALLATION OF A PHOTOVOLTAIC SOLAR
ENERGY SYSTEM AT THE WEST KAUAI
ENTERPRISE CENTER FOR HOMESTEAD COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 150 C

83.1 HONOLULU MUSEUM OF ART

EQUIPMENT TO INSTALL AN ENERGY
EFFICIENT HVAC SYSTEM FOR HONOLULU MUSEUM
OF ART. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 100 C

SU, HO^O^

PLANS AND DESIGN TO COMPLETE THE
READINESS PHASE FOR UPOLU POINT IN NORTH
KOHALA FOR HO'OLA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ _C 32^


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 130

Page 131 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
85.1 HOSPICE HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF INTERIOR
RENOVATIONS TO THE KAILUA HOME LOCATION
FOR HOSPICE HAWAII. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING C 450 C

86.1 HOSPICE OF HILO

CONSTRUCTION TO RENOVATE EXISTING
HAWAII CARE CHOICES FACILITIES AND
INSTALL INFRASTRUCTURE TO SUPPORT THE
WORKFORCE TRAINING CENTER IN HILO FOR
HOSPICE OF HILO. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ C 1,000 C

87.1 INSTITUTE FOR HUMAN SERVICES, INC.,
THE

CONSTRUCTION TO REMOVE AND REINSTALL
EXISTING SOLAR PANELS AND RECOAT THE ROOF
AT THE SUMNER MEN'S EMERGENCY SHELTER IN
HONOLULU FOR THE INSTITUTE FOR HUMAN
SERVICES. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 160 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 131

Page 132 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
88.1 INNOVATIONS PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL
FOUNDATION

CONSTRUCTION TO RECONFIGURE AND
EXPAND THE FRONT OFFICE AND BUILD TWO
LARGE, COVERED LANAI MEETING SPACES FOR
INNOVATIONS .PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL
FOUNDATION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR c 100 C

89.1 INSPIRATION HAWAII MUSEUM

PLANS AND CONSTRUCTION TO REPAIR
ELECTRICAL OUTLETS FOR INSPIRATION HAWAII
MUSEUM. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 200 C

90.1 INSTITUTE FOR NATIVE PACIFIC
EDUCATION AND CULTURE

CONSTRUCTION TO RENOVATE AND UPGRADE
BUILDING INFRASTRUCTURE TO SUPPORT THE
CENTER FOR INNOVATION AT NANAIKEOLA
WITHIN INPEACE'S NEW FACILITY IN WEST
OAHU FOR INSTITUTE FOR NATIVE PACIFIC
education and CULTURE. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
£2 FL HRS^
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 132

Page 133 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
91 ■ 1 KAHILU THEATRE FOUNDATION

EQUIPMENT FOR THE AUDITORIUM AT
KAHILU THEATRE TO IMPROVE COMMUNITY
EVENTS IN NORTH HAWAII FOR KAHILU THEATRE
FOUNDATION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 50 C

92.1 KAUAI ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BOARD

CONSTRUCTION TO RE-ROOF ZENSHUJI HALL
IN WEST KAUAI TO ADDRESS CRITICAL ROOF
REPLACEMENT NEEDS AND IMPROVE THE
STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY OF THE HALL FOR
KAUAI ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BOARD. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 300 C

93.1 KEIKI 0 KA AINA PRESCHOOL, INC.

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT TO BUILD A
WAIKANE AGRICULTURE INNOVATION HUB FOR
KEIKI 0 KA AINA PRESCHOOL. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 300 C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 133

Page 134 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
94 .1 KUAKINI MEDICAL CENTER

PLANS, DESIGN, AND EQUIPMENT TO
SUPPORT THE RESTORATION OF THE HOSPITAL
EXTERIOR ENVIRONMENT FOR KUAKINI MEDICAL
CENTER. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 200 C

95.1 KUHIO BEACH PRESERVATION SOCIETY

DESIGN FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO KUHIO
BEACH PARK IN WAIKIKI, INCLUDING
IMPROVEMENTS TO ELECTRICAL CAPACITY,
INFRASTRUCTURE RESILIENCY, SAFETY
REQUIREMENTS, AND SHORELINE-APPROPRIATE
DESIGN SOLUTIONS FOR KUHIO BEACH
PRESERVATION SOCIETY. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 300 C

96.1 KUNIA VILLAGE DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION

CONSTRUCTION TO UPGRADE COMPONENTS
AND MAKE REPAIRS TO THE KUNIA VILLAGE
WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT FOR KUNIA
VILLAGE DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 250 C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 134

Page 135 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
97 ■ 1 KUPU

PLANS^^ESIG1<;AND CONSTRUCTION JTO
EXPAND THE HOOKUPU CENTER AT KEWALO BY
RENOVATING AND REPURPOSING WAREHOUSE INTO
AN EDUCATION TO EMPLOYMENT ACTION AND
OPPORTUNITY (E A'O) CENTER FOR YOUTH
TRAINING AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS FOR
KUPU. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 650 C

98■1 LAIOPUA 2020

EQUIPMENT FOR A COMPACT EXCAVATOR AND
TRACTOR/MOWER TO SUPPORT THE EXPANSION
AND MAINTENANCE OF ITS ONSITE GARDEN FOR
LAIOPUA 2020. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR _C 80 C

99.1 LANAI COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER

CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION AND
CONFIGURATION OF THE LANAI COMMUNITY
HEALTH CENTER FOR LANAI COMMUNITY HEALTH
CENTER. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 250 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 135

Page 136 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
100.1 LANAKILA PACIFIC

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO INSTALL A REPLACEMENT HVAC
SYSTEM IN THE HONOLULU FACILITY FOR
LANAKILA PACIFIC. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 500 C

101.1 MALAMA HONUA PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL
FOUNDATION

CONSTRUCTION OF PERMANENT CLASSROOM,
RESTROOMS, AND SUPPORTING FACILITIES FOR
MALTkMA HONUA PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL
FOUNDATION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR _C 200 C

102.1 MANOA HERITAGE CENTER

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO
CONVERT KUALI'I INTO A HISTORIC HOUSE
MUSEUM FOR MANOA HERITAGE CENTER. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 200 C

103.1 MAUI ARTS & CULTURAL CENTER

CONSTRUCTION OF A NEW CLASSROOM AND
RENOVATION OF EXISTING SPACES AT THE
EDUCATION COMPLEX IN MAUI FOR MAUI ARTS &
CULTURAL CENTER. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR _C 500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
136

Page 137
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
104.1 NA KAMA KAI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, AND DESIGN,
TO DEVELOP A YOUTH OCEAN CENTER IN
WAIANAE, OAHU FOR NA KAMA KAI. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 200 C

105.1 OAHU SOCIETY FOR THE PREVENTION OF
CRUELTY TO ANIMALS

CONSTRUCTION FOR FACILITIES AT A NO­
KILL ANIMAL SHELTER IN OAHU FOR OAHU
SOCIETY FOR THE PREVENTION OF CRUELTY TO
ANIMALS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 350 C

106.1 OLELO COMMUNITY MEDIA

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR ROOF
REPLACEMENT AND PHOTOVOLTAIC SYSTEM AT
BROADCASTING FACILITY IN OAHU FOR OLELO
COMMUNITY MEDIA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ C 500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
137

Page 138 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D, 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
107.1 PACIFIC AMERICAN FOUNDATION HAWAII,
INC ■

CONSTRUCTION OF AN EDUCATION FACILITY
IN KANEOHE, OAHU FOR PACIFIC AMERICAN
FOUNDATION HAWAII. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 500 C

108.1 PALOLO CHINESE HOME

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT TO INSTALL
A DEDICATED OUTSIDE -AIR VENTILATION
SYSTEM AND REPLACE AGING AIR-CONDITIONING
CONDENSING AND FAN COIL UNITS FOR PALOLO
CHINESE HOME. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 500 C

109.1 PARENTS AND CHILDREN TOGETHER

LAND ACQUISITION TO COMPLETE THE
PURCHASE OF THE KALIKI-PALAMA PROPERTY TO
BECOME THE PERMANENT HEADQUARTERS FOR
PARENTS AND CHILDREN TOGETHER. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR £ 250 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 138

Page 139 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
110.1 POAMOHO CAMP FOUNDATION

PLANNING, CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT
TO RESTORE AND MAINTAIN RELIABLE POTABLE
WATER SERVICE THROUGH REPAIRS TO THE
PRIMARY WATER PIPELINE SERVING POAMOHO
CAMP FOR POAMOHO CAMP FOUNDATION. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR _C 100 C

111.1 REHABILITATION HOSPITAL OF THE
PACIFIC, THE

CONSTRUCTION OF PLANNED RENOVATIONS
AND UPGRADES TO THE POOL, SHOWER AREAS,
TILE SURFACES, AND ALL OTHER RELATED
AREAS TO RESTORE FUNCTIONALITY, SAFETY
AND ACCESSIBILITY FOR THE REHABILITATION
HOSPITAL OF THE PACIFIC. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 400 C

1 12 . SUPPORTING THE LANGUAGE OF KAUAI,
INC.

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
MATERIALS, DESIGN, PLANS AND CONSTRUCTION
OF AN OUTDOOR PAVILION AT KAWAIKINI NEW
CENTURY PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FOR
SUPPORTING THE LANGUAGE OF KAUAI, INC.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 100 C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 139

Page 140 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
113.1 SURFING THE NATIONS

CONSTRUCTION OF A ROOFING
INFRASTRUCTURE OVER THE FEEDING THE
HUNGRY FOOD DISTRIBUTION COURTYARD FOR
SURFING THE NATIONS. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR _C 35 C

UNITED CHINESE SOCIETY OF HAWAII

CONSTRUCTION FOR MAINTENANCE REPAIRS
AT THE UNITED CHINESE SOCIETY BUILDING
FOR UNITED CHINESE SOCIETY OF HAWAII.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 200 C

UNITED STATES VETERANS INITIATIVE
(U.S.VETS BARBER'S POINT)

CONSTRUCTION AND REPAIRS FOR TENANT
REPAIRS AND FACILITY MAINTENANCE FOR
VETERANS ON OAHU FOR UNITED STATES
VETERANS INITIATIVE (U.S.VETS BARBER'S
POINT). THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ _C 400 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 140

Page 141 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
116.1 WAHIAWA CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH,
TM

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT TO
RENOVATE AND EXPAND THE PEDIATRIC CLINIC,
SCHOOL-BASED HEALTH SITES AND MOBILE
SERVICES FOR THE WAHIAWA CENTER FOR
COMMUNITY HEALTH. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 300 C

117.1 WAIOHULI HAWAIIAN HOMESTEAD
ASSOCIATION, INC

PLANS, CONSTRUCTION AND PROJECT
MANAGEMENT FOR PERIMETER FENCING AND
OTHER IMPROVEMENTS FOR THE WAIOHULI
HAWAIIAN HOMESTEAD ASSOCIATION. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR c 615 C

118.1 WEST HAWAII COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR A
PHARMACY IN KEALAKEKUA FOR WEST HAWAII
COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR c 500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 141
■■iiiiiiiiiiiin

Page 142 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
119.1 YOUNG MEN’S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION OF
HONOLULU

DESIGN TO COMPLETE PLANNING AND
DESIGN PHASE FOR THE NU'UANU YMCA CAMPUS
FOR YOUNG MEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION OF
HONOLULU. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 150 C

120.1 YOUNG MEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION OF
KAUM

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
RESTORATION AND REPLACEMENT WITHIN C7VMP
NAUE FOR YOUNG MEN'S CHRISTIAN
ASSOCIATION OF KAUAI. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR C 250 C

121.1 YOUNG WOMEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION
OF OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO ADVANCE
PHASE III FACILITY RENOVATIONS AT YWCA
KOKOKAHI FOR YOUNG WOMEN'S CHRISTIAN
ASSOCIATION OF OAHU. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR _C 450 C

HB1800 GDI FIN-2 142

Page 143 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
C. TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES

I. DANIEL K. INOUYE INTERNATIONAL
AIRPORT, AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 17,061 E [26,760E]
215, 375 E
TRN IN IN

TRNI04 - GENERAL AVIATION

1.1 KALAELOA AIRPORT, AIRPORT
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 7,001E
TRN N IN

TRNIll - HILO INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT

2. HILO INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT, AIRPORT
IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY .TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 2 6,000 E 7,030 E
TRN IN IN

HB1800 CDl FIN-2
143
■■■■■■ill

Page 144 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN114 - ELLISON ONIZUKA KONA INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT AT KEAHOLE

3. ELLISON ONIZUKA KONA INTERNATIONAL
AIRPORT AT KEAHOLE, AIRPORT
IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 137, 045 E 82,830 E
TRN 10,000 N US

TRN131 - KAHULUI AIRPORT

4 . KAHULUI AIRPORT, AIRPORT
IMPROVEMENTS, MAUI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 52,250 E [-57,500E]
67,000 E
TRN 5,000 N i N

TRN133 - HANA AIRPORT

4 . 1 HANA AIRPORT, AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS,
MANI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 11,386 E
T^ N 1 N
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 144

Page 145 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN141 - MOLOKAI AIRPORT

5. MOLOKAI AIRPORT, AIRPORT
IMPROVEMENTS, MOLOKAI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 6,230 E E
TRN 2,000 N N

TRN161 - LIHUE AIRPORT

6. ■ LIHUE AIRPORT, AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS,
KAUAI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 9, 225 E [5,140E]
8,096 E
TRN 1 N 4, 600 N

TRN195 - AIRPORTS ADMINISTRATION

7. AIRFIELD IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR AIRFIELD
IMPROVEMENTS AT STATEWIDE AIRPORTS. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 154,877 E 162B]
667,162 E
TRN l, 800 N 60,000 N


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 145

Page 146 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
8. AIRPORT DEVELOPMENT, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
STATEWIDE IMPROVEMENTS. IMPROVEMENTS
INCLUDE PLANNING STUDIES, SAFETY,
COMPLIANCE, OPERATIONAL EFFICIENCY,
DEVELOPMENT, AND MANAGEMENT SUPPORT
SERVICES. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 50,000E [39,OOOE]
49,500 E
TRN IN IN

8 . 1 AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION FOR PREVIOUSLY APPROVED
PROJECTS AT STATEWIDE AIRPORTS USING
ALTERNATIVE FUNDS (OTHER FUNDS FROM
PASSENGER FACILITY CHARGES).
TOTAL FUNDING TRN X 31,000 X

9. AIRPORTS DIVISION CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECT STAFF COSTS,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
COSTS RELATED TO WAGES AND FRINGE
BENEFITS FOR PERMANENT PROJECT FUNDED
STAFF POSITIONS FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROJECTS FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION'S
AIRPORTS DIVISION. PROJECT MAY ALSO
INCLUDE FUNDS FOR NON-PERMANENT CAPITAL
IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM RELATED POSITIONS
(OTHER FUNDS FROM PASSENGER FACILITY
CHARGES).
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 7,500B 7,500B
TRN 200 X 200 X


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 146

Page 147 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
10 . FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS OF VARIOUS FACILITIES AND
OTHER RELATED IMPROVEMENTS. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 89,500 E [56,500E]
60,500 E
TRN 1 N 1 N

11 . LUMP SUM CIP - AIRPORTS PROJECT
ADJUSTMENT FUND, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A
CONTINGENCY FUND FOR PROJECT ADJUSTMENT
PURPOSES SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE
APPROPRIATIONS ACT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 E 4 E

12 . RENTAL CAR FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE
CONSOLIDATED CAR RENTAL FACILITIES FOR
THE RENTAL CAR AGENCIES AND OTHER RELATED
IMPROVEMENTS (OTHER FUNDS FROM CUSTOMER
FACILITY CHARGES).
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 301,000 X X


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 147
■■Hiaiiiiiii

Page 148 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN301 - HONOLULU HARBOR

13. HONOLULU HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRTV-l PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT HONOLULU HARBOR, OAHU. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 24,992 B 39, 992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R

TRN303 - KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR

14. KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR,
OAHU. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 B 34,992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 148

Page 149 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN311 - HILO HARBOR

15. HILO HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT HILO HARBOR, HAWAII. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 B 44,992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R

TRN331 - KAHULUI HARBOR

16 . KAHULUI HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, MAUI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT KAHULUI HARBOR, MAUI. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 B 9,992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 149
iHiniiiiiirai

Page 150 H.B. NO. Ja,
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN341 - KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR

17. KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS,
MOLOKAI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR, MOLOKAI.
THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 B 4 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R

TRN361 - NAWILIWILI HARBOR

18 . NAWILIWILI HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT NAWILIWILI HARBOR, KAUAI. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 9,992 B 4,992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 150

Page 151 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN351 - KAUMALAPAU HARBOR

19. KAUMALAPAU HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, LANAI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT KAUMALAPAU HARBOR, LANAI. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 B 1,992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R

TRN395 - HARBORS ADMINISTRATION

20. COMMERCIAL HARBORS ADMINISTRATIVE
INITIATIVES, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR COST RELATED TO
STATEWIDE IMPROVEMENTS FOR THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION'S HARBORS DIVISION,
STATEWIDE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 14, 992 B 14,992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
151

Page 152 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D, 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
21 . MODERNIZATION PROGRAM - HARBORS
DIVISION CIP PROJECT STAFF COSTS,
STATEWIDE

PLANS FOR COSTS RELATED TO WAGES AND
FRINGE BENEFITS FOR PERMANENT HARBOR
MODERNIZATION PLAN PROJECT FUNDED STAFF
POSITIONS FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF
MODERNIZATION PROGRAM PROJECTS FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION'S HARBORS
DIVISION, STATEWIDE. PROJECTS MAY ALSO
INCLUDE FUNDS FOR NON-PERMANENT CAPITAL
IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM RELATED POSITIONS.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 2,500 B 2,500 B

TRN501 - OAHU HIGHWAYS

22 . ALA WAI CANAL AND WATERWAYS DEBRIS
CLEARING, OAHU

DESIGN AND IMPLEMENT PILOT PROJECT
FOR ALA WAI CANAL AND WATERWAYS TO
PREVENT DEBRIS FROM FLOWING INTO THE ALA
WAI SMALL BOAT HARBOR AND OCEAN.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 750 C C

22.1 ALA WAI WATERSHED DEBRIS MANAGEMENT
SYSTEM, OAHU

PLAN, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF A
DEBRIS MANAGEMENT SYSTEM WITHIN THE ALA
WAI WATERSHED TO ASSIST IN MANAGEMENT OF
NATURAL AND MAN-MADE DEBRIS TO CONTROL OR
PREVENT THE FLOW OF DEBRIS INTO THE ALA
WAI CANAL AND SMALL BOAT HARBOR AND THE
WAIKIKI AREA.
TOTAL FUNDING T^ _C 2,500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 152

Page 153 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
23. INTERSTATE ROUTE H-1 IMPROVEMENTS,
KUALAKAI INTERCHANGE TO WAIAWA
INTERCHANGE, OAHU

DESIGN FOR THE ADDITION OF A TRAVEL
LANE IN EACH DIRECTION OF INTERSTATE
ROUTE H-1, BETWEEN KUALAKAI INTERCHANGE
AND WAIAWA INTERCHANGE. THIS PROJECT IS
DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL
AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 400 E 800 E
TRN l, 600 N 3,200 N

24 . INTERSTATE ROUTE H-1, KUNIA EAST
BOUND ON-RAMP, OAHU

PLANS FOR A KUNIA EAST BOUND ON-RAMP;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,500E E

25 . INTERSTATE ROUTE H-3, FINISH WORK AND
MITIGATION, JUNCTION AT H-1 TO KMCAS,
OAHU

CONSTRUCTION FOR FINISH WORK RELATED
TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF INTERSTATE ROUTE
H-3. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 2,428E E
TRN 5, 654 N N

26. KAMEHAMEHA HIGHWAY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A
BARRIER AND SIGNAGE ALONG KAMEHAMEHA
HIGHWAY NEAR THE KIPAPA GULCH BRIDGE TO
ENHANCE PUBLIC SAFETY, PREVENT
UNAUTHORIZED ENCAMPMENTS, AND ENSURE
UNOBSTRUCTED ACCESS TO THE HIGHWAY.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN l, 850 E E

HB1800 GDI FIN-2 153

Page 154
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
27 . KTiMEHAMEHA HIGHWAY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO KAMEHAMEHA HIGHWAY
BETWEEN MILILANI AND PEARL CITY. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 3,720 E E
TRN 14,880 N N

28 . LAND ACQUISITION TO SUPPORT THE NORTH
SHORE SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITIES PLAN,
OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, AND DESIGN
FOR ACQUISITION, DUE DILIGENCE, AND EIS
FOR PARCEL LOCATED AT TMK: 6-4-001-015.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4,695 C C

29 - PAAKEA ROAD, OAHU

CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO
PAAKEA ROAD FOR USE AS AN EMERGENCY
PARALLEL ROUTE ON THE WEST COAST OF OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 5,000 E E

29.1 WAIANAE COAST FARRINGTON HIGHWAY
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

LAND ACQUISITION AND CONSTRUCTION TO
EXTEND THE FIFTH LANE TO WIDEN FARRINGTON
HIGHWAY; CREATE PARALLEL ROUTE FOR THE
WAIANAE COAST; AND OTHER TRAFFIC
IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED
TO SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS, SYSTEM
PRESERVATION, AND TRAFFIC CONGESTION
RELIEF. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY
TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING
AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 10,000 E
T^ N 38,400 N

HB1800 CDl FIN-2

Page 155 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO, TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN511 - HAWAII HIGHWAYS

29.2 ACCELERATION LANE FROM MAMAKI STREET
ONTO ROUTE 11 GOING HILO BOUND,
HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO
ADD AN ACCELERATION LANE FROM MAMAKI
STREET ONTO ROUTE 11 GOING HILO BOUND.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 1, 450 E

30 . ALTERNATE ROUTE SELECTION STUDY FOR
PUNA MAKAI ALTERNATE ROUTE, HAWAII

PLANS FOR ALTERNATIVE ROUTE FOR PUNA
MAKAI.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1, 500 E E

31 . ALTERNATE ROUTE SELECTION STUDY FOR
PUNA MAUKA, HAWAII

PLANS FOR ALTERNATIVE ROUTE FOR PUNA
MAUKA; PROVIDED THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL
BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE COUNTY OF HAWAII
CONTRIBUTES MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR
STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1, 000 E E
TRN 1, 000 S S

31.1 HIGHWAY 130 IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
HIGHWAY 130 IMPROVEMENTS INTO KEAAU
TRANSFER STATION.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 2, 000 E


HB1800 GDI FIN-2
155
iiHiiiiiniwiiiiii

Page 156 1800
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
32 . PUAINAKO STREET IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR CORRIDOR
IMPROVEMENTS ALONG PUAINAKO STREET. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 2,000 E 4,800 E
TRN N 19, 200 N

32.1 ROUTE 11 IMPROVEMENTS AT NANI KAILUA
DRIVE AND LAKO STREET, HAWAII

DESIGN FOR INTERSECTION IMPROVEMENTS
TO INCLUDE WIDENING, BICYCLE AND
PEDESTRIAN IMPROVEMENTS, AND DRAINAGE AND
UTILITY WORK. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 380 E
T^ JI 1,520 N

32.2 TRAFFIC SIGNAL IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

CONSTRUCTION FOR TRAFFIC LIGHTS AT
KALOKO/MAMALAHOA INTERSECTION AND
KAIMINANI/MAMALAHOA INTERSECTION. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 4,700 E
N UI


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 156

Page 157 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN531 - MAUI HIGHWAYS

33. HANA HIGHWAY IMPROVEMENTS, HUELO TO
HANA, MAUI

CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVING, UPGRADING
AND/OR REPAIRING ROADWAYS, BRIDGES,
WALLS, DRAINAGE STRUCTURES, GUARDRAILS,
AND OTHER FACILITIES ON ROUTE 360 HANA
HIGHWAY. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY
TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING
AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,000 B B
TRN 4,000 N N

33.1 HONOAPIILANI HIGHWAY COASTAL
MITIGATION, VIC. OF UKUMEHAME TO VIC.
OF LAUNIUPOKO, MAUI

LAND ACQUISITION AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
MITIGATION SOLUTIONS TO THE ISSUE OF
SHORELINE EROSION ALONG HONOAPIILANI
HIGHWAY, FROM UKUMEHAME TO LAUNIUPOKO.
THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 76, 700 E
T^ 306,800 N

33.2 LAHAINA REPAIR, REHABILITATION,
AND/OR REINSTALLATION, MAUI

CONSTRUCTION FOR MAJOR REPAIRS,
REHABILITATION, AND/OR REINSTALLATION OF
STATE HIGHWAY FACILITIES IN LAHAINA AS A
RESULT OF 2023 SEVERE WEATHER EVENTS.
THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 400 E
T^ N 1,600 N


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 157

Page 158 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
34. PIILANI HIGHWAY WIDENING, KILOHANA
DRIVE TO WAILEA IKE DRIVE, MAUI

LAND ACQUISITION FOR SAFETY,
OPERATIONAL, AND CAPACITY IMPROVEMENTS
FOR VEHICLES AND MULTIMODAL USERS ALONG
PIILANI HIGHWAY FROM KILOHANA DRIVE TO
WAILEA IKE DRIVE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 100 E
TRN N 400 N

35. WAIALE ROAD EXTENSION, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A
WAIALE ROAD EXTENSION TO THE WAIKAPU
COUNTRY TOWN PROJECT. THIS PROJECT IS
DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL
AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 5,000 E E
TRN 1 N N

TRN561 - KAUAI HIGHWAYS

36. KAUMUALII HIGHWAY IMPROVEMENTS, LIHUE
TO WEST OF MALUHIA ROAD, KAUAI

LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR WIDENING OF KAUMUALII
HIGHWAY, LIHUE TO WEST OF MALUHIA ROAD,
FROM TWO TO FOUR LANES. THIS PROJECT IS
DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL
AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,000 E [5,200E]
5,400 E
TRN 4, 000 N [20,SOON]
21,600 N


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 158
■■■■■■in

Page 159 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
36.1 LIMA OLA AND KAUMUALII HIGHWAY, KAUAI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR LIMA OLA
AND KAUMUALII HIGHWAY INTERSECTION
IMPROVEMENTS; PROVIDED THAT MATCHING
FUNDS BE PROVIDED BY THE COUNTY OF KAUAI.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 3,000 E
TRN _S 3, 000 S

TRN595 - HIGHWAYS ADMINISTRATION

36.2 ELECTRIC VEHICLE (EV) FACILITIES,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
THE INSTALLATION OF ELECTRIC VEHICLE
CHARGING STATIONS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN B 798 B
TRN E 1,997 E
TRN Ji 11,180 N

36.3 HEIGHT MODERNIZATION FACILITIES,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR HEIGHT
MODERNIZATION FACILITIES ON VARIOUS
ISLANDS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY
TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING
AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 4,029 E
T^ N 4,172 N


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 159

Page 160 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
37. HIGHWAY DRAINAGE IMPROVEMENTS,
STATEWIDE

LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR DRAINAGE IMPROVEMENTS TO
HIGHWAY FACILITIES INCLUDING INSTALLATION
OF DRAINAGE FACILITIES, CATCH BASINS,
GRATED DROP INLETS, LINED SWALES,
HEADWALLS, AND CULVERTS, DRYWELLS,
DITCHES, AND BASINS AT VARIOUS LOCATIONS.
THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,348 B B
TRN 3, 090 E 1,600 E
TRN 4, 360 N 4,000 N

38 . HIGHWAY ENVIRONMENTAL MITIGATION AND
REMEDIATION, STATEWIDE

LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR ENVIRONMENTAL MITIGATION
AND REMEDIATION MEASURES, INCLUDING
EROSION CONTROL INSTALLATIONS AND BEST
MANAGEMENT PRACTICES AT VARIOUS
LOCATIONS, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4,250 E 4,000 E

38 . 1 HIGHWAY FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR MAJOR
REPAIRS, REHABILITATION, UPGRADES,
MODERNIZATION, AND/OR INSTALLATION OF
HIGHWAY FACILITIES SUPPORTING STAFF
FUNCTIONS AND OPERATIONS. THIS PROJECT IS
DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL
AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 2, 663 E


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 160
IlilWIHIinHilll

Page 161 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
38.2 HIGHWAY LIGHTING IMPROVEMENTS,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR ENHANCED
ILLUMINATION FOR PEDESTRIANS, BICYCLISTS,
AND OTHER USERS OF HIGHWAY FACILITIES TO
PROVIDE GREATER VISIBILITY AT CROSSINGS
AND OTHER WARRANTED AREAS. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 4,655 E
T^ N

39 . HIGHWAY PLANNING, STATEWIDE

PLANS FOR FEDERAL AID AND NON-FEDERAL
AID PROGRAMS AND PROJECTS THAT INCLUDE
ROADWAY CLASSIFICATION, DATA COLLECTION,
LONG- AND MID-RANGE PLANNING,
TRANSPORTATION NEEDS STUDIES, HRS
343/NEPA STUDIES, CORRIDOR STUDIES,
SCOPING, AND BRIDGE EVALUATIONS. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN B 500 B
TRN 962 E E
TRN 3,848 N N

40 . HIGHWAY PROJECT CLOSEOUT, STATEWIDE

LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR COMPLETION AND CLOSEOUT
OF PROJECTS IN CLOSING STAGES AND/OR FOR
PROJECTS REQUIRING FUNDS FOR FINAL
SETTLEMENT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 800 E 900 E
TRN 2 N 3 N


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
161
■HIIHilllllll

Page 162 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
41. HIGHWAY RESEARCH, STATEWIDE

PLANS FOR FEDERAL AID AND NON-FEDERAL
AID RESEARCH AND PROJECTS, INCLUDING
TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER AND WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 600 B 1,400 B
TRN 4,425 E 4,300 E
TRN 20,TOIN [i7-r2-&W]
17,360 N

42 . HIGHWAY SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO HIGHWAY
FACILITIES NECESSARY FOR HIGHWAY SYSTEM
SAFETY. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY
TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING
AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,4 05 B 300 B
TRN 11,308 E 12,190 E
TRN 24,994 N 9, 560 N

43 . HIGHWAY STRUCTURAL FACILITIES
PROGRAM, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR THE REPLACEMENT,
UPGRADE, REHABILITATION, AND/OR MAJOR
REPAIR OF HIGHWAY STRUCTURES, INCLUDING
BRIDGES, TUNNELS, METAL CULVERTS, AND
DESTINATION SIGN STRUCTURES. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 14,063 B 11,920 B
TRN 66, 686 E 72, 603 E
TRN 396,400 N 338,094 N


■ HB1 ■ 800 ■ G ■ DI ■ FI ■ N-2 ■ 162

Page 163 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
>->i
^u
^4iu\oJ--ooo\o
^-iab>uu.
m\o
^ooo\oi-i)st
M'
Ui«a\9
^ooo'o
44. HIGHWAY SYSTEM ENHANCEMENT, STATEWIDE
PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE FOR AND IMPROVE
HIGHWAY SYSTEM ENHANCEMENTS, INCLUDING
PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLE FACILITIES. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 990 B 610 B
TRN 15,738 E
8,276 E
TRN 26, 502 N [17,717N]
23,349 N
45. HIGHWAY SYSTEM PRESERVATION
IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE
CONSTRUCTION FOR THE PRESERVATION OF
THE STATE HIGHWAY SYSTEM AND ITS
FACILITIES, INCLUDING PAVEMENT, AND
SIGNAGE, AND THE ADDRESS OF SHORELINE AND
BRIDGE SCOUR ISSUES. THIS PROJECT IS
DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL
AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 2,540 B . 4,513 B
TRN 23,361E E
TRN 106,104 N 1 N
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 163

Page 164 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
46. HIGHWAY TRAFFIC OPERATIONAL
IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO EXISTING
HIGHWAY FACILITIES FOR MORE EFFICIENT
TRAFFIC FLOW. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,775B B
TRN 26,0 64 E [LQ-, lOOE]
42,570 E
TRN 32,394 N [4e-HL&0N]
135,480 N
TRN 700 S S

46.1 HIGHWAY TUNNEL PROGRAM, STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION FOR MAJOR REPAIRS,
UPGRADES, AND REHABILITATION OF HIGHWAY
TUNNELS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY
TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING
AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 5,166 E
TRN 20,664 N

47 . PACIFIC PALISADES, OAHU

PLANS FOR AN EMERGENCY EGRESS/INGRESS
ROUTE FOR PACIFIC PALISADES.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN l, 000 C C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 164
■iinniiHiin

Page 165 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
D. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
HTH840 - ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT

1. SAFE DRINKING WATER REVOLVING FUND,
STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE STATE MATCH
FUNDS FOR FEDERAL CAPITALIZATION GRANTS
FOR DRINKING WATER TREATMENT REVOLVING
LOAN FUND, PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 340E, HRS.
THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 5,913 C 5,913 C
HTH 29, 558 N 29, 558 N

1.1 WAIMANO RIDGE, HALE OLA ROOF
REPLACEMENT, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE REPLACEMENT OF THE HALE
OLA BUILDING ROOF AND GUTTER SYSTEM.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH C 1,615 C

2. WASTEWATER TREATMENT REVOLVING FUND
FOR POLLUTION CONTROL, STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION FUNDS TO PROVIDE STATE
MATCH FOR FEDERAL CAPITALIZATION GRANTS
FOR WASTEWATER PROJECTS. FUNDS TO BE
TRANSFERRED TO THE WATER POLLUTION
CONTROL REVOLVING FUND PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 342D, HRS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 5,082 C 5,082 C
HTH 25, 406 N 25,406 N


HB1800 GDI FIN-2
165

Page 166 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
LNR401 - ECOSYSTEM PROTECTION AND RESTORATION

3 . ANUENUE FISHERIES RESEARCH CENTER
ANNEX, ROOF REPAIR/PHOTOVOLTAIC
SYSTEM INSTALLATION, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
ROOF REPAIR AND INSTALLATION OF A
PHOTOVOLTAIC SYSTEM AT THE ANUENUE
FISHERIES RESEARCH CENTER ANNEX (AFRC
ANNEX).
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 750 C C

3.1 DAR ANUENUE FISHERIES RESEARCH CENTER
(AFRC), OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
AFRC DEFERRED MAINTENANCE AND CESSPOOL
CONVERSION AND SEWER CONNECTION; GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING C 5, 500 C

3.2 DAR WAIANAE ANCHIALINE POOL COMPLEX
FENCE INSTALLATION, PHASES II AND
III, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF
WAIANAE PROPERTY FENCE, PHASE II AND
HIGHWAY FENCE PLANNING, PHASE III TO
SUPPORT THE AREA'S NATURAL RESOURCES.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR _C 500 C

4 . FISHING ACCESS IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT, AND RELATED WORK FOR
IMPROVEMENTS ACROSS FISHING AREAS ON
OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 400 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 166

Page 167 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
LNR402 - NATIVE RESOURCES AND FIRE PROTECTION PROGRAM

5. KAWAINUI MARSH PROTECTION AND
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
PREDATOR FENCING, BUFFERS, AND ACCESS
IMPROVEMENTS, VICINITY OF KAWAINUI LEVEE
TO KAWAINUI MODEL AIRPLANE FIELD.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 8, 750 C C

5.1 KILAUEA RADIO REPEATER, KAUAI

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES FOR THE KILAUEA RADIO
REPEATER UPGRADES AND ASSOCIATED
EQUIPMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING I^ C 350^

5.2 MAUI BASEYARD OFFICE ROOF REPAIR AND
REPLACE, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR REPAIR OF LEAKING BASEYARD
OFFICE ROOF.
TOTAL FUNDING C 750 C

6. POHAKEA FIRE PREVENTION AND
SUPPRESSION INFRASTRUCTURE, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR A SECTION OF DLNR LANDS IN
WEST MAUI HIGHLY PRONE TO WILDFIRE DUE TO
INVASIVE GRASSES. THE RECENT ACQUISITION
OF THREE WELLS AND A 750,00O-GALLON WATER
TANK WILL ENABLE THE BRANCH TO REPLACE
HAZARDOUS FUEL LOADS WITH GREEN BREAKS,
RIPARIAN CORRIDORS, AND GRAZING BREAKS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 1,750 C C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 167
■iimiiHiiiini

Page 168 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
6.1 WEST KAUAI BASEYARD, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
CONTINUED DEVELOPMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT
OF LAND AND NATURAL RESOURCES WEST KAUAI
BASEYARD; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 8,000 C

6.2 WEST KAUAI DLNR RESOURCES OFFICES,
KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
UPGRADES TO WEST KAUAI DLNR OFFICES AND
INFRASTRUCTURE IN HANAPEPE, INCLUDING
ELECTRICAL, PLUMBING, ROOF, SECURITY
SYSTEM, FENCING AND AIR CONDITIONING
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 1,000 C

LNR404 - WATER RESOURCES

7. DEEP MONITOR WELLS, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION TO CONSTRUCT AND/OR REPAIR
DEEP MONITOR WELLS STATEWIDE TO MONITOR
THE HEALTH OF DRINKING WATER AQUIFERS;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, AND OTHER
RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2,000 C C

8. KEAUHOU AQUIFER SYSTEM, HAWAII

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR TWO DEEP MONITOR WELLS
.FOR THE KEAUHOU AQUIFER SYSTEM TO MONITOR
THE HEALTH OF THE DRINKING WATER AQUIFER;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, AND OTHER
RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 4,000 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
168

Page 169 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

LNR405 - CONSERVATION AND RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT

9. DOCARE HAWAII BRANCH OFFICE BUILDING
REPLACEMENT[RENOVATION], HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
RENOVATION] REPLACEMENT OF THE [DOGAR&
HAWAII BRANCH] OFFICE BUILDING AND
RELATED WORK DUE TO SEVERE TERMITE
INFESTATION AND[RESULTING IN] MAJOR
STRUCTURAL DAMAGE [TO THE STRUCTURE,
■aiGLUDING-INTERIOR WALLS, SUPPORT BEAHIS,
BOORS, AND RELATED WORK].
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2,000 C 1,000 C

10. LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, AND DESIGN
FOR DIVISION OF CONSERVATION AND
RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT FACILITY, OAHU.

LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, AND DESIGN
FOR DIVISION OF CONSERVATION AND
RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT FACILITY, OAHU, TMK
7-4-001-025.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2,450C C

LNR407 - NATURAL AREA RESERVES AND WATERSHED MANAGEMENT

11. KAWAINUI MARSH, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF
WATER TRANSFER SYSTEM FROM KAWAINUI MARSH
ACROSS THE KAWAINUI FLOOD CONTROL LEVEE
TO HAMAKUA MARSH AND IMPROVEMENTS TO ROAD
AND ACCESS TO KAWAINUI FLOOD CONTROL
LEVEE FOR MAINTENANCE TO USAGE STANDARDS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2,200C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
169
■WlllllilllHIIIIIII

Page 170 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
12. WATERSHED PROTECTION AND INITIATIVES,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT TO PROTECT
AND RESTORE FORESTED WATERSHEDS AND OTHER
WATER SUPPLIES, STATEWIDE; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES, AND ALL PROJECT RELATED
COSTS. THE LEGISLATURE FINDS AND DECLARES
THAT THE APPROPRIATION IS IN THE PUBLIC
INTEREST AND FOR THE PUBLIC'S HEALTH,
SAFETY, AND GENERAL WELFARE OF THE STATE.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 5, 000 C 5,000 C

LNR906 - LNR - NATURAL AND PHYSICAL ENVIRONMENT

12.1 HAWAII PACIFIC UNIVERSITY HAWAII LOA
CAMPUS ACQUISITION AND RENOVATION,
OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN AND
CONSTRUCTION TO ACQUIRE AND RENOVATE THE
APPROXIMATELY 132-ACRE PROPERTY FORMERLY
OCCUPIED BY HAWAII PACIFIC UNIVERSITY'S
HAWAII LOA CAMPUS TO CONSOLIDATE DLNR
DIVISIONS CURRENTLY LEASING SPACE AROUND
OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING 1^ C 18,000 C

12.2 RED HILL REMEDIATION, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
ENVIRONMENTAL STUDIES AND MONITORING FOR
RED HILL REMEDIATION; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR £ 000 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
170

Page 171 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
E. HEALTH
HTHIOO - COMMUNICABLE DISEASE AND PUBLIC HEALTH NURSING

1. KALAUPAPA SETTLEMENT, CARE HOME
IMPROVEMENTS, MOLOKAI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR NECESSARY
IMPROVEMENTS TO PROVIDE FOR HEALTH AND
SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND OTHER CODE
REQUIREMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 2,500 C C

2. KALAUPAPA SETTLEMENT, CLOSE C&D
LANDFILL, AND INSTALL SYNTHETIC COVER
LAYER AT MSW LANDFILL, MOLOKAI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO CLOSE
LANDFILLS AND INSTALL SYNTHETIC COVER.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 5, 500 C C

2.1 KALAUPAPA SETTLEMENT, REMOVE
UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANKS, MOLOKAI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION NECESSARY TO
CLOSE AND REMOVE UNDERGROUND STORAGE
TANKS AT KALAUPAPA GAS STATION, TO COMPLY
WITH STATE AND FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS C 2,525 C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 171

Page 172 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HTH211 - KAHUKU HOSPITAL

3. KAHUKU MEDICAL CENTER, LUMP SUM
PROJECTS, OAHU

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR RENOVATION AND IMPROVEMENTS OF KAHUKU
MEDICAL CENTER BUILDING AND CAMPUS;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 5, 800 C 5, 000 C

3 ■ I KAHUKU MEDICAL CENTER, MAMMOGRAPHY
UNIT, OAHU

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR A MTkMMOGRAPHY UNIT.
TOTAL FUNDING liTL C 612 C

HTH212 - HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION - REGIONS

4. HOOLA LAHUI HAWAII, KAUAI

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A MEDICAL AND
DENTAL OUTPATIENT CLINIC FOR A FEDERALLY
QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTER AND NATIVE
HAWAIIAN HEALTH CARE SYSTEM SITE.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH l,500C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 172

Page 173 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
4.1 HILO BENIOFF MEDICAL CENTER, CAMPUS
PAVING, LIGHTING, AND PARKING, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
PARKING AREAS IMPROVEMENTS INCLUDING
PAVING, DRAINAGE, AND LIGHTING TO PROVIDE
SAFETY AND VISIBILITY FOR PATIENTS,
VISITORS, AND STAFF TO PARK THEIR CARS TO
ACCESS HEALTHCARE SERVICES AND WORKPLACE.
TOTAL FUNDING _C 3, 000 C

4.2 HILO BENIOFF MEDICAL CENTER,
EMERGENCY POWER, GENERATOR
REPLACEMENT, HAWAII

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR ACUTE FACILITY EMERGENCY POWER,
GENERATOR REPLACEMENT, AND EXPANSION OF
POWER.
TOTAL FUNDING _C 2,000 C

4.3 HILO BENIOFF MEDICAL CENTER,
EMERGENCY ROOM HVAC, HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR SELECTIVE
DEMOLITION AND NEW CONSTRUCTION TO
RESTORE DESIGNED FUNCTION TO THE
EMERGENCY ROOM HVAC SYSTEM.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH _C 1,500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 173
iiniiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 174 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HILO BENIOFF MEDICAL CENTER, PLUMBING
REPAIRS AND RENOVATIONS IN THE ACUTE
FACILITY, HAWAII

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR THE ACUTE FACILITY PLUMBING UPGRADES
AND REPLACEMENT OF THE OPERATING ROOM
HVAC SYSTEM.
TOTAL FUNDING C 5, 000 C

5. KAU HOSPITAL, KEAAU OUTPATIENT
CENTER, HAWAII

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR SITE WORK FOR A NEW AMBULATORY CARE
CENTER IN KEAAU, PROVIDED THAT NO FUNDS
SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE UNLESS MATCHED
DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR IN CASH OR BY IN-KIND
DONATIONS BY THE PRIVATE SECTOR.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH C 25,000 C
HTH R 25,000 R

6. LUMP SUM HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS
CORPORATION - HAWAII REGION, HAWAII

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR THE HAWAII REGIONS OF THE HAWAII
HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS AND RENOVATIONS INCLUDING
RENOVATIONS AND/OR EXPANSION OF
FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 5, 500 C 4,300 C


■HB1■80■0 C■Dl ■FI■N-2■ 174

Page 175 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
7. LUMP SUM HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS
CORPORATION - KAUAI REGION, KAUAI

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR THE KAUAI REGION OF THE HAWAII HEALTH
SYSTEMS CORPORATION FOR IMPROVEMENTS AND
RENOVATIONS INCLUDING NEW FACILITIES,
RENOVATION, EXPANSION, AND/OR REPLACEMENT
OF FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 20,000 C 12,500 C

8. SAMUEL MAHELONA MEMORIAL HOSPITAL
MASTER PLAN, KAUAI

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR DEVELOPMENT OF A
MASTER PLAN FOR SAMUEL MAHELONA MEMORIAL
HOSPITAL, INCLUDING CONNECTOR ROAD
PLANNING.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 175
■nllllllllllll■ll

Page 176 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
8.1 SAMUEL MAHELONA MEMORIAL HOSPITAL,
KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
RENOVATIONS OF THE SAMUEL MAHELONA
MEMORIAL HOSPITAL CAMPUS, INCLUDING THE
DEMOLITION OF THE FACILITIES BUILDING AND
ADJACENT WAREHOUSE BUILDINGS TO CLEAR
SPACE FOR THE NEW BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
FACILITY AND PARKING LOT, RENOVATION OF A
VACANT BUILDING TO ACCOMMODATE THE ADULT
WITH DISABILITIES DAY SERVICES PROGRAM,
RENOVATION OF THE SMOKE STACK WING OF THE
FACILITIES DEPARTMENT, TEMPORARY LOOP
ROAD CONNECTOR DRIVEWAY, CIVIL
ENGINEERING DESIGN WORK FOR THE CONNECTOR
ROAD FROM THE HOSPITAL TO KUHIO HIGHWAY,
AND FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF WORKFORCE
HOUSING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH C 16, 600 C

8.2 WEST HAWAII MEDICAL OFFICE BUILDING
(MOB), DESIGN, PLANNING, SITE
PREPARATION/INFRASTRUCTURE, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR MULTI-PHASE PROJECT TO
CONSTRUCT A WEST HAWAII OUTPATIENT CARE
CENTER. THIS INITIAL PHASE INCLUDES SITE
PREPARATION, MULTI-PHASE CONCEPTUAL
DESIGN, AND PERMITTED PLANS FOR PROVIDER
OFFICES, PATIENT EXTkM ROOMS, WALK
IN/URGENT CARE SETTING, ANCILLARY
SERVICES (LAB/RADIOLOGY, ETC.); SITE
WOULD INCLUDE OUTPATIENT PRIMARY CARE AND
MULTI SPECIALTY MEDICAL OFFICE SPACE.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH C 50,000 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 176
IMIIIIIIIIIIIIilllil

Page 177 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
9. WHR KONA COMMUNITY HOSPITAL -
EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE RECONFIGURATION AND
RENOVATION OF THE EMERGENCY ROOM AND
ADJACENT CRITICAL CARE FACILITIES.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 1,339 C 11,909 C

HTH214 - MAUI HEALTH SYSTEM, A KFH LLC

10. LUMP SUM MAUI HEALTH SYSTEM,
FACILITIES REPAIR, RENOVATIONS AND
UPGRADES, MAUI AND LANAI

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS, REPAIRS,
RENOVATIONS, EXPANSION, MODERNIZATION AND
UPGRADES TO MAUI MEMORIAL MEDICAL CENTER
(MMMC), KULA HOSPITAL (KH), AND LANAI
COMMUNITY HOSPITAL (LCH).
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 6, 000 C 6, 000 C

HTH215 - HHSC - OAHU REGION

11. LUMP SUM HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS
CORPORATION, OAHU REGION, OAHU

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR THE OAHU REGION OF THE HAWAII HEALTH
SYSTEMS CORPORATION FOR IMPROVEMENTS AND
RENOVATIONS INCLUDING RENOVATIONS AND/OR
EXPANSION OF FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 5,600 C 5,110 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 177

Page 178 H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HTH430 - ADULT MENTAL HEALTH - INPATIENT

12. HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, HALE HOOLA
BUILDING, RENOVATIONS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR RENOVATIONS TO THE HAWAII
STATE HOSPITAL.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 16,000C ll,000C

13. HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, HEALTH AND
SAFETY, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR NECESSARY
IMPROVEMENTS TO PROVIDE FOR HEALTH AND
SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND OTHER CODE
REQUIREMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 3,150C 5,750 C

14. HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, REPAIR CHILLED
WATER LINE AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS,
OAHU

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
TO REPAIR UNDERGROUND CHILLED WATER LINE
AND OTHER RELATED IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS l, 000 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 178
lUllliillllllllllU

Page 179 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
15. HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, WATER SYSTEM
IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER WORK, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR WATER
SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 3,500C C

HTH501 - DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

15.1 WAIMANO HALE COMPLEX, HEALTH AND
SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR NECESSARY
IMPROVEMENTS TO PROVIDE FOR HEALTH AND
SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND OTHER CODE
REQUIREMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS C 1,000 C

HTH710 - STATE LABORATORY SERVICES

15.2 WAIMANO RIDGE, KAMAULEULE BUILDING
RENOVATION, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR NECESSARY
IMPROVEMENTS TO PROVIDE FOR HEALTH AND
SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND OTHER CODE
REQUIREMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH C 3, 760 C

HTH907 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

15.3 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, HEALTH AND
SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS FOR HEALTH
CENTERS, OAHU

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR NECESSARY IMPROVEMENTS TO PROVIDE FOR
HEALTH AND SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND
OTHER CODE REQUIREMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS C 1,000 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 179
■■■illlllllllll

Page 180 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
15.4 LIHUE HEALTH CENTER, LAB
IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI
PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO THE HEALTH CENTER
LABORATORY■
TOTAL FUNDING HTH C 4,100 C
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 180

Page 181 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
F. SOCIAL SERVICES
HMS503 - HAWAII YOUTH CORRECTIONAL FACILITY (HYCF)

1. KYFWC SECURED CUSTODY FACILITY
REROOF, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO REPAIR AND
RENOVATE THE SECURED CUSTODY FACILITY'S
ROOF AT THE KAWAILOA YOUTH AND FAMILY
WELLNESS CENTER CAMPUS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 3,720 C C

1.1 KYFWC MASTER PLAN, OAHU

PLANS TO REDEVELOP THE KAWAILOA YOUTH
AND FTV^ILY WELLNESS CENTER CAMPUS, WHICH
MAY INCLUDE MODERNIZATION OF EXISTING
FACILITIES, CONSTRUCTION OF NEW
FACILITIES, DEMOLITION OF UNNEEDED
FACILITIES, AND SITE AND INFRASTRUCTURE
IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING HMS C 3,500 C

DEF112 - SERVICES TO VETERANS

2. 3RD HAWAII STATE VETERAN'S HOME, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGNS, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT COSTS FOR A NEW LONG-TERM CARE
STATE VETERANS HOME ON THE ISLAND OF
MAUI. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING DEF 35,000 C C
DEF 58,000 P P


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 181

Page 182 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
2.1 EAST HAWAII VETERANS CEMETERY #2
EXPANSION AND IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
ADDITIONAL COLUMBARIUM WALLS TO MATCH
EXISTING, PROVIDE ROW SIGNAGE, ADD
MEMORIAL WALL AND SEAL WALL, AND OTHER
RELATED IMPROVEMENTS. THIS PROJECT IS
DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL
AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING DEF c 220 C
D^ p 1,980 P

2.2 HAWAII STATE VETERANS CEMETERY SITE
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

CONSTRUCTION FOR THE INSTALLATION OF
WATERLINES, HOSE BIBS, AND OTHER RELATED
IMPROVEMENTS AT THE HAWAII STATE VETERANS
CEMETERY IN KANEOHE.
TOTAL FUNDING DEF c 900 C

2.3 VETERANS CEMETERY RESTORATION AND
IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR VARIOUS
IMPROVEMENTS TO VETERANS CEMETERIES
STATEWIDE, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
RESTORATION, REALIGNMENT, REPLACEMENT,
REPAIRS, RENOVATIONS, AND OTHER
ASSOCIATED IMPROVEMENTS. THIS PROJECT IS
DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL
AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING DEF c 1,100 C
6, 600 P


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
182

Page 183 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HMS220 - RENTAL HOUSING SERVICES

3. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
DEVELOPMENT, MAYOR WRIGHT HOMES, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO
PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE
HPHA KA LEI MOMI DEVELOPMENT, MAYOR
WRIGHT HOMES.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 56,000C C

4 . CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, K7YAHUMANU HOMES I,
OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KAAHUMANU HOMES I,
WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES,
PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND
OTHER RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 2,350 C C

5. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, KAAHUMANU HOMES,
MULTI-PHASE, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KAAHUMANU HOMES,
MULTI-PHASE, WHICH MAY INCLUDE
ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES, PERMITTING,
ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND OTHER RELATED
WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 700 C C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 183
iiiiniiiliilini

Page 184 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
6. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, KAPAA HOMES, KAUAI

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KAPAA HOMES, WHICH
MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES,
PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND
OTHER RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 4,000 C C

7 . CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES I,
HAWAII

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES I,
WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES,
PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND
OTHER RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 3,500 C C

8. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES,
MULTI-PHASE, HAWAII

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES,
MULTI-PHASE, WHICH MAY INCLUDE
ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES, PERMITTING,
ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND OTHER RELATED
WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 700 C C


■ HB1 ■ 800 ■ G ■ DI ■ FI ■ N-2 ■ 184

Page 185 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
9. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, NANAKULI HOMES, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, NANAKULI HOMES,
WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES,
PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND
OTHER RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 750 C C

9.1 KUHIO PARK TERRACE, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
REPAIRS TO THE KUHIO PARK TERRACE GYM AND
FLOORING.
TOTAL FUNDING _C 1,300 C

HHL602 - PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT FOR HAWAIIAN HOMESTEADS

9.2 HANAPEPE LOT DEVELOPMENT, KAUAI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR LOT
DEVELOPMENT LOCATED IN HANAPEPE, KAUAI.
TOTAL FUNDING HHL C 3,000 C

9.3 HONOMU LOT DEVELOPMENT, HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR LOT
DEVELOPMENT LOCATED IN HONOMU, HAWAII.
TOTAL FUNDING HHL _C 18,300 C

9.4 KEAUKAHA LOT DEVELOPMENT, HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR LOT
DEVELOPMENT LOCATED IN KEAUKAHA, HAWAII.
TOTAL FUNDING HHL , _C IMC


■ HB1 ■ 800 ■ CD ■ l F ■ IN- ■ 2 185

Page 186 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
10. LUMP SUM REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE -
HAWAIIAN HOME LANDS EXISTING
INFRASTRUCTURE, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE OF EXISTING
INFRASTRUCTURE ON VARIOUS HAWAIIAN HOME
LANDS, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING HHL 20,000 C 10, 000 C

10.1 NANAKULI HOMESTEAD, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
VACANT LOT INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS
_(25_2;OTS2_;_ULE^J^OOP^_OA[^
TOTAL FUNDING HHL C 2,500 C

HHL625 - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATING SUPPORT

10.2 HAIKU VALLEY FEASIBILITY STUDY, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A FEASIBILITY
STUDY FOR POTENTIAL DEVELOPMENT LOCATED
IN HAIKU VALLEY.
TOTAL FUNDING HHL C 100 C

HMS904 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS

11. IT MODERNIZATION FOR THE BES SYSTEM,
STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION TO COMPLETE THE BENEFITS
ELIGIBILITY SOLUTION (BES) IT SYSTEM.
TOTAL FUNDING HMS 10,000 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 186

Page 187 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HMS777 - OFFICE ON HOMELESSNESS AND HOUSING SOLUTIONS

12 . KAUHALE DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS LUMP
SUM, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, LAND ACQUISITION,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR KAUHALE
DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS, STATEWIDE, GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENT; ACCESS, SERVICES,
AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING HMS 24,400C [13,OOOC]
18, 000 C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 187

Page 188 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
G. FORMAL EDUCATION
EDNIOO - SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING

1. JTkMES CAMPBELL HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU

CONTINUATION OF PHASED FUNDING FOR
TITLE IX PROJECT FOR DESIGN AND
CONSTRUCTION OF ATHLETIC STADIUM AND
SUPPORT FACILITIES, INCLUDING LOCKER
ROOMS UNDER BLEACHERS, FITNESS AND WEIGHT
ROOM, RENOVATION OF PLAY COURTS; AND
ALTERNATIVES, INCLUDING CONCESSION STAND,
RESTROOM, AND VISITOR BLEACHERS; GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 9,000 C C

EAST KAPOLEI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR A NEW
ELEMENTARY SCHOOL.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN C 73, 000 C

2. KAILUA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
THE ATHLETIC COMPLEX GIRLS LOCKER ROOM;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 9,500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 188

Page 189 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
2 . : KITCHEN RENOVATIONS, LEILEHUA-
MILILANI-WAIALUA COMPLEX AREA, OAHU

PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
RELATED IMPROVEMENTS FOR EACILITIES
SUPPORTING SCHOOL MEAL PRODUCTION,
DISTRIBUTION, AND SERVICE AT VARIOUS
SCHOOLS WITHIN THE LEILEHUA-MILILANI-
WAIALUA COMPLEX AREA, OAHU; BUILDING,
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS NECESSARY TO
COMPLETE SUCH IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN C 8,000 C

3 . LUMP SUM CIP - CAPACITY, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR CAPACITY;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 3, 000 C 45,000 C
EDN 5,280 X

4. LUMP SUM CIP - COMPLIANCE, STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS TO
BRING THE DOE IN COMPLIANCE WITH ADA,
ABR, AND GENDER EQUITY REQUIREMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 16, 000 C 21,300 C

5 . LUMP SUM CIP - DEFERRED MAINTENANCE
PROJECTS, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO
MAINTAIN AND IMPROVE FACILITIES AND
INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING HAZARDOUS
MATERIALS REMEDIATION; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 71,000 C 101,647 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 189

Page 190 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
6. LUMP SUM CIP - FEDERAL GRANTS,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
REPLACEMENT OR RENOVATED BUILDINGS OR
REPLACEMENT SCHOOLS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN C 30,000C
EDN P 120,000 P

7. LUMP SUM CIP - HEALTH AND SAFETY,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO SCHOOL FACILITIES AND
GROUNDS TO MEET HEALTH AND SAFETY
REQUIREMENTS/LAWS, AND ORDINANCES AND/OR
COUNTY REQUIREMENTS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 4 0, 000 C 85,503 C

8. LUMP SUM CIP - INSTRUCTIONAL,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR EQUITY,
INCLUDING RENOVATION, EXPANSION AND/OR
REPLACEMENT OF FACILITIES; GROUND AND
SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 2,000 C 4,500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 190

Page 191 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
9. LUMP SUM CIP - PROJECT COMPLETION,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR PROJECT COMPLETION INCLUDING
CONSTRUCTION MANAGEMENT COSTS, PURCHASE
ORDERS, UTILITIES CHARGES, CHANGE ORDERS,
AND ALL OTHER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
COMPLETION OF A PROJECT.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 50,000 C 10,000 C

10. LUMP SUM CIP - SUPPORT FACILITIES,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE
IMPROVEMENT OF EXISTING OR NEW SCHOOL
FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 18,000 C 81,400 C

11. LUMP SUM CIP - TELECOMMUNICATIONS,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
TO MAINTAIN AND IMPROVE DOE’S CONVERGED
INFRASTRUCTURE PROVIDING BELLS AND PAGING
FOR SCHOOL SAFETY; CONVERGED
INFRASTRUCTURE PROVIDING SCHOOLS' ACCESS
TO ONLINE LEARNING AND INTERNET
RESOURCES; TELECOMMUNICATIONS, AND
ELECTRICAL INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 3,000 C 1,500 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 191

Page 192 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
11.1 LUMP SUM CIP - TEMPORARY FACILITIES,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR RELOCATION OR CONSTRUCTION OF
TEMPORARY FACILITIES (INCLUDING
RESTROOMS) AND RELATED SITE IMPROVEMENTS,
EACH SCHOOL YEAR TO MEET ENROLLMENT
SHIFTS, UNFORESEEN EMERGENCIES, AND TO
PROVIDE TEMPORARY FACILITIES WHILE NEW
SCHOOLS AND/OR PERMANENT CLASSROOMS ARE
BEING PLANNED AND/OR CONSTRUCTED; GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES■
TOTAL FUNDING EDN C 6, 000 C

12. ■ MCKINLEY HS ATHLETIC COMPLEX
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
VARIOUS ATHLETIC COMPLEX IMPROVEMENTS,
INCLUDING BLEACHERS AND LIGHTS; GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 7,000C C

13. PAIA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL NEW CLASSROOM,
MAUI

CONSTRUCTION FOR A NEW CLASSROOM
BUILDING AT PAIA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, MAUI.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 35,000C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 192

Page 193
H.B. NO.
1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
14 . PUU KUKUI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
TWO PORTABLE CLASSROOMS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 3,200 C C

15 . REGIONAL KITCHENS, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, EQUIPMENT,
FURNISHING, AND APPURTENANCES FOR THE
EXPANSION OF REGIONAL KITCHENS,
STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 55,650 C 16,500 C

15.1 WAIAKEA HIGH SCHOOL, HAWAII 3R'S
IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR THE CONSTRUCTION AND RENOVATION OF
FACILITIES BY HAWAII 3R'S FOR .A
HEALTHCARE LEARNING LAB AT WAIAKEA HIGH
SCHOOL, HAWAII; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES. THE FUNDS SHALL BE
TRANSFERRED TO THE HAWAII 3R'S SCHOOL
IMPROVEMENT FUND, SECTION 302A-1502.4,
FOR THIS PROJECT.
TOTAL FUNDING_______________ EDN C 5/72^


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 193
IMOIBHIIIIIIillllllllll

Page 194 H.B. NO. X
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
le. WILCOX ELEMENTARY SCHOOL TENNIS
COURTS, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
RECONSTRUCTION AND IMPROVEMENTS OF TENNIS
COURTS INCLUDING FENCING, TENNIS NETS,
RESURFACING, AND STRIPING; GROUND AND
SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 950 C c

EDN450 - SCHOOL FACILITIES AUTHORITY

17 . LUMP SUM CIP - PRE-KINDERGARTEN
CAPACITY, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, LAND ACQUISITION,
CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES
FOR NEW FACILITIES AND/OR RENOVATION,
IMPROVEMENT, AND EXPANSION OF EXISTING
SCHOOL FACILITIES; GROUND & SITE'
IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 20,000 C 20,000C

18 . NEW CENTRAL MAUI ELEMENTARY AND
MIDDLE SCHOOL, MAUI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES
FOR NEW K-8 SCHOOL USING STANDARDS BASED
DESIGNS, MODERN EDUCATIONAL
SPECIFICATIONS, DESIGN GUIDES,
CONSTRUCTION SPECIFICATIONS, STANDARD
TECHNICAL DRAWINGS, AND COMMISSIONING
PLANS, FOR ACCELERATED CONSTRUCTION
SCHEDULES AND BUILDING MAINTAINABILITY.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 35,000 C C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2 194

Page 195 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
18.1 22ND AVE REDEVELOPMENT, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR REDEVELOPMENT OF
THE 475 22ND AVENUE, HONOLULU PROPERTY TO
PRE-KINDERGARTEN CLASSROOMS AND TEACHER
HOUSING.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN C 200 C

EDN407 - PUBLIC LIBRARIES


18.2 AINA HAINA PUBLIC LIBRARY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
LANDSCAPING AND REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE OF
EXISTING IRRIGATION, LIGHTING, AND
REPAIRS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS _C 1,000 C

18.3 EWA BEACH PUBLIC AND SCHOOL LIBRARY,
OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR PROJECTS RELATED
TO EWA BEACH PUBLIC AND SCHOOL LIBRARY.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS C 1,500 C

19. HAWAII STATE PUBLIC LIBRARY SYSTEM,
HEALTH AND SAFETY, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
HEALTH, SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND OTHER
CODE REQUIREMENTS. PROJECTS MAY INCLUDE,
BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE REMOVAL OF
HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATIONS FOR
LIBRARY PATRONS AND EMPLOYEES,
ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROLS, FIRE PROTECTION,
IMPROVEMENTS TO BUILDINGS GROUNDS, AND
NEW CONSTRUCTION; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 25, 000 C 25,000 C

HB1800 GDI FIN-2 195

Page 196
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
19.1 KAILUA PUBLIC LIBRARY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
FACILITIES AND OTHER RELATED
IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS _C 5,000 C

19.2 KAIMUKI PUBLIC LIBRARY, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR PROJECTS RELATED
TO KAIMUKI PUBLIC LIBRARY.
TOTAL FUNDING A^ C 1,250 C

19.3 KALIHI-PALAMA PUBLIC LIBRARY, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR PROJECTS RELATED
TO KALIHI-PALAMA PUBLIC LIBRARY.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS C 1,000 C

20 . KAPTkA LIBRARY, KAUAI

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A NEW KAPAA
LIBRARY.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 2,000 C C

20.1 MILILANI PUBLIC LIBRARY, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR PROJECTS RELATED
TO MILILANI PUBLIC LIBRARY.
TOTAL FUNDING A^ _C 1,250 C

20.2 PAHOA LIBRARY AND TRANSIT HUB, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND LAND ACQUISITION
FOR PAHOA LIBRARY AND TRANSIT HUB.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS _C 2,000 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 196

Page 197 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
DEF114 - HAWAII NATIONAL GUARD YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY

21 . YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY Bl786 AND
B1787 UPGRADES AND IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR UPGRADES
AND IMPROVEMENTS TO BUILDINGS 1786 AND
1787, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WINDOW
SYSTEM, PLUMBING, AIR CONDITIONING,
EMERGENCY GENERATOR SYSTEM, UTILITY
SYSTEM, FIRE ALARMS, AND OTHER SYSTEMS AT
THE YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY IN KALAELOA,
OAHU .
TOTAL FUNDING DEF 8,000 C -C

UOHIOO - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, MANOA

22 . UHM, HOLMES HALL, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO RENOVATE
AND MODERNIZE HOLMES HALL STUDENT LABS
THAT SUPPORT CIVIL, MECHANICAL, AND
ELECTRICAL ENGINEERING PROGRAMS.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 9, 000 C C

23. UHM, STUDENT HOUSING SERVICES (SHS)
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO THE UH MANOA STUDENT
HOUSING SERVICES FACILITIES. PROJECTS TO
INCLUDE RENEWAL, IMPROVEMENTS, AND
MODERNIZATION TO THE INTERIOR AND
EXTERIOR OF THE FACILITIES. IMPROVEMENTS
INCLUDE BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO ROOFS,
BUILDING ENVELOPE, MECHANICAL,
ELECTRICAL, PLUMBING, FIRE PROTECTION
SYSTEMS, ELEVATORS, STRUCTURAL, AND
PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 30,750C 28,500C
UOH 30,750 E 28,500 E


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 197

Page 198 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
24. UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII AT MANOA COLLEGE
OF TROPICAL AGRICULTURE AND HUMAN
RESILIENCE, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
THE WAIMANALO CTAHR AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH
AND EXTENSION STATION (CARES) CENTER,
INCLUDING REPAIRS, MAINTENANCE, AND
DEMOLITION OF BUILDINGS, AND PHASE 1
REDESIGN.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 4,000C C

25. UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII- AT MANOA COLLEGE
OF TROPICAL AGRICULTURE AND HUMAN
RESILIENCE, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR DEVELOPMENT OF THE
CONTROLLED ENVIRONMENTAL AGRICULTURE
INNOVATION FARM LOCATED AT THE MAGOON
RESEARCH STATION AND UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII
AT MANOA CAMPUS[IN MANOA].
TOTAL FUNDING UO.H 6, 000 C C

25.1 UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII AT MANOA COLLEGE
OF TROPICAL AGRICULTURE AND HUMAN
RESILIENCE, WAIALEE STATION,OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO THE CTAHR WAIALEE
STATION, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
DEMOLITION, REPAIRS, RENOVATIONS, GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, UTILITY AND
INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, DRAINAGE AND
GRADING, LANDSCAPING, SOLAR LIGHTING,
FENCING, ACCESS GATES, TRAFFIC CONTROL
DEVICES, CESSPOOL REMEDIATION, AND THE
PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES FOR NEW FACILITIES AND
RELATED IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH C 6, 000 C

HB1800 CDl FIN-2 198
iMlllliHHIHm

Page 199 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO, NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
26. UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, MANOA CAMPUS,
ATHLETIC FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
VARIOUS REPAIRS AND IMPROVEMENTS TO
ATHLETIC FACILITIES AND FIELD
IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 10,000 C 11,000 C

UOH210 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, HILO

27. HILO, RENEW, IMPROVE AND MODERNIZE,
HAWAII

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE UNIVERSITY OF
HAWAII, HILO. PROJECTS TO INCLUDE
RENEWAL, IMPROVEMENTS, AND MODERNIZATION
OF INTERIOR AND EXTERIOR STRUCTURES,
ROOFS, MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS,
PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS, ROADWAYS, GROUNDS,
AND OTHER PROJECT COSTS TO UPGRADE
EXISTING TEMPORARY AND NEW FACILITIES.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 15,000 C 9, 500 C

UOH700 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, WEST OAHU

28. UHWO, RENEW, IMPROVE, AND MODERNIZE,
OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO UNIVERSITY
OF HAWAII AT WEST OAHU FACILITIES.
PROJECTS TO INCLUDE RENEWAL,
IMPROVEMENTS, AND MODERNIZATION OF
INTERIOR AND EXTERIOR STRUCTURES, ROOFS,
MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS,
PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS, ROADWAYS, GROUNDS,
AND OTHER PROJECT COSTS TO UPGRADE
EXISTING TEMPORARY AND NEW FACILITIES;
PLANNING PROJECTS AND STUDIES; AND ALL
PROJECT RELATED COSTS.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 6, 500 C 3,000 C
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 199

Page 200 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

UOH800 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, COMMUNITY COLLEGES

29. CCS, CAPITAL RENEWAL AND DEFERRED
MAINTENANCE,[ AND MINOR CIP]
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO UH COMMUNITY COLLEGES
SYSTEM FACILITIES. PROJECTS TO INCLUDE
CAPITAL RENEWAL, REDUCTION OF MAINTENANCE
BACKLOG, MAJOR AND MINOR RENOVATIONS,
MODERNIZATION OF FACILITIES, RE-ROOFING,
MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS,
RESURFACING, INFRASTRUCTURE, DEMOLITION
OF EXISTING FACILITIES, AND OTHER REPAIRS
AND PROJECT COSTS FOR UPGRADES.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH B 10,000 B
UOH 20, 000 C 10,000 C

30. CCS, MINOR CIP FOR THE COMMUNITY
COLLEGES, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR MINOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS
PROGRAM PROJECTS FOR CAMPUS FACILITIES
WITHIN THE UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII COMMUNITY
COLLEGES SYSTEM. PROJECT MAY INCLUDE
RENOVATIONS FOR THE MODERNIZATION OF
FACILITIES, ADDITIONS, DEMOLITION OF
EXISTING FACILITIES, AND OTHER
IMPROVEMENTS AND PROJECT COSTS TO UPGRADE
AND IMPROVE FACILITIES OF THE COMMUNITY
COLLEGES SYSTEM.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH _B 10,000 B
UOH 20,000 C 10,000 C


H HB1 l 8 i 0 n 0 i C l D M l F l I l N i - lB 2 200

Page 201 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D, 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
31 . KAUAI CC, STUDENT, FACULTY/STAFF, AND
WORKFORCE HOUSING, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
STUDENT, FACULTY/STAFF, AND WORKFORCE
HOUSING; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 5,000 C 10,000 C

31.1 UHMC HALE MODERNIZATION AND
INFRASTRUCTURE, MAUI

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND RENOVATION
OF EXISTING HALES AT UHMC FOR LEARNING
SPACES, OFFICES, SUPPORT FACILITIES, AND
RELATED IMPROVEMENTS, EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH C 5,000 C

UOH900 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, SYSTEMWIDE SUPPORT

32 . HAWAII UNDERSEA RESEARCH LABORATORY
AND MAKAI PIER, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT RELATED TO THE DEMOLITION OF
THE HAWAII UNDERSEA RESEARCH LABORATORY
BUILDING AND APPURTENANT REPAIRS TO MAKAI
PIER.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 500 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 201

Page 202 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
33 . SYSTEM, RENEW, IMPROVE, AND
MODERNIZE, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE
UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII SYSTEM FACILITIES.
PROJECT TO INCLUDE RENEWAL, IMPROVEMENTS,
AND MODERNIZATION OF INTERIOR AND
EXTERIOR STRUCTURES, STUDENT HOUSING
FACILITIES, ROOFS, MECHANICAL AND
ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS, PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS,
ROADWAYS, GROUNDS AND OTHER PROJECT COSTS
TO UPGRADE EXISTING TEMPORARY AND NEW
FACILITIES.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 50,000 C 65,000 C


34. SYSTEM, UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII PROJECT
ADJUSTMENT FUND, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A
CONTINGENCY FUND FOR PROJECT ADJUSTMENT
PURPOSES SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE
APPROPRIATIONS ACT.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 4 C 4 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
202

Page 203 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
capital improvement projects
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
H. CULTURE AND RECREATION
UOH881 - AQUARIA

1- WAIKIKI AQUARIUM IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR REPLACEMENT OF THE CEILING
IN EXHIBIT GALLERIES, RESURFACING OF THE
GALLERY FLOORING, AND UPGRADING OF THE
ELECTRICAL SYSTEM IN AQUARIUM.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH l,702C C

1_^ UHM, WAIKIKI AQUARIUM, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR VARIOUS
REPAIRS AND IMPROVEMENTS TO THE
EQUIPMENT, SITE, BUILDING ENVELOPE, AND
OTHER INFRASTRUCTURE SERVING THE WAIKIKI
AQUARIUM.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH C 7,000 C

AGS881 - STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS

2. PERFORMING ARTS CENTER, OAHU

LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR A
PERFORMING ARTS CENTER, OAHU, TMK 7-4-
007-002 .
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 8,500C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
203
iiiiiBMiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiin^^

Page 204 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
LNR804 - FOREST AND OUTDOOR RECREATION

2.1 KAIWA RIDGE TRAIL, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
KAIWA RIDGE TRAIL IMPROVEMENTS, EROSION
CONTROL, AND HABITAT RESTORATION, PHASE
2 .
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 1,300 C

2.2 NOUNOU MOUNTAIN, WAILUA, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
UPGRADES SURROUNDING NOUNOU MOUNTAIN,
INCLUDING KUAMOO BRIDGE, BENCHES, BICYCLE
RACKS, SIGNAGE, PARKING LOTS, TRAIL
IMPROVEMENTS, EROSION CONTROL, AND
SHELTERS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 3,000 C

2.3 POLOLU TRAILHEAD AND HISTORIC TRAIL
IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR TRAILHEAD
IMPROVEMENTS INCLUDING PARKING LOT
IMPROVEMENTS, NEW LOOKOUT CONSTRUCTION,
AND INTERPRETIVE SIGNAGE DESIGN AND
MANUFACTURING.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 1,000 C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2
204

Page 205 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
LNR806 - PARKS ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION

3. STATE PARKS INFRASTRUCTURE AND PARK
IMPROVEMENTS, LUMP SUM, STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF
IMPROVEMENTS TO STATE PARKS (WAILUA RIVER
SP, PUA'A KA'A SW, WAILOA RIVER SRA,
KEOLONAHIHI SHP, KEAIWA HEIAU SRA) ,
STATEWIDE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
REIMBURSEMENT AND/OR FINANCING.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2,650 C 5,000 C
LNR 500 N 500 N

3.1 ADDRESSING DEFICIENCIES IN CRITICAL
INFRASTRUCTURE AT DIAMOND HEAD STATE
MONUMENT, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR UPGRADES TO CRITICAL
INFRASTRUCTURE INCLUDING WATER AND
ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS SERVICING THE CRATER.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR B 1,000 B

3.2 LAKEj!m^SON_ACQUISITWN2_O^HU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES FOR SITE IMPROVEMENTS,
REPAIRS, RENOVATIONS, MODERNIZATION OF
IRRIGATION SYSTEM TO CONDUCT ADDITIONAL
TESTING FOR CONTTV^INATION AND
ENVIRONMENTAL HAZARDS; TO IMPLEMENT
REMEDIATION MEASURES AND DEBRIS CLEARING
TO PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY; TO
ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH DOH REQUIREMENTS;
AND TO PERFORM RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 4,000 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 205

Page 206 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
4 . WAHIAWA FRESHWATER STATE RECREATION
AREA PARK IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT, AND FURNISHINGS FOR PARK
IMPROVEMENTS, EXPANSION, AND THE
DEVELOPMENT OF FACILITIES AT WAHIAWA
FRESHWATER STATE RECREATION AREA. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 5,750 C 2, 150 C
LNR 250 N 250 N

4 . 1 WAILUKU RIVER STATE PARK EXPANSION,
HAWAII

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR APPROXIMATELY 284 ACRES
IDENTIFIED AS TMK (3)2-5-008:003, :025,
;026, AND :027 IN HILO, HAWAII; THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 3,500 C
1^ _P _P

LNR801 - OCEAN-BASED RECREATION

5 . ALA WAI CANAL WALL REPAIR, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
ALA WAI SBH CANAL WALL REPAIR AND HAUL-
OUT REMOVAL; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 5,000 C c


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 206

Page 207 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
5.1 HONOKOHAU SBH, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
REPAIR OF EXISTING MAUKA BOAT RAMP AND
INSTALLATION OF NEW FLOATING DOCK
EXTENSIONS ON EXISTING DOCKS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 3,600 C

6. KAWAIHAE NORTH SMALL BOAT HARBOR,
HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO HARBOR DOCK, BREAK WALL,
AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 9, 450 C C

6.1 KIHEI SMALL BOAT HARBOR, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
SAFETY-RELATED REPAIRS OF THE BOAT RAMP
AND DOCKS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 5,500 C

7 . LAHAINA SMALL BOAT HARBOR MAINTENANCE
DREDGING, MAUI

CONSTRUCTION FOR MAINTENANCE DREDGING
OF HARBOR BASIN AND ENTRANCE CHANNEL.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 5, 000 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 207

Page 208 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
8. LAHAINA SMALL BOAT HARBOR
RECONSTRUCTION OF OUTER MARGINAL
WHARF, MAUI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF HARBOR
OUTER MARGINAL WHARF DESTROYED BY AUGUST
2023 WILDFIRES.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 8,000 C C

8 . 1 MAALAEA SMALL BOAT HARBOR, MjAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
THE REPLACEMENT OF EXISTING DOCKS ON
NORTH SIDE OF HARBOR WITH NEW PILE GUIDED
ALUMINUM FRAMED FLOATING MARGINAL WHARF
WITH ELECTRICAL/WATER SERVICE.
TOTAL FUNDING L^ C 500 C

8.2 MAUNALUA BAY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
PHASE 2 REPAIRS TO BOAT LAUNCH, PARKING
LOT, AND BEACH PARK AT MAUNALUA BAY BEACH
PARK.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 1,000 C

8.3 POHOIKI BAY, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND PERMITTING FOR
BREAKWATER STRUCTURES AND APPURTENANT
WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING _C 1,000 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 208

Page 209 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
POHOIKI SAFE SWIM AREA, HAWAII

PLANS AND DESIGN INCLUDING
FEASIBILITY STUDY AND SITE SELECTION FOR
THE CONSTRUCTION OF A SAFE SWIM AREA
LOCATED IN POHOIKI.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 200 C C

10. REPLACEMENT OF FISH HOIST AND
CONCRETE LANDING STRUCTURES, MILOLII
LANDING, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR REPLACEMENT OF FISH HOIST
WITH NEW FISH HOIST ASSEMBLY AND CONCRETE
FOOTING; REMOVAL OF EXISTING
DAMAGED/DETERIORATING CONCRETE LANDING
STRUCTURES, AND CONSTRUCTION OF NEW
CONCRETE LANDING STRUCTURES INCLUDING NEW
CLEATS AND BULL RAILS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 1,000 c c


■ HB1 ■ 800 ■ CD ■ l ■ FIN I -2 II 209

Page 210 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
I . PUBLIC SAFETY
PSD404 - WAIAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY

0■1 WAIAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY,
WASTEWATER IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
CRITICAL WASTEWATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS
TO RESOLVE ONGOING SEWAGE BACKUPS,
ACCOMMODATE INCREASED FLOW CAPACITY, AND
INSTALL MODERN MONITORING SYSTEMS TO
ENHANCE OPERATIONAL EFFICIENCY AND
RELIABILITY■
TOTAL FUNDING AG^ C 4,000 C

LAW900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

1. PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT AND FURNISHING FOR
DEPARTMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT
FACILITY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT AND FURNISHING FOR A DEPARTMENT
OF LAW ENFORCEMENT FACILITY. GROUND AND
SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES, TMKS 7-1-002:004 (POR.)
009 (POR.); 023(POR.).
TOTAL FUNDING LAW 3,000C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 210
iiHiiiiiiiiiiiniiMi

Page 211 H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
DEPARTMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT
SHERIFFS DIVISION RELOCATION AND NEW
RECEIVING DESK, AIRPORT SECTION AND
WARRANT SECTION, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE CONTINUED RELOCATION OF
THE SHERIFFS DIVISION AND NEW
CONSTRUCTION FOR A RECEIVING DESK,
AIRPORT SECTION AND WARRANT SECTION.
TOTAL FUNDING LAW C 2,000 C

PSD900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

2. DCR 10-YR DEPARTMENT MASTER PLAN, NEW
FACILITIES, AND SUSTAINABLE MASTER
PLANS, AND OTHER PLANNING
ASSESSMENTS, STATEWIDE

PLANS TO UPDATE THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS AND REHABILITATION’S lO-YEAR
MASTER PLAN, NEW FACILITY, AND
SUSTAINABILITY MASTER PLANS AND OTHER
PLANNING ASSESSMENTS, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 250 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 211

Page 212 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
3. DCR FAC-WIDE REPAIRS, DEFERRED
MAINTENANCE, RELATED SUPPORT AND
IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
AND RELATED SERVICES IN SUPPORT OF AND TO
ADDRESS IMMEDIATE REPAIRS, DEFERRED
MAINTENANCE, AND IMPROVEMENTS AFFECTING
FACILITY AND BUILDING INFRASTRUCTURE,
SECURITY, AND OPERATIONS [■ OR SI-MILAR] ,
WHILE ALSO ADDRESSING CODE VIOLATIONS
AND/OR CITATIONS AFFECTING PSD
FACILITIES, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING PSD 5, 000 C 3,000 C

4. DCR FAC-WIDE SECURITY PERIMETER
FENCING REPAIRS, UPGRADES, AND
RELATED IMPROVEMENTS, LUMP SUM CIP,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO REPAIR, UPGRADE, AND CONDUCT
NECESSARY GROUND IMPROVEMENTS TO DCR'S
FACILITIES STATEWIDE, PERIMETER SECURITY
FENCE SYSTEM REPAIRS, RETAINING WALLS,
AND REPAIRS TO IMPACTED AREAS, WHILE ALSO
PROVIDING THE NECESSARY SECURITY
PERIMETER MONITORING SYSTEMS, LIGHTING,
AND SECURITY CAMERA SYSTEM WHERE NEEDED.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 10,000 C 5, 000 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 212

Page 213 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D, 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
5 . DCR, DOJ ARCHITECTURAL BARRIER
REMOVAL, ADA AND OTHER RELATED
IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO CORRECT AND ADDRESS CURRENT
ADA VIOLATIONS CITED BY THE U.S. DEPT OF
JUSTICE (DOJ) UNDER A SETTLEMENT
AGREEMENT WITH THE STATE OF HAWAII, AND
TO ADDRESS ASSOCIATED ADA NON-DOJ CODE
VIOLATIONS AT DCR FACILITIES, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 7,000 C 2,000 C

5 . 1 DCR, GENERAL ADMINISTRATION, LUMP SUM
CIP, STATEWIDE

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR URGENT AND IMMEDIATE REPAIRS,
REHABILITATION, RENOVATIONS, REPLACEMENT,
UPGRADES, IMPROVEMENTS OF BUILDINGS,
SITES, INFRASTRUCTURE AND RELATED '
EQUIPMENT, MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL
SYSTEMS AND PROCESSES, SECURITY AND
OPERATIONS EQUIPMENT, AND CITED CODE
VIOLATIONS IMPACTING DCR FACILITIES,
STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS C 15,000 C

HALAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY,
CONSOLIDATED HEALTH CARE UNIT, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO CONSTRUCT A NEW CONSOLIDATED
HEALTH CARE UNIT SECTION AT THE HALAWA
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY ON OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 28,500 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
213

Page 214 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
7 . MAUI COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
RENOVATION, SECURITY UPGRADE, AND
OTHER IMPROVEMENTS, TO INCLUDE THE
MEDICAL AND MENTAL HEALTH AREAS, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS, RENOVATIONS,
REFURBISHMENTS, UPGRADES, INFRASTRUCTURE
WORK, AND NEW CONSTRUCTION FOR THE MAUI
COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER; GROUND AND
SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 4,000 C 2, 000 C

NEW OAHU COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL
CENTER FACILITY, OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR THE PROJECT MANAGEMENT
SUPPORT AND FINANCIAL PARTICIPATION BY
THE STATE OF HAWAII TO FUND AND CONSTRUCT
THE NEW OAHU COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL
CENTER (OCCC) FACILITY, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 15,000C 15,000C

8.1 OCCC-LAUMAKA WFC INFRASTRUCTURE
REPAIRS, RENOVATION, AND
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO
CONDUCT INFRASTRUCTURE REPAIRS,
RENOVATION, AND IMPROVEMENTS AT THE OAHU
COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER (OCCC)-
LAUMAKA WORK FURLOUGH CENTER (LWFC),
OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS C 3,000 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
214
iniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 215 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
9. WOMEN'S COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL
CENTER, KITCHEN EXPANSION, AND
RELATED INTERIM AND PERMANENT
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE EXPANSION,
MODERNIZATION, AND UPGRADE OF THE WOMEN'S
COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER (WCCC)
KITCHEN SERVICES AND RELATED SUPPORT AND
EDUCATIONAL SERVICES, FACILITY-WIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING PSD 5,000C C

DEFllO - AMELIORATION OF PHYSICAL DISASTERS

10. FORT RUGER REPLACEMENT ELEVATOR, OAHU

CONSTRUCTION FOR A REPLACEMENT OF THE
ELEVATOR AT FORT RUGER, BUILDING 306A.
TOTAL FUNDING DEF 725 C C

DEF116 - HAWAII ARMY AND AIR NATIONAL GUARD

11. UPGRADES AND IMPROVEMENTS TO HAWAII
ARMY NATIONAL GUARD FACILITIES,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR UPGRADES
AND IMPROVEMENTS TO FACILITIES SUPPORTING
UNIT STATIONING/RESTATIONING REQUIREMENTS
AND/OR FACILITATE COMPLIANCE WITH
FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL SAFETY AND
ENVIRONMENTAL REQUIREMENTS. IMPROVEMENTS
TO INCLUDE BUT NOT BE LIMITED TO
ADDITIONS, ALTERATIONS, AND/OR NEW
CONSTRUCTION. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING DEF 1,173C 7,400 C
DEF 3,223P 16,600 P


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 215

Page 216 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
DEF118 - HAWAII EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY

12. RETROFIT PUBLIC BUILDINGS WITH
HURRICANE PROTECTIVE MEASURES,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO RETROFIT EXISTING BUILDINGS
AND/OR REINFORCE NEW BUILDINGS WITH
HURRICANE PROTECTIVE MEASURES TO INCREASE
THE NUMBER OF EMERGENCY SHELTERS
STATEWIDE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 1,500 C [j^-SGOC]
4,200 C
AGS 1,500 P [1--500P]
3,750 P

13. SIREN MAINTENANCE AND MODERNIZATION,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR UPGRADES AND MODERNIZATION OF
EXISTING OUTDOOR SIRENS TO PROVIDE PUBLIC
SAFETY ANNOUNCEMENT IN THE EVENT OF A
WARNING HAZARD, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 5,000 C
6, 200 C
AGS P 3,500 P


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
216
iiiiiiiiiHiiiiiHiin

Page 217 H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
K. GOVERNMENT-WIDE SUPPORT
BEDI 44 - STATEWIDE PLANNING AND COORDINATION

1. EAST KAPOLEI TOD INFRASTRUCTURE, OAHU

PLANS FOR AN ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT
STATEMENT FOR THE EAST KAPOLEI TOD
DISTRICT.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 500 C C

2. STATE TRANSIT-ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT
(TOD) PLANNING, STATEWIDE

PLANS, FEASIBILITY AND COST STUDIES,
AND COORDINATION OF TOD PROJECTS, TOD
PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE REQUIREMENTS, AND
RELATED ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW DOCUMENTS
FOR TOD PROJECTS IN STATE TOD STRATEGIC
PLAN, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 2, 000 C C

2■1 WAIKIKI BEACH RESTORATION PROJECT,
OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
WAIKIKI BEACH RESTORATION UP TO THE
SHORELINE, EXCLUDING THE DESIGN AND
CONSTRUCTION OF STRUCTURES ON PRIVATE
PROPERTIES ABOVE THE SHORELINE, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING BED C 7,000 C


■HB1■800■ C■Dl ■FI■N-2■ 217

Page 218 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D, 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
3. WAIKIKI RESILIENCE AND SEA LEVEL RISE
ADAPTATION PROJECT, OAHU

[PLANS AND DESIGN FOR -THE-WATK-IKI
RESILIENCE AND SEA LEVEL RISE ADAPTATION
PROJECT]PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION
FOR THE DEVELOPMENT AND EXECUTION OF A
COMPREHENSIVE BEACH IMPROVEMENT AND
NOURISHMENT PLAN TO INCLUDE THE
FOLLOWING SHORELINE SECTORS: ALA WAI BOAT
HARBOR TO FORT DERUSSY OUTFALL AND
KAPAHULU GROIN TO KAIMANA BEACH.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 5,000C C

AGS131 - ENTERPRISE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES

4. LUMP SUM HEALTH AND SAFETY, HAWAII
WIRELESS INTEROPERABILITY NETWORK,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR REPAIRS,
MODERNIZATION, AND EXPANSION OF CRITICAL
COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEMS, INCLUDING THE
STATEWIDE ANUENUE AND HAWAIIAN MICROWAVE
SYSTEMS AND LAND MOBILE RADIO, STATEWIDE
SHARED BLENDED RADIO SYSTEM, AND NEW
RADIO SITES AND TOWERS STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 4,000 C 2,000 C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
218

Page 219 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
LNRIOI - PUBLIC LANDS MANAGEMENT

BANYAN DRIVE/HCDA/DLNR: DEMOLITION OF
COUNTRY CLUB APARTMENT BUILDING,
HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, LAND ACQUISITION,
CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT TO DEMOLISH
AND REMOVE THE COUNTRY CLUB APARTMENT
BUILDING AND RELATED STRUCTURES AND
UTILITIES LOCATED AT 121 BANYAN DRIVE,
HILO, HAWAII ON THE PARCEL DESIGNATED TAX
MAP KEY (3) 2-1-005:020.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 14,000 C

5. CESSPOOL CLOSURES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
EPA CONSENT ORDER, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR CLOSURE OF LARGE CAPACITY
CESSPOOLS (LCC) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
CONSENT AGREEMENT AND FINAL ORDER (CA/FO)
WITH THE U.S, ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
AGENCY (EPA).
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 1,500 B B


6 . DEMOLITION[ OF EXISTING IMPROVEMENTS]
LOCATED AT 121 BANYAN DRIVE, HAWAII

P LAN S_^ [ AN© ] DE SI GN, AND CONSTRUCTION
FOR DEMOLITION OF 121 BANYAN DRIVE, HILO,
HAWAII, AND SITE REMEDIATION.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR l,200 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 219

Page 220 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
7 . EAST KAPOLEI TRANSIT ORIENTED
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR THE DEVELOPMENT
OF FOUR DLNR PARCELS ADJACENT TO AND
NEARBY THE KEONEAE RAIL STATION.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 500 B B

8. HALAI STREET PROPERTY, AUWAI
DRAINAGE, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO
REMOVE EXISTING CRM DITCH AND INSTALL A
60-INCH RCP CULVERT.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 1, 455 C C

9. LOWER KAPAHI RESERVOIR REMOVAL, KAUAI

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR BREACH OF LOWER
KAPAHI RESERVOIR TO COMPLY WITH D7VM
SAFETY REGULATIONS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 500 B B

9.1 PUBLIC LAND ACQUISITION, HAWAII

LAND ACQUISITION, THROUGH EMINENT
DOMAIN, VOLUNTARY WITHDRAWAL, OR
AGREEMENT, OF THE LEASEHOLD INTEREST IN
THE PARCEL IDENTIFIED AS TAX MAP KEY:
(3)2-1-001:012, HILO, HAWAII, CURRENTLY
USED AS THE GRAND NANILOA GOLF COURSE.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 270 C

10 . SHANGRI LA BREAKWATER REMOVAL, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR DEMOLITION OF
STATE-OWNED STRUCTURE LOCATED IN THE
OCEAN SEAWARD OF THE SHANGRI LA MUSEUM.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 700 B B


HB1800 GDI FIN-2
220

Page 221 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
F 1 1 PTAnTTTM T vattat

-I

s
AMD IIPCPADFR TO mpApy t tz-urrtMr* ♦
q PFCT ATOP -T . T CHT T MC. * rr>ri t nnAOMm
A POUT gT-TTOM

G]

AGS221 - PUBLIC WORKS - PLANNING, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION

12. LUMP SUM CIP - PROJECT ADJUSTMENT
FUND, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A
CONTINGENCY FUND FOR PROJECT ADJUSTMENT
PURPOSES SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE
APPROPRIATIONS ACT.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 4 C 4 C

13. LUMP SUM MAINTENANCE OF EXISTING
FACILITIES, PWD, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR
IMPROVEMENTS AND MAINTENANCE OF PUBLIC
FACILITIES AND SITES, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 20,000C 20, 000 C


HB1800 GDI FIN-2
221

Page 222 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
14 . LUMP SUM STATE OFFICE BUILDING
REMODELING, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR REMODELING AND UPGRADE OF
STATE-OWNED OFFICES TO ACCOMMODATE STATE
AGENCIES' OPERATIONAL REQUIREMENTS.
PROJECT INCLUDES RENOVATION FOR
REORGANIZATION, PROGR7VM AND STAFFING
CHANGES, AND CONSOLIDATION, AS WELL AS
IMPROVEMENTS FOR OFFICE LAYOUTS, ENERGY
CONSERVATION, LIGHTING, A/C, VENTILATION
PLUMBING, ELECTRICAL, AND
DATA/COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEMS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 2,000 C C

15 . PLANNING FOR STATE CAPITOL BUILDING
REHABILITATION AND RELATED
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS FOR THE TOTAL RENOVATION OF THE
STATE CAPITOL BUILDING AND TEMPORARY
ACCOMMODATION FOR OCCUPANTS AND
OPERATIONS. INCLUDES IDENTIFICATION AND
EVALUATION OF STATE AND PRIVATE SECTOR
OPTIONS WHICH COULD BE RENOVATED OR
REDEVELOPED TO TEMPORARILY RELOCATE
OCCUPANTS AND FUNCTIONS FROM THE STATE
CAPITOL BUILDING AND PLANNING FOR
SUBSEQUENT RE-USE OF ANY STATE ASSETS
THAT WERE UTILIZED.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 2,000 C C


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 222

Page 223 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D, 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
AGS901 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES

16. ENTERPRISE FINANCIAL SYSTEM,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE STATE FINANCIAL SYSTEM.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 35,000 C C

SUB201 - CITY AND COUNTY OF HONOLULU

17 . BOARD OF WATER SUPPLY - MONITORING
WELLS AT VARIOUS LOCATIONS, OAHU

PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT, AND APPURTENANCES FOR
GROUNDWATER MONITORING WELLS TO MEASURE
AND MONITOR THE LEVEL, QUALITY, QUANTITY,
OR MOVEMENT OF SUBSURFACE WATER, FOR
CONTAMINANTS WITH TOTAL PETROLEUM
HYDROCARBONS OR AQUEOUS FILM FORMING
FOAM, AND ALLOW FOR THE MONITORING OF
OTHER CONTAMINANTS RELATED TO THE RED
HILL FUEL CRISIS. PROVIDED THAT THE CITY
AND COUNTY OF HONOLULU CONTRIBUTES 80% OF
THE TOTAL PROJECT COST.
TOTAL FUNDING CCH 2,000 C C
CCH 8,000 S S


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 223

Page 224 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
MANOA STREAM WATERSHED RISK REDUCTION
& DEBRIS MANAGEMENT PROJECT (PAWAINA
STREET TO UH-MANOA CAMPUS AND
QUARRY), OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO DEVELOP A COMPREHENSIVE
WATERSHED DEBRIS MANAGEMENT AND FLOOD
RJ SI£REDUCT20ILSTBATEGY FpR MAN0A STRE^
(PAWAINA STREET TO UH-MANOA CAMPUS AND
QUARRY AREA)PROVIDED THAT NO STATE FUNDS
SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE CITY AND
COUNTY OF HONOLULU CONTRIBUTES MATCHING
FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-
DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING CCH C 1,400 C
CCH .S 1,400 S

SUB301 - COUNTY OF HAWAII

18. KAWANANAKOA GYM RENOVATION, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
RENOVATIONS TO THE GYM; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES; PROVIDED THAT NO STATE
FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE COUNTY
OF HAWAII CONTRIBUTES MATCHING COUNTY
FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-
DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING COH 3,500C C
COH 3,SOOS S


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 224

Page 225 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
18.1 EMERGENCY RESPONSE AND COMMUNITY
CENTER, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
THE SPENCER KALANI SCHUTTE PARK NEW
COMMUNITY CENTER/SHELTER; PROVIDED THAT
NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS
THE COUNTY OF HAWAII CONTRIBUTES MATCHING
FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-
DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING COH C 5,000 C
COH 5,000 S
COH X 5,000 X

SUB401 - COUNTY OF MAUI

18■2 CENTRAL MAUI WASTE WATER TREATMENT
PLANT, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR A CENTRAL MAUI WASTE WATER
TREATMENT PLANT; PLANS MAY INCLUDE
IMPROVEMENTS, RENOVATION, REFURBISHMENT,
OR NEW CONSTRUCTION; GROUNDS AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES; PROVIDED THAT MATCHING
FUNDS BE PROVIDED BY THE COUNTY OF MAUI■
TOTAL FUNDING COM C 10,500 C
COM 10'500 S


HB1800 CDl FIN-2
225
iniiiiiiniiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 226 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
SUB501 - COUNTY OF KAUAT

19. HANAPEPE STADIUM IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
HANAPEPE STADIUM INCLUDING LOCKER ROOMS
UPGRADES, LIGHT FIXTURES AND POLES,
CARETAKER OFFICE BUILDING REPLACEMENT,
AND ELECTRICAL ROOM UPGRADES; PROVIDED
THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED
UNLESS THE COUNTY OF KAUAI CONTRIBUTES
MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON
A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING COK 3,500C C
COK 3,500 S S

20. KAUAI DEPARTMENT OF WATER, KUHIO
HIGHWAY WATER MAIN REPLACEMENT, KAUAI

CONSTRUCTION FOR REPLACEMENT OF 18-
INCH WATER MAIN ALONG KUHIO HIGHWAY
(HARDY TO OXFORD ST); PROVIDED THAT NO
STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE
COUNTY OF KAUAI CONTRIBUTES MATCHING
COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-
FOR-DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING COK 1,500 C C
COK 1,500 S S

21. VIDINHA STADIUM IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR ADA UPGRADES, LIGHTING,
RENOVATE LOCKER ROOMS, RESTROOMS, OFFICE
SPACES, AND FOOD BOOTHS, REPLACE FENCING,
PAVING, AND PEDESTRIAN SAFETY; PROVIDED
THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED
UNLESS THE COUNTY OF KAUAI CONTRIBUTES
MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON
A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING COK 8,000C C
COK 8,000 S S


HB1800 CDl FIN-2 226
iniigiiiiiHiaiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 227 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D, 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 8. Part VI of Act 250, Session Laws of Hawaii
2025, is amended as follows:
1. By amending section 15 to read;
"SECTION 15. Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the
appropriations under Act 164, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023,
section 7, as amended and renumbered by Act 230, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2024, section 7, in the amounts indicated or balances
thereof, unallotted, allotted, unencumbered, or encumbered and
unrequired, are hereby lapsed:
"Item No. Amount (MOF)
A-15 $ 4,500,000 C
E-14.1 4,200,000 C
E-17 13,557,000 C
F-3 1,100,000 A
G-6 500,000 C
G-9.3 671,000 C
G-14.3 660,000 C
G-15.3 1,000,000 C
G-24 2,500,000 C
G-25.1 350,000 C
G-30.1 6, 950, 000 C
G-36 21,000 C
G-4 6 6,000,000 C
G-52 2,500,000 C
G-53.2 100,000 C
G-54.1 2,000,000 C
G-61.1 1,000,000 C
G-64 130,000 C
G-70.1 500,000 C
G-78.2 4,000,000 C
G-79.2 150,000 C
G-86.1 1,000,000 c
G-92.1 650,000 C
G-98 200,000 C
G-99.2 1,320,000 C
HB1800 CDl FIN-2
227

Page 228
H.B. NO. S;
C.D. 1
G-111.2 650,000 C
G-112 3,000,000 C
G-112.1 200,000 C
G-113 1,500,000 C
G-113.2 1,680,000 C
G-113.3 1,000,000 C
G-119 100,000 C
G-119.1 50,000,000 C
G-129.1 1,000,000 c
G-140.2 500,000 C
I-O . 1 4,000,000 C
K-5.1 14,000,000 C
K-12 200,000 C""
2. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 20.1. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDNIQQ), the sum
of $101,647,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for
fiscal year 2026-2027 may be used for capital improvement
projects and deferred maintenance projects with the following
projects given priority; provided further that the department of
education shall submit a summary report regarding the use of
this appropriation for the previous twelve month period from
December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than
thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of
2027 aJ2d 202^
1. AHUIMANU ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
DEFERRED MAINTENANCE AND UPGRADES INCLUDING CAFE STEPS WALKWAY
REROOFING AND GUTTER REPLACEMENT, P1-P6 WALKWAY REROOFING,
VARSITY BUILDING MISC CARPENTRY REPAIRS, 01 CONCRETE SIDEWALK
EXTENSION, CAMPUS DRAINAGE IMPROVEMENTS, E GLASS WINDOW
HB1800 CDl FIN-2
228

Page 229 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
REPLACEMENTS, ADA BARRIER REMOVAL, AND PLAYGROUND EQUIPMENT;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

2^ ALA WAI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
LIBRARY AC REPLACEMENT AND P2, P4 REROOFING; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

3 ■ AUGUST AHRENS ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION
FOR Pl, P4, AND P12 REROOFING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

BEN PARKER ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
DEFERRED MAINTENANCE INCLUDING E, H REPLACE ROOF VENTS, INTEGRATE
PA/PROGRAM BELL, AND E REPLACE AC UNITS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

5. CASTLE HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR DEFERRED
MAINTENANCE INCLUDING GUTTER REPLACEMENTS, C, D, E, AND BB MID
SECT ROOF RECOAT, A AND LGLC AC UNIT REPLACEMENT, BB REPLACE
PACKAGE UNITS 1, 2, AND 5, J-9A FIRE SUPPRESSION SYSTEM INSTALL,
AND EE REPLACE EXHAUST FAN; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

6. FARRINGTON HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
BUILDING A SPALDING REPAIRS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

7 ■ FERN ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
BUILDINGS F AND G ELECTRICAL UPGRADES AND CAMPUS WATER FOUNTAIN
REPLACEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

8. HEEIA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
DEFERRED MAINTENANCE AND UPGRADES INCLUDING A COVERED WALKWAY,
LIBRARY AC REPLACEMENT, SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS, CAMPUS DRAINAGE
IMPROVEMENTS, ROADWAY RESURFACING, AND BOUNDARY SURVEY; GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

9. HONOWAI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
PARKING LOT DRIVEWAY RESURFACING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

10. JARRETT MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR LEVELING
AND REGRESSING A LARGE FIELD ON CAMPUS, BUILDING F LIBRARY
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 229

Page 230 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
IMPROVEMENTS, AND CLASSROOM RENOVATIONS (10); GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

ll.KAHAKAI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, HAWAII; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
EVACUATION PATHWAY WORK AND CAFETERIA CEILING FANS REPLACEMENT;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

12 . KAHALUU ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
DEFERRED MAINTENANCE AND UPGRADES INCLUDING A, B, AND D COVERED
WALKWAYS, A AND B ELECTRICAL OUTLETS, B AND C DRAINAGE
IMPROVEMENTS, AND D RESTROOM RENOVATIONS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

13. KAILUA INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
RESTROOM RENOVATIONS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

14. KAIMUKI HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR G1Q2, G103
ELECTRICAL UPGRADES, GYM FLOOR REPLACEMENT, BUILDING Z
DEHUMIDIFIER INSTALLATIONS, AND BUILDINGS YY AND Q STRUCTURAL
DAMAGE REPAIRS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

15. KALAKAUA MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
BUILDING 0 LOWER ROOF REROOFING AND BUILDING U AC REPLACEMENT FOR
MUSIC ROOM; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

16. KALIHI WAENA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
BUILDING H AC REPLACEMENT; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

17. KANOELANI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
RESURFACING PARKING LOT; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES;

18. KING INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
DEFERRED MAINTENANCE AND UPGRADES INCLUDING GYM IMPROVEMENTS AND
FLOOR REPAIR AND REFINISH, AND BUILDING K WATERPROOF UPPER
SECTION WALLS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

19. LINAPUNI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL; PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO RESURFACE AND REPAIR AN APPROXIMATELY 30X30 BLACKTOP
PLAY AREA DAMAGED BY TREE ROOTS;
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 230
IHINIIIIIIIIIIIII

Page 231 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
‘
‘
‘
i_|Jbl>t.»CiAL\04'00
O'
O*->l»N
W^»7t\3{^000s'
O
lJb
W^4<
V\0^-000>'0
li
K
W^«
U\
OJ'
©0
O'
O
—
—
20. LUNALILO ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A,
B, C SPALLING REPAIRS AND RAILINGS, AND BUILDING E REROOFING;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;
21. MAEMAE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
CAMPUS EXTERIOR WALKWAY REROOFING AND BUILDING A AND K GUTTER
REPAIRS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;
22. MAILI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
PARKING LOT IMPROVEMENTS, REAR FENCE RELOCATION, AND GENERAL
GROUND IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;
23. MOANALUA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THREE EQUIPMENT STORAGE ROOMS AND ADDRESSING THE
MAIN WALL FACING THE COURTS;
.NANAKULI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR AC
REPLACEMENT, PARKING LOT LIGHTS REPAIRS, PHI GROUND IMPROVEMENTS,
AND STAFF RESTROOM RENOVATIONS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;
25. NANAKULI HIGH SCHOOL AND INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR DRIVEWAY RESURFACING AND PARKING LOT
IMPROVEMENTS, AND KITCHEN CEILING FAN INSTALLATION, AND COIL UP
DOOR WITH GATE REPLACEMENT; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;
26. NUUANU ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR AC
INSTALLATION AND COVERED WALKWAY REROOFING; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;
27. PALOLO ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
BUILDING C REROOFING AND RESTROOM RENOVATIONS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;
28. PAUOA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR B, C,
D RAILING MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS, AND CEILING FAN
MAINTENANCE; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;
29. PRINCE DAVID KAWANANAKOA MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR BUILDING C REROOFING AND PERIMETER FENCING
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 231

Page 232 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
REPAIRS AND/OR IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

30. PUUHALE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
BUILDING A LOWER ROOF REROOFING AND BUILDING B CAFETERIA STAGE
CURTAIN REPLACEMENT; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

31. QUEEN KAAHUMANU ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR SIX FEET OF PERIMETER LINK FENCING, AND 4 GATES;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

32. SALT LAKE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
SECURITY FENCING NEAR COURTS;

33. THOMAS JEFFERSON ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION
FOR COVERED WALKWAY REROOFING AND PERIMETER FENCING REPLACEMENT;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

34. WAIAHOLE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
DEFERRED MAINTENANCE INCLUDING COVERED WALKWAY D-H AND F-P2
REPLACEMENT, AND BUILDING C KITCHEN FLOOR REPLACEMENT; GROUND AND
SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

35. WAIPAHU ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
BUILDING C AC REPLACEMENT; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

36. WAIPAHU HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR BUILDING R
REROOFING, CEILING FAN INSTALLATION FOR P32 AND P33, AND BUILDING
I AC REPLACEMENT; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES; AND

37. WAIPAHU INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
WALKWAY BACK PERIMETER FENCE REPLACEMENT; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES."

3. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 20.2. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDNIOO) , the sum
of $85,503,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
HB1800 CDl FIN-2
232

Page 233 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
year 2026-2027 may be used for capital improvement projects and
health and safety projects with the following projects given
priority; provided further that the department of education
shall submit a summary report regarding the use of this
appropriation for the previous twelve month period from December
1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days
prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2027 and 2028:
KALAHEO HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR ELECTRICAL
REPAIRS AND UPGRADES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

2 . KONAWAENA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, HAWAII; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
AC COOLING TOWER REPLACEMENT AND BUILDING REROOFING; GROUND AND
SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

3 ■ MOANALUA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE REPLACEMENT OF THE CENTRAL AIR CONDITIONING
SYSTEM FOR STUDENT CENTER, BUILDING T;
WAIPAHU INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
WATERLINE REPLACEMENT; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES; AND

5 . WASHINGTON MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR P1-P4
ELECTRICAL UPGRADES AND BUILDING F FIRST AND SECOND FLOOR
RESTROOM RENOVATIONS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES."

4. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 20.3. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDNIOO) , the sum
of $81,400,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
HB1800 CDl FIN-2
233
IIIIHIIIIIIIIIIBIIIIIII

Page 234 ■ ■ ik ■ 1800
n.D. ND. H.D1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
year 2026-2027 may be used for capital improvement projects and
support projects with the following projects given priority;
provided further that the department of education shall submit a
summary report regarding the use of this appropriation for the
previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to
the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening
of the regular sessions of 2027 and 2028:
AIEA_2HGH_SCHOOL^_OAHU2_^LANS_^^_pESIGT;b_AND_CONSTRUCTION_JpR
LEyELING_OFjn]E_GROUNp_AROUNDjrHE_GyMNAS2UMlS_^XTERJOF_A^
INSTALLING A PROPER DRAINAGE SYSTEM TO DIRECT WATER AWAY FROM THE
STRUCTURE TO ADDRESS SEVERE AND PERSISTENT DRAINAGE ISSUES, AND
FOR THE REPLACEMENT AND UPDATING OF AGING FOOTBALL STADIUM
PERIMETER FENCING ALONG ULUNE STREET AND KAAMILO STREET TO
ADDRESS SECURITY AND AESTHETIC CONCERNS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

HILO HIGH SCHOOL, HAWAII; PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
CONCESSIONS WITH COLD KITCHEN, RESTROOMS, SUPPORTING THE ATHLETIC
FIELD AND BLEACHER SEATING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

3. JAMES CAMPBELL HIGH SCHOOL ATHLETIC STADIUM, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE CONTINUATION OF PHASED
FUNDING FOR DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF ATHLETIC COMPLEX/STADIUM;

4. KAILUA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE
TRACK AND FIELD, INCLUDING BLEACHERS AND RESTROOM FACILITY;
GROUND AND SITE WORK IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

5. KAPAA HIGH SCHOOL TRACK, KAUAI; PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR KAPAA HIGH SCHOOL TRACK AND FIELD;

LEILEHUA HIGH SCHOOL, ADMINISTRATION BUILDING, OAHU; PLANS,
DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR A NEW ADMINISTRATION
BUILDING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

HB1800 CDl FIN-2 234

Page 235 H.B. NO.
“
h
C.D. 1
2^ MILILANI HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR COVERED
PLAY COURTS FOR PE AND ATHLETIC PROGRAMS, INCLUDING SUPPORT
FACILITIES, LIGHTING AND ACCESSIBLE PATH OF TRAVEL; GROUND AND
SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

NANAKULI HIGH SCHOOL AND INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR BASEBALL FIELD IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; AND

9 ■ WAIPAHU HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS AND DESIGN FOR REPAIRS AND
IMPROVEMENTS TO THE BASEBALL FIELD."

5. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 20.4. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDNIOO), the sum
of $21,300,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
year 2026-2027 may be used for capital improvement projects and
compliance projects with the following project given priority;
provided further that the department of education shall submit a
summary report regarding the use of this appropriation for the
previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to
the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening
of the regular sessions of 2027 and 2028:
1 ■ CASTLE HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR SOFTBALL
FIELD IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES."

6. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 20.5. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDNIOO), the sum
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 235

Page 236 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
of $6,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
year 2026-2027 may be used for capital improvement projects and
temporary facilities' projects with the following projects given
priority; provided further that the department of education
shall submit a summary report regarding the use of this
appropriation for the previous twelve month period from December
1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty'days
prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2027 and 2028:
1 . LANAI HIGH AND ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, MAUI; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION
FOR PORTABLE CLASSROOMS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES; AND

2 . PAIA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, MAUI; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
PORTABLE CLASSROOMS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES."

7. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 26.1. Provided that of the general obligation bond
funds to be deposited into the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation's rental housing revolving fund (BED16Q)
for fiscal year 2026-2027, the sum of $100,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary, may be expended for the following
projects:
614 WAILEPO
2 . HALE MAHAOLU KE KAHUA
3 . HALE 0 LIPOA
HALE OLA 0 MOHOULI
HANAPEPE RESIDENCE LOTS-IIA
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 236

Page 237 H.B. NO 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
6. HOOLA AT PALAMANUI
2^ HOOMALU AT WAIKOLOA
8 . KAIAHALE 0 KAHILUHILU PHASES 1 & 2
2^ KAIAHALE O KAHILUHILU PHASES 1
10. KAIAHALE 0 KAHILUHILU PHASES 2
11. KAIAULU O KAPIOLANI
12 . KAMOILIILI APARTMENTS
13. KAPAA HOMES
14. KAPOLEI PARKWAY LOT 5
15. KAUHALE OLU APARTMENTS
1 6 . KAUWELA APARTMENTS I
17.KEAWALAU DIAMOND HEAD
18 . KEAWALAU EWA
19.KIHAPAI PLACE APARTMENTS (4% LIHTC)
20 . KOA VISTA III - 1
21. LAI OPUA V4-HEMA 2
22. MAYOR WRIGHT HOMES (MWH) PHASE IB
23.NAIO AT PALAMANUI
24. POHUKAINA COMMONS PHASE II
25. PUA LANE FAMILY AFFORDABLE
26 . THE HOKU
27. WAIKOLOA NAKAHILI
28. WAIMANALO APARTMENTS (9% LIHTC)
Provided further that the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation shall submit a summary report regarding
the use of this appropriation^ including project status,
expenditures by project, and housing units produced or in
development, for the previous twelve-month period from December
1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days
prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027.”
8. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 28.1. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund, general obligation bond fund with debt service costs to be
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 237

Page 238 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
paid from special funds, special fund, and revenue bond fund
appropriations for capital improvement projects for the Hawaii
tourism authority, for fiscal year 2026-2027, the Hawaii tourism
authority shall submit a report to the legislature on the Hawaii
convention center (BED113) sources and uses of funds
appropriated for such projects for the previous twelve month
period from December 1 to November 30 no later than thirty days
prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027; provided
further that the report shall be organized as follows:
(1) Sources of funds (revenues): a summary of all means
of funding sources for capital improvement projects,
including but not limited to:
(A) Generad^fjjnd^
(B) Special funds, including the convention center
enterprise special fund;
(C) General obligation bond funds;
(D) General obligation bond funds with debt service
costs to be paid from special funds;
(E) Revenue bond funds; and
(F) Private funds;
HB1800 GDI FIN-2 238

Page 239 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
(2) Uses of funds (expenditures): expenditures shall be
reported by project for projects in excess of
$1,000,000, or by program where projects are
$1,000,000 or less, and summarized by major cost
category, including but not limited to:
(A) Plans;
(B) Land acquisition;
(C) Design;
(D) Construction;
(E) Equipment and furnishing; and
(F) Project management, consultant services, and
administrative costs;
together with budgeted amounts, expenditures to date,
and remaining balances;
(3) Project status: for each project greater than
$1,000,000, the report shall include:
(A) Project name and number, including vendor name;
Project purpose;
(C) Total authorized budget;
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 239

Page 240 H.B. NO. E
C.D. 1
(D) All sources of moneys used for the project,
identified by means of financing or other
sources;
(E) Amounts received, encumbered, expended, and
remaining for each source, and major outstanding
obligations;
(F) Expenditures categorized by cost elements;
(G) Estimated percentage of completion;
(H) Any transfers or reappropriations of funds
between projects, or other changes to the project
budget; and
(I) A brief explanation of any material delays or
cost ch^rige^
(4) Cash flow and timing: an estimate of anticipated
expenditures for the remainder of fiscal year 2026-2027
and any known timing issues affecting the availability
or expenditure of funds; and
(5) Variances: An explanation of all significant variances
between budgeted and actual amounts for revenues and
expenditures;
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 240
iiniiiiiHiiiiiiiiii

Page 241 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Provided further that the information required by this
section shall be presented in a summary format sufficient to
inform the legislature of the sources and uses of moneys for
each project without transaction-level detail."
9. By adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 28.2. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund appropriation for the state office on homelessness and
housing solutions (HMS777), the sum of $18,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 may be
used for kauhale development projects; provided further that the
state office on homelessness and housing solutions shall submit
a report on the use of this appropriation, including project
status, expenditures by project, and kauhale units produced or
in development, for the previous twelve-month period from
December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than
thirty days prior to the convening of the regular session of
2027 and 2028 . "
SECTION 9. Part VIII of Act 250, Session Laws of Hawaii
2025, is amended as follows:
1. By adding a new section to read:
HB1800 CDl FIN-2
iiiHiiiMiniiin 241

Page 242 H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"SECTION 54.1. Unless otherwise provided in this Act, the
governor is authorized to transfer operating funds between
appropriations within the same fund, within an expending agency,
for operating purposes; provided that the governor shall submit
a report to the legislature within five days of each use of this
authority; provided further that the report shall include the
date of transfer, the amount of the transfer, the program ID
from which funds were transferred, the program ID to which funds
were transferred, the impact to the program ID funds are
transferred from, and a detailed explanation of the public
purposes served by the transfer of resources; and provided
further that the governor shall submit to the legislature a
summary report containing the aforementioned information for
each use of this authority for the previous twelve month period
from December 1 to November 30 no later than thirty days prior
to the convening of the regular session of 2027."
SECTION 10. If any portion of this Act or its application
to any person, entity, or circumstance is held to be invalid for
any reason, then the legislature declares that the remainder of
the Act and each and every other provision thereof shall not be
affected thereby. If any portion of a specific appropriation is
HB1800 CDl FIN-2
242

Page 243 H.B. NO. JiS’i
C.D. 1
held to be invalid for any reason, the remaining portion shall
be expended to fulfill the objective of such appropriation to
the extent possible.
SECTION 11. In the event manifest clerical, typographical,
or other mechanical errors are found in this Act, the governor
is hereby authorized to correct such errors.
SECTION 12. Nothing in this Act shall affect the validity
or continuing effectiveness of any provisions of Act 250,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, not repealed or modified by this
Act.
SECTION 13. Material to be repealed is bracketed and
stricken. New material in prior enacted laws is underscored.
In printing this Act, the revisor of statutes need not include
the bracketed material or the underscoring.
SECTION 14. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
HB1800 CDl FIN-2 243
iMmiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiiw

H.B. NO. 1800
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1800, HD 1, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1800, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
125-26